Louisiana, session 2026, HB1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The appropriations in this Act from state revenue shall be payable out of the
sources specified and shall be limited by the provisions of Article VII, Section 10(D) of the
Louisiana Constitution.
Section 2.A. All money from federal, interagency, statutory dedications, or self-
generated revenues shall be available for expenditure in the amounts herein appropriated.
Any increase in such revenues shall be available for allotment and expenditure by an agency
on approval of an increase in the appropriation by the commissioner of administration and
the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Any increase in such revenues for an agency
without an appropriation from the respective revenue source shall be incorporated into the
agency's appropriation on approval of the commissioner of administration and the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget. In the event that these revenues should be less than
the amount appropriated, the appropriation shall be reduced accordingly. To the extent that
such funds were included in the budget on a matching basis with state funds, a corresponding
decrease in the state matching funds may be made. Any federal funds which are classified
as disaster or emergency may be expended prior to approval of a BA-7 by the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget upon the secretary's certifying to the governor that any
delay would be detrimental to the state. The Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
Page 1 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
shall be notified in writing of such declaration and shall meet to consider such action, but
if it is found by the committee that such funds were not needed for an emergency
expenditure, such approval may be withdrawn and any balance remaining shall not be
expended.
B. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to correct the
means of financing and expenditures for any appropriation contained in Schedule 20-901
Sales Tax Dedications to reflect current law enacted in any session of the Legislature which
affects any such means of financing or expenditure.
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law or this Act to the contrary, no funds herein
appropriated or authorized later through a BA-7 in any means of finance may be used for a
contact tracing program that mandates participation by an individual or business entity in the
state of Louisiana.
Section 3.A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the functions of any
department, agency, program, or budget unit of the executive branch, except functions in
departments, agencies, programs, or budget units of other statewide elected officials, may
be transferred to a different department, agency, program, or budget unit for the purpose of
economizing the operations of state government by executive order of the governor.
Provided, however, that each such transfer must, prior to implementation, be approved by
the commissioner of administration and Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Further,
provided that no transfers pursuant to this Section shall violate the provisions of Title 36,
Organization of the Executive Branch of State Government.
B. In the event that any agency, budget unit, program, or function of a department is
transferred to any other department, agency, program, or budget unit by other Act or Acts
of the legislature, the commissioner of administration shall make the necessary adjustments
to appropriations through the notification of appropriation process, or through approval of
mid-year adjustments. All such adjustments shall be in strict conformity with the provisions
of the Act or Acts which provide for the transfers.
C. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and before the commissioner of
administration shall authorize the purchase of any luxury or full-size motor vehicle for
personal assignment by a statewide elected official other than the governor and lieutenant
governor, such official shall first submit the request to the Joint Legislative Committee on
Page 2 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
the Budget for approval. "Luxury or full-sized motor vehicle" shall mean or refer to such
vehicles as defined or used in rules or guidelines promulgated and implemented by the
Division of Administration.
D. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each agency which has
contracted with outside legal counsel for representation in an action against another agency,
shall submit a detailed report of all litigation costs incurred and payable to the outside
counsel to the commissioner of administration, the legislative committee charged with
oversight of that agency, and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. The report
shall be submitted on a quarterly basis, each January, April, July, and October, and shall
include all litigation costs paid and payable during the prior quarter. For purposes of this
Subsection, the term "litigation expenses" shall mean court costs and attorney fees of the
agency and of the other party if the agency was required to pay such costs and fees. The
commissioner of administration shall not authorize any payments for any such contract until
such report for the prior quarter has been submitted.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each agency may use a portion
of its appropriations contained in this Act for the expenditure of funds for salaries and
related benefits for smoking cessation wellness programs, including pharmacotherapy and
behavioral counseling for state employees of the agency.
Section 4. Each schedule as designated by a five-digit number code for which an
appropriation is made in this Act is hereby declared to be a budget unit of the state.
Section 5.A. The program descriptions, account descriptions, general performance
information, and the role, scope, and mission statements of postsecondary education
institutions contained in this Act are not part of the law and are not enacted into law by
virtue of their inclusion in this Act.
B. All key and supporting performance objectives and indicators for the departments,
agencies, programs, and budget units contained in the Governor's Executive Budget
Supporting Document shall be adjusted by the commissioner of administration to reflect the
funds appropriated therein. The commissioner of administration shall report on these
adjustments to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget by August 15 of the current
fiscal year.
Page 3 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
C. The discretionary and nondiscretionary allocations if contained in this Act are
provided in accordance with R.S. 39:51(A)(3) and are to provide information to assist in
legislative decision making and shall not be construed to limit the expenditures or means of
financing of an agency, budget unit, or department to the discretionary or nondiscretionary
amounts contained in this Act.
D. The expenditure category allocations contained in this Act are provided for
informational purposes only from the Governor’s Executive Budget supporting documents
in accordance with R.S. 39:51(C) and are to provide information to assist in legislative
decision making and shall not be construed to limit the expenditures or means of financing
of an agency, budget unit, or department to the expenditure category amounts contained in
this Act. The commissioner of administration shall notify the Joint Legislative Committee
on the Budget of the initial allocation of expenditures and means of financing for the
personal services expenditure category at the same time he reports initial expenditure
allocations as required by R.S. 39:57.1.
E. The incentive programs, expenditures, and benefits contained in this Act are provided
in accordance with R.S. 39:51(A)(2) and are not included as, nor counted towards, the
operating expenses of the department, agency, or authority.
F. The prior year budget and positions contained in this Act are provided in accordance
with R.S. 39:51 and are to provide information to assist in legislative decision making and
shall not be construed as additional expenditures, means of financing, or positions of an
agency, budget unit, or department.
Section 6.A. Unless expressly provided in this Act, funds cannot be transferred between
departments or schedules receiving appropriations. However, any unencumbered funds
which accrue to an appropriation within a department or schedule of this Act due to policy,
programmatic, or cost-saving/avoidance measures may, upon approval by the commissioner
of administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, be transferred to any
other appropriation within that same department or schedule. Each request for the transfer
of funds pursuant to this Section shall include full written justification. The commissioner
of administration, upon approval by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, shall
have the authority to transfer between departments funds associated with lease agreements
between the state and the Office Facilities Corporation. The commissioner of administration
Page 4 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
shall, in accordance with R.S. 15:827.3, transfer between departments or schedules of this
Act any unencumbered funds which accrue to an appropriation due to the prior year savings
achieved as a result of legislation relative to the criminal justice system enacted in the 2017
Regular Session of the Legislature.
B. In conjunction with the continuing assessment of the existing staff, assets, contracts,
and facilities of each department, agency, program or budget unit's information technology
resources and procurement resources, upon completion of this assessment and to the extent
optimization of these resources will result in the projected cost savings through staff
reductions, realization of operational efficiencies, cost avoidance, and elimination of asset
duplication, the commissioner of administration is authorized to transfer the functions,
positions, assets, and funds from any other department, agency, program, or budget units
related to these optimizations to a different department. The provisions of this Subsection
shall not apply to the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism, or any agency
contained in Schedule 04, Elected Officials, of this Act.
C. The commissioner of administration shall review all existing leases for office and
warehouse space and compare the rent per square foot of such space to the market rent of
similar space in the same market. The commissioner of administration is authorized and
directed to renegotiate all leases that are in excess of the market rent to bring the rent in line
with the market rent. The commissioner of administration, upon approval of the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget, shall have the authority to transfer between
departments funds from any savings from renegotiated leases.
Section 7. The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to use any available
funds on deposit in the state treasury to complete the payment of General Fund
appropriations for the current fiscal year. In order to conform to the provisions of P.L. 101-
453, the Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990, and in accordance with the agreement
executed between the state and Financial Management Services, a division of the U.S.
Treasury, the state treasurer is hereby authorized to release checks drawn on federally funded
appropriations prior to the receipt of funds from the U.S. Treasury.
Section 8.A.(1) The figures in parentheses following the designation of a program are
the total authorized positions and authorized other charges positions for that program. If
Page 5 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
there are no figures following a department, agency, or program, the commissioner of
administration shall have the authority to set the number of positions.
(2) The commissioner of administration, upon approval of the Joint Legislative
Committee on the Budget, shall have the authority to transfer positions between departments,
agencies, or programs or to increase or decrease positions and associated funding necessary
to effectuate such transfers.
(3) The number of authorized positions and authorized other charges positions approved
for each department, agency, or program as a result of the passage of this Act may be
increased by the commissioner of administration in conjunction with the transfer of
functions or funds to that department, agency, or program when sufficient documentation
is presented and the request deemed valid.
(4) The number of authorized positions and authorized other charges positions approved
in this Act for each department, agency, or program may also be increased by the
commissioner of administration when sufficient documentation of other necessary
adjustments is presented and the request is deemed valid. The total number of such positions
so approved by the commissioner of administration may not be increased in excess of three
hundred fifty. However, any request which reflects an annual aggregate increase in excess
of twenty-five positions for any department, agency, or program must also be approved by
the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
B. Orders from the Civil Service Commission or its designated referee which direct an
agency to pay attorney fees for a successful appeal by an employee may be paid out of an
agency's appropriation from the expenditure category professional services; provided,
however, that an individual expenditure pursuant to this Subsection may not exceed $5,000
in accordance with Civil Service Rule 13.35(a).
C. The budget request of any agency with an appropriation level of thirty million dollars
or more shall include, within its existing table of organization, positions which perform the
function of internal auditing, including the position of a chief audit executive. The chief
audit executive shall be responsible for ensuring that the internal audit function adheres to
the Institute of Internal Auditors and Global Internal Audit Standards. The chief audit
executive shall maintain organizational independence in accordance with these standards and
shall have direct and unrestricted access to the commission, board, secretary, or equivalent
Page 6 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
head of the agency. The chief audit executive shall certify to the commission, board,
secretary, or equivalent head of the agency that the internal audit function conforms to the
Institute of Internal Auditors and Global Internal Audit Standards.
D. In the event that any cost assessment allocation proposed by the Office of Group
Benefits becomes effective during the current fiscal year, each budget unit contained in this
Act shall pay out of its appropriation an amount no less than 75% of total premiums for all
active employees and those retirees with Medicare in accordance with R.S. 42:851(D)(1) for
the state basic health insurance indemnity program.
E. In the event that any cost allocation or increase recommended by the Public
Retirement Systems' Actuarial Committee through adoption of a valuation submitted to the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget and the House and Senate committees on
retirement becomes effective before or during the current fiscal year, each budget unit shall
pay out of its appropriation funds necessary to satisfy the requirements of such increase.
Section 9. In the event the governor shall veto any line item expenditure and such veto
shall be upheld by the legislature, the commissioner of administration shall withhold from
the department's, agency's, or program's funds an amount equal to the veto. The
commissioner of administration shall determine how much of such withholdings shall be
from the State General Fund.
Section 10.A. Pursuant to Article IV, Section 5(G)(2) and Article VII, Section 10(F) of
the Louisiana constitution, if at any time during the current fiscal year the official budget
status report indicates that appropriations will exceed the official revenue forecast, the
governor shall have full power to reduce appropriations in accordance with R.S. 39:75. The
governor shall have the authority to make adjustments to other means of financing and
positions necessary to balance the budget as authorized by R.S. 39:75(C).
B. The governor shall have the authority within any month of the fiscal year to direct
the commissioner of administration to disapprove warrants drawn upon the state treasury for
appropriations contained in this Act which are in excess of amounts approved by the
governor in accordance with R.S. 39:74.
C. The governor may also, and in addition to the other powers set forth herein, issue
executive orders in a combination of any of the foregoing means for the purpose of
preventing the occurrence of a deficit.
Page 7 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Section 11. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2 of this Act, the commissioner
of administration shall make such technical adjustments as are necessary in the interagency
transfers means of financing and expenditure categories of the appropriations in this Act to
result in a balance between each transfer of funds from one budget unit to another budget
unit in this Act. Such adjustments shall be strictly limited to those necessary to achieve this
balance and shall in no way have the effect of changing the intended level of funding for a
program or budget unit of this Act.
Section 12.A. For the purpose of paying appropriations made herein, all revenues due
the state in the current fiscal year shall be credited by the collecting agency to the current
fiscal year provided such revenues are received in time to liquidate obligations incurred
during the current fiscal year.
B. A state board or commission shall have the authority to expend only those funds that
are appropriated in this Act, except those boards or commissions which are solely supported
from private donations or which function as port commissions, levee boards or professional
and trade organizations.
Section 13.A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including any provision
of any appropriation act or any capital outlay act, no constitutional requirement or special
appropriation enacted at any session of the legislature, except the specific appropriations acts
for the payment of judgments against the state, of legal expenses, and of back supplemental
pay, the appropriation act for the expenses of the judiciary, and the appropriation act for
expenses of the legislature, its committees, and any other items listed therein, shall have
preference and priority over any of the items in the General Appropriation Act or the Capital
Outlay Act for any fiscal year.
B. In the event that more than one appropriation is made in this Act which is payable
from any specific statutory dedication, such appropriations shall be allocated and distributed
by the state treasurer in accordance with the order of priority specified or provided in the law
establishing such statutory dedication and if there is no such order of priority such
appropriations shall be allocated and distributed as otherwise provided by any provision of
law including this or any other act of the legislature appropriating funds from the state
treasury.
Page 8 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
C. In accordance with R.S. 49:314(B)(1) and (2) appropriations from the Transportation
Trust Fund in the General Appropriation Act and the Capital Outlay Act shall have equal
priority. In the event revenues being received in the state treasury and being credited to the
fund which is the source of payment of any appropriation in such acts are insufficient to fully
fund the appropriations made from such fund source, the treasurer shall allocate money for
the payment of warrants drawn on such appropriations against such fund source during the
fiscal year on the basis of the ratio which the amount of such appropriation bears to the total
amount of appropriations from such fund source contained in both acts.
Section 14. Pay raises or supplements provided for by this Act shall in no way supplant
any local or parish salaries or salary supplements to which the personnel affected would be
ordinarily entitled.
Section 15. Any unexpended or unencumbered reward monies received by any state
agency during prior fiscal years pursuant to the Exceptional Performance and Efficiency
Incentive Program may be carried forward for expenditure from the prior fiscal year to the
current fiscal year, in accordance with the respective resolution granting the reward. The
commissioner of administration shall implement any internal budgetary adjustments
necessary to effectuate incorporation of these monies into the respective agencies' budgets
for the current fiscal year, and shall provide a summary list of all such adjustments to the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget by August 31 of the current fiscal year.
Section 16. Should any section, subsection, clause, sentence, phrase, or part of the Act
for any reason be held, deemed or construed to be unconstitutional or invalid, such decisions
shall not affect the remaining provisions of the Act, and the legislature hereby declares that
it would have passed the Act, and each section, subsection, clause, sentence, phrase, or part
thereof, irrespective of the fact that one or more of the sections, subsections, clauses,
sentences, phrases, or parts thereof, is declared unconstitutional or invalid. To this end, the
provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 17.A. All BA-7 budget transactions, including relevant changes to performance
information, submitted in accordance with this Act or any other provisions of law which
require approval by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or joint approval by the
commissioner of administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget shall be
submitted to the commissioner of administration, Joint Legislative Committee on the
Page 9 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Budget, and Legislative Fiscal Office a minimum of sixteen working days prior to
consideration by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Each submission must
include full justification of the transaction requested, but submission in accordance with this
deadline shall not be the sole determinant of whether the item is actually placed on the
agenda for a hearing by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Transactions not
submitted in accordance with the provisions of this Section shall be considered by the
commissioner of administration and Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget only when
extreme circumstances requiring immediate action exist.
B. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Act or any contrary provision of law,
no funds appropriated by this Act shall be released or provided to any recipient of an
appropriation made in this Act if, when, and for as long as, the recipient fails or refuses to
comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513. No recipient shall be considered to fail or refuse
to comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513 pursuant to this Section during any extension
of time granted by the legislative auditor or the Legislative Audit Advisory Council. The
legislative auditor may grant a recipient, for good cause shown, an extension of time to
comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513. The Legislative Audit Advisory Council may
grant additional extensions of time to comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513 for recipient
entities of an appropriation contained in this Act with recommendation by the legislative
auditor pursuant to R.S. 39:72.1.
Section 18.A. Funds appropriated to auxiliary accounts herein shall be from prior and
current year collections, with the exception of State General Fund (Direct). Further provided
with regard to auxiliary funds, that excess cash funds, excluding cash funds arising from
working capital advances, shall be invested by the state treasurer with the interest proceeds
therefrom credited to each account and not transferred to the State General Fund. This Act
shall be subject to all conditions set forth in Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 as amended.
B.(1) No funds appropriated in this Act shall be transferred to a public or quasi-public
agency or entity which is not a budget unit of the state unless the intended recipient of those
funds submits, for approval, a comprehensive budget to the legislative auditor and the
transferring agency showing all anticipated uses of the appropriation, an estimate of the
duration of the project, and a plan showing specific goals and objectives for the use of such
Page 10 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
funds, including measures of performance. In addition, and prior to making such
expenditure, the transferring agency shall require each recipient to agree in writing to
provide written reports to the transferring agency at least every six months concerning the
use of the funds and the specific goals and objectives for the use of the funds. In the event
the transferring agency determines that the recipient failed to use the funds set forth in its
budget within the estimated duration of the project or failed to reasonably achieve its
specific goals and objectives for the use of the funds, the transferring agency shall demand
that any unexpended funds be returned to the state treasury unless approval to retain the
funds is obtained from the division of administration and the Joint Legislative Committee
on the Budget. Each recipient shall be audited in accordance with R.S. 24:513. If the
amount of the public funds received by the provider is below the amount for which an audit
is required under R.S. 24:513, the transferring agency shall monitor and evaluate the use of
the funds to ensure effective achievement of the goals and objectives. The transferring
agency shall forward to the legislative auditor, the division of administration, and the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget a report showing specific data regarding compliance
with this Section and collection of any unexpended funds. This report shall be submitted no
later than May 1 of the current fiscal year.
(2) Transfers to public or quasi-public agencies or entities that have submitted a budget
request to the division of administration in accordance with Part II of Chapter 1 of Subtitle
1 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, transfers authorized by specific
provisions of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and the Constitution of the State of
Louisiana to local governing authorities, and any transfer to a political subdivision created
for economic development or tourism promotion and established by law in a parish having
a population of no less than two hundred forty-five thousand persons and no more than three
hundred fifty thousand persons shall be exempt from the provisions of this Subsection.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or this Act to the contrary, if the name
of an entity subject to this Subsection is misspelled or misstated in this Act or any other Act,
the state treasurer may pay the funds appropriated to the entity without obtaining the
approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, but only after the entity has
provided proof of its correct legal name to the state treasurer and transmitted a copy to the
staffs of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance.
Page 11 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
C. All departments containing appropriations out of means of financing designated as
coming from prior and current year collections shall report all prior year balances to the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget at its first meeting held after October 15 of the current
fiscal year.
D. All departments receiving appropriations in this Act shall spend all other means of
finance prior to spending any State General Fund (Direct), whenever possible, and shall
reverse warrant any State General Fund (Direct) if any other means of finance becomes
available prior to the end of the fiscal year to the greatest extent permissible by law.
Section 19. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to
reduce appropriations out of the State General Fund (Direct) for related benefits by
($30,000,000).
Section 20. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to
reduce appropriations out of the State General Fund (Direct) for acquisitions by
($53,247,582).
Section 21. The following sums or so much thereof as maybe necessary are hereby
appropriated out of any monies in the state treasury from the sources specified; from federal
funds payable to the state by the United States Treasury; or from funds belonging to the State
of Louisiana and/or collected by boards, commissions, departments, and agencies thereof,
for purposes specified herein for the current fiscal year. This Act shall be subject to all
conditions and set forth in Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 as amended.
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
01-100 EXECUTIVE OFFICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (93) (92)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,414,217 $ 2,230,505
Discretionary Expenditures $ 21,466,722 $ 22,987,131
Program Description: Provides general administration and support services required by
the Governor; includes staff for policy initiatives, executive counsel, finance and
administration, constituent services, communications, coastal activities, and legislative
affairs. In addition, the Office of Community Programs provides for outreach initiatives
including the Commission on Human Rights, the Office of Disability Affairs, Drug Policy
Board, Louisiana Youth for Excellence, State Independent Living Council, and Children's
Cabinet.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 23,880,939 $ 25,217,636
Page 12 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,937,835 $ 1,795,830
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 322,488 $ 290,244
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 55,141 $ 51,641
Statutory Dedications:
Disability Affairs Trust Fund $ 20,341 $ 19,138
Federal Funds $ 78,412 $ 73,652
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,414,217 $ 2,230,505
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 14,145,293 $ 14,394,402
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,918,856 $ 2,480,135
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 64,859 $ 111,659
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Children’s Trust Fund $ 1,576,727 $ 1,579,449
Statutory Dedications:
Disability Affairs Trust Fund $ 129,659 $ 131,771
Survivor Special Fund $ 10,348 $ 10,348
Federal Funds $ 3,620,980 $ 4,279,367
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 21,466,722 $ 22,987,131
Provided however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Self-generated
Revenues shall be carried forward and shall be available for expenditure.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 12,124,056 $ 12,115,957
Operating Expenses $ 2,200,484 $ 2,200,484
Professional Services $ 1,445,947 $ 1,445,947
Other Charges $ 8,110,452 $ 9,455,248
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 23,880,939 $ 25,217,636
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Administrative
Program for the development and revitalization of
rural areas in the state $ 5,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Council on the Success for Black Men
and Boys to fund a scholarship program and
related programming $ 200,000
Payable out of Federal Funds to the
Administrative Program for a rural
transit systems grant $ 1,580,000
Payable out of Federal Funds to the
Administrative Program for phase two of the
Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Accelerator
(LARIA) grant program $ 500,000
Page 13 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Department of
Transportation and Development to the
Administrative Program for a rural transit
mobility management program $ 2,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan
Program Fund to the Administrative
Program for a state infrastructure bank,
in the event that House Bill No. 1200 of
the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature
is enacted into law $ 2,500,000
01-101 OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative –
Authorized Position (1) (1)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 18,000 $ 18,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Assists Louisiana American Indians in receiving education,
realizing self-determination, improving the quality of life, and developing a mutual
relationship between the state and the tribes.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 18,000 $ 18,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 18,000 $ 18,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 18,000 $ 18,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 18,000 $ 18,000
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 18,000 $ 18,000
01-102 OFFICE OF THE STATE INSPECTOR GENERAL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative –
Authorized Positions (15) (15)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 500,460 $ 511,337
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,881,678 $ 4,994,198
Page 14 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The Office of the State Inspector General’s mission as a statutorily
empowered law enforcement agency is to investigate, detect, and prevent fraud, corruption,
waste, inefficiencies, mismanagement, misconduct, and abuse in the executive branch of
state government. The office’s mission promotes a high level of integrity, efficiency,
effectiveness, and economy in the operations of state government, increasing the general
public’s confidence and trust in state government.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 2,382,138 $ 5,505,535
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 500,460 $ 511,337
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 500,460 $ 511,337
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,865,348 $ $4,977,868
Federal Funds $ 16,330 $ 16,330
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,881,678 $ 4,994,198
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 2,050,563 $ 2,183,658
Operating Expenses $ 45,360 $ 45,360
Professional Services $ 2,500 $ 3,002,500
Other Charges $ 283,715 $ 274,017
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 2,382,138 $ 5,505,535
01-103 MENTAL HEALTH ADVOCACY SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (53) (53)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,117,474 $ 8,593,519
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides trained representation to every adult and juvenile patient
in mental health treatment facilities in Louisiana at all stages of the civil commitment
process and ensures that the legal rights of all persons with mental disabilities are
protected. Also provides legal representation to children in child protection cases in
Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 7,117,474 $ 8,593,519
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 6,445,419 $ 7,636,464
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 672,055 $ 957,055
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 7,117,474 $ 8,593,519
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
Page 15 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Provided, however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Interagency
Transfers derived from Title IV-E shall be carried forward and shall be available for
expenditure.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 6,063,956 $ 7,081,039
Operating Expenses $ 387,448 $ 522,448
Professional Services $ 29,506 $ 29,506
Other Charges $ 636,564 $ 960,526
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 7,117,474 $ 8,593,519
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Department of
Children and Family Services to the
Administrative Program for Title IV-E services $ 500,000
01-106 LOUISIANA TAX COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Property Taxation Regulatory/Oversight -
Authorized Positions (36) (36)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 993,052 $ 965,673
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,513,598 $ 4,607,810
Program Description: Reviews and certifies the parish assessment rolls, and acts as an
appellate body for appeals by assessors, taxpayers, and tax recipient bodies after actions
by parish review boards; provides guidelines for assessment of all classifications of property
and performs and reviews appraisals or assessments, and where necessary, modifies (or
orders reassessment) to ensure uniformity and fairness. Assesses public service property,
as well as valuation of banks and insurance companies, and provides assistance to
assessors.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 5,506,650 $ 5,573,483
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 398,423 $ 803,164
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Tax Commission Expense Dedicated
Fund Account $ 594,629 $ 162,509
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 993,052 $ 965,673
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,720,789 $ 2,446,026
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Tax Commission Expense Dedicated
Fund Account $ 2,792,809 $ 2,161,784
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 4,513,598 $ 4,607,810
Page 16 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 4,213,102 $ 4,285,942
Operating Expenses $ 272,431 $ 272,431
Professional Services $ 315,000 $ 315,000
Other Charges $ 706,117 $ 700,110
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 5,506,650 $ 5,573,483
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Property Taxation Regulatory Oversight Program by reducing the
appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by ($1,063,145), in the event that House
Bill No. 287 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature becomes law.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the Tax
Commission Expense Dedicated Fund Account in
the Property Taxation Regulatory/Oversight Program
in the event that House Bill No. 287 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature
becomes law $ 1,063,145
01-107 DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Executive Administration - Authorized Positions (448) (445)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (5) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 15,328,845 $ 15,462,281
Discretionary Expenditures $ 348,658,930 $ 333,978,461
Program Description: Provides centralized administrative and support services (including
financial, accounting, human resource, fixed asset management, payroll, and training
services) to state agencies and the state as a whole by developing, promoting, and
implementing executive policies and legislative mandates.
Community Development Block Grant -
Authorized Positions (91) (91)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (37) (42)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,846,001 $ 2,984,855
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,203,387,596 $ 1,196,234,752
Program Description: Awards and administers financial assistance in federally designated
eligible areas of the state in order to further develop communities by providing decent
housing and a suitable living environment while expanding economic opportunities
principally for persons of low to moderate income. The Louisiana Government Assistance
Program is designed to fill the gaps where there are no federal or other state funds available
to assist local governments with an identified high priority need.
Auxiliary Account - Authorized Positions (12) (12)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 282,140 $ 269,578
Discretionary Expenditures $ 36,494,457 $ 36,561,750
Account Description: Provides services to other agencies and programs which are
supported through charging of those entities; includes CDBG Revolving Funds, Louisiana
Equipment Acquisitions Fund (LEAF), State Buildings Repairs and Major Maintenance
Fund, State Register, and Cash and Travel Management.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,606,997,969 $ 1,585,491,677
Page 17 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 10,664,459 $ 10,993,491
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,863,035 $ 2,861,805
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 1,788,493 $ 2,008,648
Statutory Dedications:
Granting Unserved Municipalities
Broadband Opportunities Fund $ 0 $ 17,189
Federal Funds $ 3,140,999 $ 2,835,581
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 18,456,986 $ 18,716,714
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 69,435,152 $ 54,561,382
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 75,252,422 $ 77,598,721
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 53,938,915 $ 49,979,348
Statutory Dedications:
Granting Unserved Municipalities
Broadband Opportunities Fund $ 90,000,000 $ 89,482,811
State Emergency Response Fund $ 100,000 $ 100,000
Energy Performance Contract Fund $ 30,000 $ 30,000
Engineering Fees Subfund within the
Water Sector Fund $ 2,500,000 $ 2,500,000
Phase II Subfund of the Water Sector $ 75,000,000 $ 75,000,000
Fund
Emergency Subfund of the Water $ 5,000,000 $ 5,000,000
Sector Fund
Political Subdivision Federal Grant
Assistance Fund $ 1,882,648 $ 9,040,125
Criminal Justice Priority Fund $ 27,000,000 $ 27,000,000
Louisiana Charter School Start-Up
and Expansion Loan Fund $ 218,780 $ 218,780
Modernization and Security Fund $ 10,000,000 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 1,178,183,066 $ 1,176,263,796
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,588,540,983 $ 1,566,774,963
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 64,261,449 $ 70,357,284
Operating Expenses $ 25,988,184 $ 26,676,262
Professional Services $ 1,644,220 $ 1,887,061
Other Charges $ 1,514,814,157 $ 1,486,070,775
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 289,959 $ 500,295
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,606,997,969 $ 1,585,491,677
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated above for the Auxiliary Account
appropriation shall be allocated as follows:
State Register $ 600,762 $ 615,007
LEAF $ 30,000,000 $ 30,000,000
Cash Management $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Travel Management $ 1,515,763 $ 1,556,249
State Building and Grounds Major Repairs $ 716,148 $ 716,148
Construction Litigation $ 1,013,058 $ 1,013,058
Page 18 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
State Uniform Payroll Account $ 22,000 $ 22,000
Disaster CDBG Economic Development
Revolving Loan Fund $ 2,708,866 $ 2,708,866
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Community Development Block Grant
Program for the Blue Tarp Program $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Executive Administration Program for
repairs and upgrades of aircraft and associated
costs $ 312,189
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Executive
Administration Program for aircraft services,
including four (4) authorized positions $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Charter School Start-Up and Expansion Loan
Fund to the Executive Administration Program
for the charter school loan program $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Executive Administration Program for the
Office of Louisiana Highway Construction
for rural road preservation and rehabilitation
of local or parish-maintained public roads in
DeSoto Parish $ 5,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Executive Administration Program for
the Office of Louisiana Highway Construction
for Claiborne Road in Ouachita Parish between
Highway 151 and Highway 80 $ 2,300,000
01-109 COASTAL PROTECTION & RESTORATION AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Implementation - Authorized Positions (186) (186)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,679,679 $ 4,470,613
Discretionary Expenditures $ 212,274,971 $ 142,810,046
Program Description: The Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority Board is
comprised of agency heads from numerous state offices and regional representatives. It is
designed to be the public venue to develop and approve coastal policies and budgets focused
on hurricane protection and coastal restoration efforts. The board was established to
achieve integrated coastal protection for Louisiana through the articulation of a clear
statement of priorities, policies and funding. The Coastal Protection and Restoration
Authority (CPRA) is working closely with other entities on coastal issues, including the state
legislature, the Governor’s Advisory Commission on Coastal Protection, Restoration and
Conservation, and the Division of Administration’s Disaster Recovery Unit within the Office
of Community Development. Through the Implementation Program, CPRA will develop,
implement and enforce the coastal protection and restoration Master Plan, which will lead
Page 19 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
to a safe and sustainable coast that will protect communities, the nation’s critical energy
infrastructure, and Louisiana’s natural resources.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 216,954,650 $ 147,280,659
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 0 $ 30,536
Statutory Dedications:
Natural Resource Restoration Trust Fund $ 469,331 $ 469,331
Coastal Protection and Restoration Fund $ 3,112,139 $ 2,953,486
Federal Funds $ 1,098,209 $ 1,017,260
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,679,679 $ 4,470,613
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,219,700 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 10,114,970 $ 6,048,044
Statutory Dedications:
Natural Resource Restoration Trust Fund $ 40,606,898 $ 33,176,040
Coastal Protection and Restoration Fund $ 92,214,299 $ 55,403,580
Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure Fund $ 10,000,000 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 58,119,104 $ 48,182,382
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 212,274,971 $ 142,810,046
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 24,811,338 $ 25,119,134
Operating Expenses $ 2,315,268 $ 2,172,976
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 189,188,719 $ 119,785,660
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 639,325 $ 202,889
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 216,954,650 $ 147,280,659
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Implementation Program for the Amite River
Basin Drainage and Water Conservation District
for operating expenses $ 1,000,000
01-112 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Military Affairs - Authorized Positions (443) (443)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (1) (1)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,805,176 $ 6,899,963
Discretionary Expenditures $ 90,681,721 $ 78,910,186
Program Description: The Military Affairs Program was created to reinforce the Armed
Forces of the United States and to be available for the security and emergency needs of the
State of Louisiana. The program provides organized, trained and equipped units to execute
assigned state and federal missions.
Page 20 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness -
Authorized Positions (120) (119)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (210) (210)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 6,767,261 $ 6,846,478
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,970,652,191 $ 2,742,068,548
Program Description: Responsibilities include assisting state and local governments to
prepare for, respond to, and recover from natural and manmade disasters by coordinating
activities between local governments, state, and federal entities; serving as the state’s
emergency operations center during emergencies; and provides resources and training
relating to homeland security and emergency preparedness. Serves as the grant
administrator for all FEMA and homeland security funds disbursed within of the state.
Education - Authorized Positions (406) (393)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,803,426 $ 4,592,901
Discretionary Expenditures $ 38,505,680 $ 36,257,354
Program Description: The mission of the Education Program in the Department of
Military Affairs is to provide alternative education opportunities for selected at-risk youth
through the Youth Challenge (Camp Beauregard, the Gillis W. Long Center, and Camp
Minden), Starbase Programs (Camp Beauregard, Jackson Barracks, and Iberville Parish),
and Job Challenge (Gillis W. Long Center).
Auxiliary Account - Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 20,130
Discretionary Expenditures $ 885,302 $ 861,787
Account Description: Provides essential quality of life services to Military Members, Youth
Challenge and Job Challenge students, employees and tenants of our installations.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 3,120,100,757 $ 2,876,457,347
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 9,202,660 $ 8,145,933
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 147,155 $ 164,821
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 400,319 $ 386,797
Federal Funds $ 9,625,729 $ 9,661,921
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 19,375,863 $ 18,359,472
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 141,312,953 $ 132,193,888
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 7,801,523 $ 4,048,638
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 9,065,244 $ 6,326,057
Statutory Dedications:
Camp Minden Fire Protection Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Modernization and Security Fund $ 3,536,760 $ 0
Disability-Focused Disaster Preparedness
and Response Fund $ 500,000 $ 500,000
Page 21 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
State Emergency Response Fund $ 1,180,412 $ 1,000,000
Water Sector Fund $ 414,544,502 $ 200,000,000
Federal Funds $ 2,522,733,500 $ 2,513,979,292
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 3,100,724,894 $ 2,858,097,875
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 86,533,519 $ 90,119,210
Operating Expenses $ 39,685,895 $ 36,580,780
Professional Services $ 6,348,030 $ 5,744,817
Other Charges $ 2,975,259,884 $ 2,739,443,695
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 12,273,429 $ 4,568,845
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 3,120,100,757 $ 2,876,457,347
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the State
Emergency Response Fund to the Governor's
Office of Homeland Security and Emergency
Preparedness Program for Federal Emergency
Management Agency close out costs for
Hurricane Katrina $ 23,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness
Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by
($8,996,813) and by reducing the number of authorized positions by twelve (12), in the event
that House Bill No. 821 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature becomes
law.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness Program for
equipment for drones and security upgrades
for the Tulane University Office of Public
Safety $ 560,800
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Military
Affairs Program for a business management
operations manager, including one (1)
authorized position $ 96,039
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Military
Affairs Program for a facility manager, including
one (1) authorized position $ 105,216
Payable out of Federal Funds to the Military
Affairs Program for a training support system
analyst, including one (1) authorized position $ 89,228
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the State
Emergency Response Fund to the Governor's
Office of Homeland Security and Emergency
Preparedness Program for Hurricane Katrina
closeout costs $ 13,030,500
Page 22 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
01-116 OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of the State Public Defender -
Authorized Positions (17) (17)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 403,849 $ 385,217
Discretionary Expenditures $ 53,631,860 $ 48,570,384
Program Description: The goals of the Office of the State Public Defender are to improve
the criminal justice system and the quality of criminal defense services provided to
individuals through a community-based delivery system; ensure equal justice for all citizens
without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, political affiliation or
disability; guarantee the respect for personal rights of individuals charged with criminal or
delinquent acts; and uphold the highest ethical standards of the legal profession. In
addition, the Office of the State Public Defender provides legal representation to all indigent
parents in Child In Need of Care (CINC) cases statewide.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 54,035,709 $ 48,955,601
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Public Defender Fund $ 403,849 $ 385,217
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 403,849 $ 385,217
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,000,000 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,574,999 $ 1,574,999
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Public Defender Fund $ 46,717,371 $ 46,776,810
Overcollections Fund $ 4,160,105 $ 0
DNA Testing Post-Conviction Relief
for Indigents Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Federal Funds $ 129,385 $ 168,575
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 53,631,860 $ 48,570,384
Provided, however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Interagency
Transfers derived from Title IV-E shall be carried forward and shall be available for
expenditure.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 2,349,408 $ 2,375,823
Operating Expenses $ 416,158 $ 416,158
Professional Services $ 401,604 $ 401,604
Other Charges $ 50,861,939 $ 45,755,416
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 6,600 $ 6,600
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 54,035,709 $ 48,955,601
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Overcollections
Fund to the Office of the State Public Defender
Program for contract costs associated with
post-conviction relief $ 2,491,105
Page 23 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
01-124 LOUISIANA STADIUM AND EXPOSITION DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 29,995,726 $ 29,995,726
Discretionary Expenditures $ 96,362,309 $ 98,646,839
Program Description: Provides for the operations of the Caesars Superdome and the
Smoothie King Center.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 126,358,035 $ 128,642,565
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 29,395,726 $ 29,395,726
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Stadium and Exposition
District License Plate Dedicated
Fund Account $ 600,000 $ 600,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 29,995,726 $ 29,995,726
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 75,346,309 $ 77,589,339
Statutory Dedications:
New Orleans Sports Franchise Fund $ 12,000,000 $ 12,240,000
New Orleans Sports Franchise
Assistance Fund $ 2,766,000 $ 2,467,500
Sports Facility Assistance Fund $ 6,250,000 $ 6,350,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 96,362,309 $ 98,646,839
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 37,183,018 $ 38,307,147
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 89,175,017 $ 90,335,418
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 126,358,035 $ 128,642,565
01-129 LOUISIANA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND THE
ADMINISTRATION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Federal Program - Authorized Positions (25) (25)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 740,856 $ 768,102
Discretionary Expenditures $ 40,780,343 $ 40,856,414
Program Description: Advances the overall agency mission through the effective
administration of federal formula and discretionary grant programs as may be authorized
by Congress to support the development, coordination, and when appropriate,
implementation of broad system-wide programs, and by assisting in the improvement of the
state's criminal justice community through the funding of innovative, essential, and needed
initiatives at the state and local level.
Page 24 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
State Program -
Authorized Positions (18) (18)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 9,318,865 $ 9,403,092
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,575,937 $ 14,338,792
Program Description: Advances the overall agency mission through the effective
administration of state programs as authorized, to assist in the improvement of the state's
criminal justice community through the funding of innovative, essential, and needed criminal
justice initiatives at the state and local levels. Also provides leadership and coordination
of multi-agency efforts in those areas directly relating to the overall agency mission.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 66,416,001 $ 65,366,400
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 369,293 $ 351,666
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 47,860 $ 44,051
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Drug Abuse Education and Treatment
Dedicated Fund Account $ 363,863 $ 363,863
Statutory Dedications:
Crime Victims Reparation Fund $ 5,605,788 $ 5,605,788
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 1,565,801 $ 1,721,051
Innocence Compensation Fund $ 1,480,000 $ 1,480,000
Federal Funds $ 627,116 $ 604,775
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 10,059,721 $ 10,171,194
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 6,641,833 $ 5,487,558
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,560,701 $ 4,564,510
Statutory Dedications:
Criminal Justice Priority Fund $ 5,000,000 $ 5,000,000
Federal Funds $ 40,153,746 $ 40,143,138
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 56,356,280 $ 55,195,206
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 4,910,337 $ 5,042,784
Operating Expenses $ 829,591 $ 732,282
Professional Services $ 3,195,617 $ 3,162,698
Other Charges $ 57,480,456 $ 56,428,636
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 66,416,001 $ 65,366,400
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the State Program for the Louisiana Center
for Safe Schools, including twelve (12)
authorized positions, in the event that House
Bill No. 821 of the 2026 Regular Session
of the Louisiana Legislature becomes law $ 8,996,813
Page 25 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the State Program for office space and vehicle
purchases for authorized positions, in the event that
House Bill No. 821 of the Regular Session of the
Louisiana Legislature becomes law $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal Justice
and First Responder Fund to the State Program for
enhancements to the criminal justice integrated data
management system $ 2,465,108
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the State Program for the Crime Victim
Reparations program for sexual assault centers that
provide direct services, health care services, and
advocacy programs for victims of sexually-oriented
criminal offenses $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund
by Statutory Dedications out of the
Crime Victims Reparations Fund to the
State Program for training for sexual
assault nurse examiners, in the event that
House Bill No. 1247 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Louisiana Legislature
becomes law $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the State
Program for Truancy and Assessment Services
Centers $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the State
Program for the acquisition and installation of
exterior master key boxes outside of all public
schools in the event that Senate Bill No. 132 of
the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted into law and House Bill No. 821 of the
2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted into law $ 1,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the State Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General Fund
by Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal Justice Priority Fund by ($5,000,000), in the
event that Senate Bill No. 141 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into
law.
01-133 OFFICE OF ELDERLY AFFAIRS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (84) (84)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,823,353 $ 1,851,890
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,282,190 $ 9,797,165
Program Description: Provides administrative functions including advocacy, planning,
coordination, interagency links, information sharing, and monitoring and evaluation
services.
Page 26 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Title III, Title V, Title VII and NSIP -
Authorized Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 45,743 $ 51,813
Discretionary Expenditures $ 44,621,406 $ 41,150,272
Program Description: Fosters and assists in the development of cooperative agreements
with federal, state, area agencies, organizations and providers of supportive services to
provide a wide range of support services for older Louisianans.
Parish Councils on Aging - Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,495,137 $ 10,629,542
Program Description: Supports local services to the elderly provided by Parish Councils
on Aging by providing funds to supplement other programs, administrative costs, and
expenses not allowed by other funding sources.
Senior Centers - Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 9,400,166 $ 9,229,616
Program Description: Provides facilities where older persons in each parish can receive
support services and participate in activities that foster their independence, enhance their
dignity, and encourage involvement in and with the community.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 74,667,995 $ 72,710,298
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,734,348 $ 1,761,698
Federal Funds $ 134,748 $ 142,005
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,869,096 $ 1,903,703
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 40,226,308 $ 41,398,454
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 12,500 $ 15,000
Federal Funds $ 32,560,091 $ 29,393,141
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 72,798,899 $ 70,806,595
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 8,902,011 $ 9,084,738
Operating Expenses $ 468,738 $ 468,738
Professional Services $ 69,097 $ 69,097
Other Charges $ 65,228,149 $ 63,087,725
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 74,667,995 $ 72,710,298
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for dementia
specialist resources at parish and disability
resource centers $ 824,000
Page 27 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 46:1608 of the funds appropriated
herein from State General Fund (Direct) to the Senior Centers Program, after the amount
appropriated to fully fund the allocation provided for in R.S. 46:1608, the amount distributed
to each parish council on aging for senior centers shall be in the same amounts distributed
in Fiscal Year 2021-2022.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Senior Centers Program for the New
Orleans Council on Aging, Inc. for the
Cutoff Senior Center $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Senior Centers Program for the New
Orleans Council on Aging, Inc. for the
Arthur Monday Senior Center $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Administrative Program for dementia
specialist resources at parish and disability
resource centers $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Senior Centers Program for the Lower
9th Ward Senior Center $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Senior Centers Program for the
Pontchartrain Park Senior Center $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for
the Lafayette Council on Aging $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for
the Lafourche Council on Aging, Inc. $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for
St. Mary Council on Aging, Inc. $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for
the New Orleans Council on Aging $ 300,000
Page 28 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for the
Lafourche Council on Aging $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Parish Councils on Aging Program for the
Pointe Coupee Council on Aging $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Senior Centers Program for supplemental
payments to senior centers $ 300,000
Provided, however, that of the total appropriated herein to the Senior Centers Program, the
amount of $300,000 shall be allocated equally to the following senior centers in Orleans
Parish: Mercy Endeavors Senior Center, Central City Senior Center, 12th Ward Save Our
Community Senior Center, Kinship Center, Treme Community Education Program
(Harmony House), and Carrolton Hollygrove Senior Center.
01-254 LOUISIANA STATE RACING COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana State Racing Commission -
Authorized Positions (89) (85)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,033,056 $ 961,612
Discretionary Expenditures $ 18,405,149 $ 17,277,796
Program Description: Supervises, regulates, and enforces all statutes concerning horse
racing and pari-mutuel wagering for live horse racing on-track, off-track, and by simulcast;
to collect and record all taxes due to the State of Louisiana; to safeguard the assets of the
LSRC, and to perform administrative and regulatory requirements by operating the LSRC
activities including payment of expenses, making decisions, and creating regulations with
mandatory compliance.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 19,438,205 $ 18,239,408
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 412,608 $ 378,994
Statutory Dedications:
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 620,448 $ 582,618
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,033,056 $ 961,612
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 6,936,310 $ 5,771,127
Statutory Dedications:
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 5,578,035 $ 5,615,865
Sports Wagering Purse Supplement
Fund $ 1,800,000 $ 1,800,000
Video Draw Poker Device Purse
Supplement Fund $ 4,090,804 $ 4,090,804
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 18,405,149 $ 17,277,796
Page 29 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 6,331,564 $ 6,603,991
Operating Expenses $ 747,238 $ 759,738
Professional Services $ 454,464 $ 454,464
Other Charges $ 11,810,629 $ 10,378,715
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 94,310 $ 42,500
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 19,438,205 $ 18,239,408
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Louisiana State Racing Commission Program
for agency operations $ 4,798,765
Provided, however, that of the monies appropriated herein, the amount of $2,000,000 shall
be allocated to the Louisiana Horsemen's Benevolent and Protective Association for
initiatives.
01-255 OFFICE OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of Financial Institutions -
Authorized Positions (106) (106)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,091,574 $ 13,069,094
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,436,436 $ 2,835,533
Program Description: Licenses, charters, supervises and examines state-chartered
depository financial institutions and certain financial service providers, including retail
sales finance businesses, mortgage lenders, and consumer and mortgage loan brokers. Also
licenses and oversees securities activities in Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 15,528,010 $ 15,904,627
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 3,091,574 $ 2,835,533
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 3,091,574 $ 2,835,533
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 12,436,436 $ 13,069,094
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 12,436,436 $ 13,069,094
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 13,130,419 $ 13,136,217
Operating Expenses $ 1,280,458 $ 1,343,137
Professional Services $ 55,000 $ 55,000
Other Charges $ 1,056,945 $ 1,333,273
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 5,188 $ 37,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 15,528,010 $ 15,904,627
Page 30 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 03
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
03-130 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (20) (20)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,008,314 $ 1,020,033
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,332,764 $ 5,786,271
Program Description: Provides administrative oversight, support personnel, assistance
and training necessary to efficiently operate all service programs of the department,
including management and nursing compliance oversight for the Louisiana Veterans Home,
Northeast Louisiana Veterans Home, Southwest Louisiana Veterans Home, Northwest
Louisiana Veterans Home, and Southeast Louisiana Veterans Home, as well as the
Northwest Louisiana Veterans Cemetery, Central Louisiana Veterans Cemetery, Southeast
Louisiana Veterans Cemetery, Northeast Louisiana Veterans Cemetery, Southwest Louisiana
Veterans Cemetery, and additional programs including the following: Veterans parish
service and claims offices which help veterans and their dependents statewide access all
earned state and federal benefits; State Approval Agency which approves more than 240
educational and training institutions for federal GI bill tuition assistance pursuant to Title
38 USC; LaVetCorps program staffing 30 college and university campus student veteran
centers with LDVA-trained AmeriCorps service members, offering student veterans
assistance transitioning home from active duty to higher education; Title 29 state tuition
assistance program pursuant to R.S. 29:36.1, 29:288-290; Louisiana Honor Medals
Program, recognizing service of all Louisiana veterans; and Louisiana Military Family
Assistance Fund, offering donation-funded need-based grants and Louisiana National Guard
deployment assistance pursuant to R.S. 46:121-123.
Appeals - Authorized Positions (7) (7)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 95,259 $ 96,333
Discretionary Expenditures $ 508,377 $ 541,458
Program Description: Assists veterans and/or their dependents to receive any and all
benefits to which they are entitled under federal law.
Contact Assistance -
Authorized Positions (63) (63)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 656,516 $ 689,870
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,873,402 $ 8,599,322
Program Description: Informs veterans and/or their dependents of federal and state
benefits to which they are entitled, and assists in applying for and securing these benefits;
and operates offices throughout the state.
State Approval Agency -
Authorized Positions (4) (5)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 63,265 $ 59,949
Discretionary Expenditures $ 428,278 $ 576,252
Program Description: Conducts inspections and provides technical assistance to programs
of education pursued by veterans and other eligible persons under statute. The program
also works to ensure that programs of education, job training, and flight schools are
approved in accordance with Title 38, relative to plan of operation and veteran's
administration contract.
State Veterans Cemetery - Authorized Positions (32) (32)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 359,115 $ 341,877
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,351,860 $ 3,309,641
Page 31 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: State Veterans Cemetery consists of the Northwest Louisiana State
Veterans Cemetery in Keithville, Louisiana, the Central Louisiana State Veterans Cemetery
in Leesville, Louisiana, the Southeast Louisiana Veterans Cemetery in Slidell, Louisiana, the
Northeast Louisiana Veterans Cemetery in Rayville, Louisiana and the Southwest Louisiana
Veterans Cemetery in Jennings, Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 19,677,150 $ 21,021,006
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,579,715 $ 1,631,138
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 158,633 $ 173,689
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 229,142 $ 200,381
Federal Funds $ 214,979 $ 202,854
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,182,469 $ 2,208,062
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 13,099,570 $ 14,165,760
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,636,031 $ 1,744,242
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,280,952 $ 1,293,807
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Military Family Assistance Fund $ 215,528 $ 215,528
Federal Funds $ 1,262,600 $ 1,393,607
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 17,494,681 $ 18,812,944
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 10,769,472 $ 11,776,443
Operating Expenses $ 1,052,808 $ 1,210,553
Professional Services $ 166,625 $ 157,220
Other Charges $ 7,213,274 $ 7,658,540
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 474,971 $ 218,250
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 19,677,150 $ 21,021,006
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for an Assistant
Secretary position for the Office of Military
Affairs, including one (1) authorized position $ 185,800
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Administrative Program for recruitment,
retention, and return of military service members
to Louisiana $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Contact Assistance Program for Louisiana
National Guard disability claims $ 3,000,000
03-131 LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Veterans Home -
Authorized Positions (122) (120)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,585,750 $ 1,548,418
Discretionary Expenditures $ 13,354,191 $ 13,578,739
Page 32 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: To provide medical and nursing care to eligible Louisiana veterans
in an effort to return the veteran to the highest physical and mental capacity. The veterans
home, located in Jackson, Louisiana, opened in March 1982 to meet the growing long-term
healthcare needs of Louisiana's disabled and homeless veterans.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 14,939,941 $ 15,127,157
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 373,426 $ 583,693
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 274,661 $ 189,464
Federal Funds $ 937,663 $ 775,261
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,585,750 $ 1,548,418
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,644,998 $ 1,711,009
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,247,360 $ 2,492,828
Federal Funds $ 9,461,833 $ 9,374,902
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 13,354,191 $ 13,578,739
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 9,965,483 $ 10,020,724
Operating Expenses $ 2,172,004 $ 2,282,955
Professional Services $ 739,391 $ 801,316
Other Charges $ 1,278,375 $ 1,297,103
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 784,688 $ 725,059
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 14,939,941 $ 15,127,157
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Louisiana Veterans Home Program by reducing the appropriation out of
the State General Fund (Direct) by ($118,389) and Federal Funds by ($31,611).
03-132 NORTHEAST LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Northeast Louisiana Veterans Home -
Authorized Positions (149) (148)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,718,987 $ 1,573,690
Discretionary Expenditures $ 14,775,973 $ 15,240,494
Program Description: To provide medical and nursing care to eligible Louisiana veterans
in an effort to return the veteran to the highest physical and mental capacity. The veteran’s
home, located in Monroe, Louisiana, opened in December 1996 to meet the growing long-
term healthcare needs of Louisiana's disabled and homeless veterans.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 16,494,960 $ 16,814,184
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 288,476 $ 283,786
Federal Funds $ 1,430,511 $ 1,289,904
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,718,987 $ 1,573,690
Page 33 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,111,524 $ 2,116,214
Federal Funds $ 12,664,449 $ 13,124,280
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 14,775,973 $ 15,240,494
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 11,409,483 $ 11,374,094
Operating Expenses $ 2,717,214 $ 2,644,249
Professional Services $ 827,528 $ 965,957
Other Charges $ 1,276,512 $ 1,314,884
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 264,223 $ 515,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 16,494,960 $ 16,814,184
03-134 SOUTHWEST LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Southwest Louisiana Veterans Home -
Authorized Positions (153) (153)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,673,971 $ 1,567,884
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,784,267 $ 16,633,888
Program Description: To provide medical and nursing care to eligible Louisiana veterans
in an effort to return the veteran to the highest physical and mental capacity. The veterans
home, located in Jennings, Louisiana, opened in April 2004 to meet the growing long-term
healthcare needs of Louisiana's disabled and homeless veterans.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 17,458,238 $ 18,201,772
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 311,105 $ 288,725
Federal Funds $ 1,362,866 $ 1,279,159
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,673,971 $ 1,567,884
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 235,068 $ 235,068
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,793,674 $ 2,816,054
Federal Funds $ 12,755,525 $ 13,582,766
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 15,784,267 $ 16,633,888
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 12,546,765 $ 12,975,144
Operating Expenses $ 2,606,944 $ 2,606,944
Professional Services $ 678,902 $ 746,752
Other Charges $ 1,329,564 $ 1,370,654
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 296,063 $ 502,278
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 17,458,238 $ 18,201,772
Page 34 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
03-135 NORTHWEST LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Northwest Louisiana Veterans Home -
Authorized Positions (150) (148)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,542,918 $ 1,479,308
Discretionary Expenditures $ 14,671,643 $ 15,248,813
Program Description: To provide medical and nursing care to eligible Louisiana veterans
in an effort to return the veteran to the highest physical and mental capacity. The veterans
home, located in Bossier City, Louisiana, opened in April 2007 to meet the growing long-
term healthcare needs of Louisiana's disabled and homeless veterans.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 16,214,561 $ 16,728,121
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,871 $ 2,704
Federal Funds $ 1,540,047 $ 1,476,604
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,542,918 $ 1,479,308
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 203,683 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,597,105 $ 2,597,272
Federal Funds $ 11,870,855 $ 12,651,541
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 14,671,643 $ 15,248,813
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 11,344,247 $ 11,926,015
Operating Expenses $ 2,634,818 $ 2,298,882
Professional Services $ 1,086,767 $ 1,129,335
Other Charges $ 1,130,675 $ 1,189,174
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 18,054 $ 184,715
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 16,214,561 $ 16,728,121
03-136 SOUTHEAST LOUISIANA VETERANS HOME
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Southeast Louisiana Veterans Home -
Authorized Positions (151) (149)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,621,733 $ 1,573,442
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,679,404 $ 15,689,794
Program Description: To provide medical and nursing care to eligible Louisiana veterans
in an effort to return the veteran to the highest physical and mental capacity. The veterans
home, located in Reserve, Louisiana, opened in June 2007 to meet the growing long-term
healthcare needs of Louisiana's disabled and homeless veterans.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 17,301,137 $ 17,263,236
Page 35 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 48,098 $ 44,071
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 30,517 $ 27,962
Federal Funds $ 1,543,118 $ 1,501,409
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,621,733 $ 1,573,442
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 435,408 $ 439,435
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,900,896 $ 2,903,451
Federal Funds $ 12,343,100 $ 12,346,908
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 15,679,404 $ 15,689,794
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 12,547,156 $ 12,799,600
Operating Expenses $ 2,150,882 $ 2,150,882
Professional Services $ 751,827 $ 817,975
Other Charges $ 1,163,078 $ 1,156,779
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 688,194 $ 338,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 17,301,137 $ 17,263,236
SCHEDULE 04
ELECTED OFFICIALS
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
04-139 SECRETARY OF STATE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (85) (85)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,977,114 $ 2,988,464
Discretionary Expenditures $ 17,085,358 $ 15,603,562
Program Description: Assists the Secretary of State in carrying out the duties of the office
by providing the legal, financial, and management control services for the department and
its various programs. Keeps the Great Seal, attests to the Governor's signatures on
Executive Orders and pardons, issues commissions for elected and appointed officials in the
State; records and maintains information relative to individual wills, and produces various
publications as required by Louisiana Law.
Elections - Authorized Positions (151) (151)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 45,565,806 $ 51,292,603
Discretionary Expenditures $ 49,311,995 $ 35,306,362
Program Description: Ensures the integrity of the electoral and election management
process in Louisiana for its voters, citizens, and other interested parties in Louisiana and
the United States, and in general, encourages public participation in the election process
by educating current and potential voters about the elections process through effective
outreach programs.
Page 36 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Archives and Records -
Authorized Positions (38) (38)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 519,050 $ 502,614
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,227,447 $ 5,131,227
Program Description: Ensures the government and the public continued access to essential
information created by the State through a viable and responsive records management
program and a comprehensive preservation effort, and makes the archival materials
acquired and maintained by the program readily available for researchers and for
educational programs.
Museum and Other Operations -
Authorized Positions (38) (38)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 456,139 $ 437,549
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,615,923 $ 6,273,005
Program Description: Presents exhibits, education, and other programs to the public that
emphasize the political, social and economic influences, personalities, institutions, and
events that have shaped the landscape of Louisiana's colorful history and culture and its
place in the world. To further this mission, the Museums Program acquires, refurbishes,
and preserves artifacts and other historical relics representative of this past and attracts
exhibits of interest to the communities they serve.
Commercial -
Authorized Positions (55) (55)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 783,540 $ 754,314
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,674,914 $ 10,390,872
Program Description: Provides for business, financial, and legal communities timely and
efficient service in the certification and registration of documents relating to securing and
retaining business entities and assets; processes legal services documents and
communications of business licensing information as required by law and makes such
information concerning these business entities available to the public.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 137,217,286 $ 128,680,572
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 46,021,945 $ 51,730,152
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 4,279,704 $ 4,245,392
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 50,301,649 $ 55,975,544
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 51,719,598 $ 37,454,209
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,067,400 $ 845,300
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 33,558,072 $ 33,834,952
Statutory Dedications:
Shreveport Riverfront and Convention
Center and Independence Stadium Fund $ 113,078 $ 113,078
Federal Funds $ 457,489 $ 457,489
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 86,915,637 $ 72,705,028
Page 37 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 37,886,365 $ 39,308,727
Operating Expenses $ 17,387,098 $ 22,205,732
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 68,000,148 $ 64,557,305
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 13,943,675 $ 2,608,808
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 137,217,286 $ 128,680,572
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Elections Program for election expenses,
in the event that Senate Bill No. 49 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into
law and any one of the following bills of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is enrolled
for submission for the electors of the State of
Louisiana at a statewide election: Senate Bill No.
68; Senate Bill No. 97; and Senate Bill No. 123 $ 2,714,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Elections Program for the nursing home
early voting program, in the event that House Bill
No. 551 of the 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is enacted into law $ 38,400
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Elections Program for increases in
compensation for the registrars of voters, chief
deputies, and confidential assistants, in the event
that Senate Bill No. 25 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Legislature is enacted into
law $ 496,168
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Elections Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund (Direct) by ($5,428,000), in the event that Senate Bill No. 49 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Administrative Program for personnel, including
eight (8) authorized positions $ 1,124,341
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Archives Program for personnel, including one
(1) authorized position $ 92,041
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Museum Program for personnel, including
three (3) authorized positions $ 289,115
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to increase the table
of organization for the Commercial Program by one (1) authorized position.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for a
professional services contract $ 1,500,000
Page 38 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Museums and Other Operations Program
for roof repairs at the Cotton Museum exhibit
hall $ 125,000
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
04-141 OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (63) (83)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,282,313 $ 2,147,506
Discretionary Expenditures $ 6,383,574 $ 6,592,745
Program Description: Includes the Executive Office of the Attorney General and the first
assistant attorney general; provides leadership, policy development, and administrative
services including management and finance functions, coordination of departmental
planning, professional services contracts, mail distribution, human resource management
and payroll, employee training and development, property control and telecommunications,
information technology, and internal/ external communications.
Civil Law - Authorized Positions (82) (85)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,818,291 $ 2,851,207
Discretionary Expenditures $ 35,040,379 $ 34,130,442
Program Description: Provides legal services (opinions, counsel, and representation) in
the areas of public finance and contract law, education law, land and natural resource law,
collection law, consumer protection/environmental law, auto fraud law, and insurance
receivership law.
Criminal Law and Medicaid Fraud -
Authorized Positions (168) (191)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (1) (1)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,983,099 $ 4,001,679
Discretionary Expenditures $ 37,681,808 $ 37,005,266
Program Description: Conducts or assists in criminal prosecutions; acts as advisor for
district attorneys, legislature and law enforcement entities; provides legal services in the
areas of extradition, appeals and habeas corpus proceedings; prepares attorney general
opinions concerning criminal law; operates White Collar Crimes Section, Violent Crime and
Drug Unit, and Insurance Fraud Unit; investigates and prosecutes individuals and entities
defrauding the Medicaid Program or abusing residents in health care facilities and initiates
recovery of identified overpayments; and provides investigation services for the department.
Risk Litigation - Authorized Positions (172) (172)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,329,443 $ 4,456,587
Discretionary Expenditures $ 18,252,543 $ 19,458,888
Program Description: Provides legal representation for the Office of Risk Management,
the Self-Insurance Fund, the State of Louisiana and its departments, agencies, boards and
commissions and their officers, officials, employees and agents in all claims covered by the
Self-Insurance Fund, and all tort claims whether or not covered by the Self-Insurance Fund.
The Division has six regional offices (in Alexandria, Lafayette, New Orleans, Shreveport,
Monroe, and Lake Charles) that handle litigation filed in the geographical areas covered
by the regional offices.
Gaming - Authorized Positions (54) (54)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,387,129 $ 1,389,676
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,300,275 $ 6,238,797
Page 39 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Serves as legal advisor to gaming regulatory agencies (Louisiana
Gaming Control Board, Office of State Police, Department of Revenue, Louisiana State
Racing Commission, and Louisiana Lottery Corporation) and represents them in legal
proceedings.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 117,458,854 $ 118,272,793
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,156,954 $ 4,304,817
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior and
Current Year Collections $ 4,585,795 $ 4,700,507
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collection $ 323,216 $ 302,757
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Insurance Fraud Investigation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 218,399 $ 54,719
Sex Offender Registry Technology
Dedicated Fund Account $ 218,399 $ 54,719
Statutory Dedications:
Department of Justice Debt
Collection Fund $ 1,676,282 $ 1,877,335
Department of Justice Legal
Support Fund $ 880,511 $ 895,335
Department of Justice Occupational
Licensing Review Program Fund $ 35,238 $ 33,577
Tobacco Settlement Enforcement Fund $ 35,238 $ 33,577
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 133,325 $ 133,261
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 399,978 $ 399,785
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 733,292 $ 732,938
Sports Wagering Enforcement Fund $ 66,663 $ 66,631
Federal Funds $ 1,336,985 $ 1,256,697
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 14,800,275 $ 14,846,655
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 18,865,061 $ 20,254,940
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior and
Current Year Collection $ 21,403,449 $ 22,622,226
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collection $ 15,028,717 $ 11,248,149
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Insurance Fraud Investigation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 729,372 $ 886,652
Sex Offender Registry Technology
Dedicated Fund Account $ 730,090 $ 814,770
Statutory Dedications:
Department of Justice Debt
Collection Fund $ 4,373,527 $ 5,293,582
Department of Justice Legal
Support Fund $ 10,144,471 $ 9,164,879
Page 40 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Department of Justice Occupational
Licensing Review Program Fund $ 497,355 $ 486,686
Tobacco Control Special Fund $ 15,000 $ 15,000
Tobacco Settlement Enforcement Fund $ 364,762 $ 366,423
Louisiana Fund $ 2,171,155 $ 2,176,505
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 511,333 $ 600,221
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 1,532,765 $ 1,825,430
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 2,735,870 $ 3,143,529
Sports Wagering Enforcement Fund $ 91,703 $ 244,203
Criminal Justice and First Responder Fund $ 13,875,000 $ 12,000,000
Medical Assistance Programs Fraud
Detection Fund $ 1,400,000 $ 3,760,990
Federal Funds $ 8,188,949 $ 8,521,953
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 102,658,579 $ 103,426,138
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 66,005,850 $ 68,437,138
Operating Expenses $ 7,192,484 $ 7,674,024
Professional Services $ 18,074,170 $ 13,843,279
Other Charges $ 24,363,134 $ 24,835,525
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,823,216 $ 2,981,185
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 117,458,854 $ 117,771,151
EXPENDITURES:
Gaming Program for salaries and related benefits $ 138,888
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 138,888
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Sports Wagering Enforcement Fund $ 99,747
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility Gaming
Control Fund $ 39,141
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 138,888
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Civil Law Program for the statewide
coordination of sexual assault nurse examiners,
including two (2) authorized positions $ 405,428
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Department
of Justice Legal Support Fund to the
Administrative Program for operating
expenses $ 5,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Department
of Justice Legal Support Fund to the Criminal
Law and Medicaid Fraud Program $ 4,939,786
Page 41 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Criminal Law and Medicaid Fraud Program for
the Criminal Division for one-time expenses $ 4,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the
Sex Offender Registry Technology Dedicated
Fund Account to the Criminal Law and Medicaid
Fraud Program for payments to parish sheriffs $ 79,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice Technology Innovation Fund to the
Criminal Law and Medicaid Fraud Program
for disbursement to district attorney offices
for the purpose of leveraging technology to
collaborate with other entities and facilitate
interagency communication regarding care
and protection of youth $ 3,000,000
OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
04-146 LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative Program -
Authorized Positions (7) (7)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 594,261 $ 582,401
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,900,036 $ 1,577,209
Program Description: The mission of the Administrative program is to participate in
executive department activities designed to prepare the Lieutenant Governor to serve as
Governor; to serve as Commissioner of Department of Culture, Recreation, and Tourism;
and to develop and implement a retirement program which will result in retaining and
attracting retirees in Louisiana.
Grants Program -
Authorized Other Charges Positions (8) (8)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 171,877 $ 122,082
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,270,852 $ 6,572,039
Program Description: The mission of the Grants program is to build and foster the
sustainability of high quality programs that meet the needs of Louisiana’s citizens, to
promote an ethic of service, and to encourage service as a means of community and state
problem solving through the Volunteer Louisiana Commission.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 12,937,026 $ 8,853,731
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 477,634 $ 478,450
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 150,654 $ 144,162
Federal Funds $ 137,850 $ 81,871
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 766,138 $ 704,483
Page 42 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE: (DISCRETIONARY)
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,218,548 $ 877,166
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 945,096 $ 951,588
Federal Funds $ 8,007,244 $ 6,320,494
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 12,170,888 $ 8,149,248
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,702,174 $ 1,661,824
Operating Expenses $ 70,428 $ 70,428
Professional Services $ 7,404 $ 7,404
Other Charges $ 11,157,020 $ 7,114,075
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 12,937,026 $ 8,853,731
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program $ 1,600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Grants Program for Volunteer
Louisiana $ 100,000
DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY
04-147 STATE TREASURER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative - Authorized Positions (43) (43)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,133,775 $ 1,119,518
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,683,841 $ 6,097,970
Program Description: Provides the leadership, support, and oversight necessary to be
responsible for managing, directing, and ensuring the effective and efficient operation of the
programs within the Department of the Treasury to the benefit of the public’s interest.
Financial Accountability and Control -
Authorized Positions (17) (17)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 428,613 $ 442,808
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,666,772 $ 3,840,815
Program Description: Provides the highest quality accounting and fiscal controls of all
monies deposited in the Treasury and assures that monies on deposit in the Treasury are
disbursed from the Treasury in accordance with constitutional and statutory law for the
benefit of the citizens of the State of Louisiana and provides for the internal management
and finance functions of the Treasury.
Debt Management -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 243,019 $ 265,456
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,390,154 $ 1,515,070
Program Description: Provides staff to assist the State Bond Commission in carrying out
its constitutional and statutory mandates.
Page 43 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Investment Management -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 148,347 $ 172,824
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,533,655 $ 1,582,610
Program Description: Invests state funds deposited in the State Treasury in a prudent
manner consistent with the cash needs of the state, the directives of the Louisiana
Constitution and statutes, and within the guidelines and requirements of the various funds
under management.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 14,228,176 $ 15,037,071
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 11,591 $ 10,736
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 107,366 $ 96,873
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections per
R.S. 39:1405.1 and per R.S. 49:321.1 $ 1,749,918 $ 1,814,453
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund $ 43,001 $ 36,666
Education Excellence Fund $ 10,939 $ 10,939
Health Excellence Fund $ 10,939 $ 10,939
TOPS Fund $ 10,939 $ 10,939
Medicaid Trust Fund for the Elderly $ 1,881 $ 1,881
Megaprojects Leverage Fund $ 3,830 $ 3,830
Louisiana Unclaimed Property
Permanent Trust Fund $ 3,350 $ 3,350
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,953,754 $ 2,000,606
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 193,669 $ 194,524
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,613,292 $ 1,644,336
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections per
R.S. 39:1405.1 and per R.S. 49:321.1 $ 9,665,885 $ 10,389,694
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund $ 406,092 $ 412,427
Education Excellence Fund $ 103,301 $ 103,301
Health Excellence Fund $ 103,303 $ 103,303
TOPS Fund $ 103,301 $ 103,301
Medicaid Trust Fund for the Elderly $ 17,759 $ 17,759
Megaprojects Leverage Fund $ 36,170 $ 36,170
Louisiana Unclaimed Property
Permanent Trust Fund $ 31,650 $ 31,650
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 12,274,422 $ 13,036,465
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 8,924,789 $ 9,585,932
Operating Expenses $ 1,873,756 $ 1,873,756
Professional Services $ 178,911 $ 178,911
Other Charges $ 3,153,005 $ 3,300,757
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 97,715 $ 97,715
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 14,228,176 $ 15,037,071
Page 44 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE
04-158 PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative -
Authorized Positions (31) (31)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 932,605 $ 979,319
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,365,718 $ 3,648,955
Program Description: Provides support to all programs of the Commission through policy
development, communications, and dissemination of information. Provides technical and
legal support to all programs to ensure that all cases are processed through the Commission
in a timely manner. Seeks to ensure that Do Not Call consumer problems, issues, and
complaints are sufficiently monitored and addressed efficiently.
Support Services -
Authorized Positions (21) (21)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 577,004 $ 618,616
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,910,899 $ 2,081,314
Program Description: Reviews, analyzes, and investigates rates and charges filed before
the Commission with respect to prudence and adequacy of those rates; manages the process
of adjudicatory proceedings, conducts evidentiary hearings, and makes rules and
recommendations to the Commissioners which are just, impartial, professional, orderly,
efficient, and which generate the highest degree of public confidence in the Commission's
integrity and fairness.
Motor Carrier Registration -
Authorized Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 156,839 $ 154,625
Discretionary Expenditures $ 517,195 $ 489,106
Program Description: Provides fair and impartial regulations of intrastate common and
contract carriers offering services for hire, is responsible for the regulation of the financial
responsibility and lawfulness of interstate motor carriers operating into or through
Louisiana in interstate commerce, and provides fair and equal treatment in the application
and enforcement of motor carrier laws.
District Offices -
Authorized Positions (37) (37)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 807,073 $ 817,307
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,685,503 $ 2,686,097
Program Description: Provides accessibility and information to the public through district
offices and satellite offices located in each of the five Public Service Commission districts.
District offices handle consumer complaints, hold meetings with consumer groups and
regulated companies, and administer rules, regulations, and state and federal laws at a local
level.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,952,836 $ 11,475,339
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Motor Carrier Regulation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 25,895 $ 26,843
Page 45 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Utility and Carrier Inspection and
Supervision Dedicated Fund Account $ 2,428,598 $ 2,521,400
Telephonic Solicitation Relief Dedicated
Fund Account $ 19,028 $ 21,624
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,473,521 $ 2,569,867
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Motor Carrier Regulation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 201,595 $ 200,647
Utility and Carrier Inspection and
Supervision Dedicated Fund Account $ 8,096,237 $ 8,508,187
Telephonic Solicitation Relief Dedicated
Fund Account $ 181,483 $ 196,638
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 8,479,315 $ 8,905,472
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 9,331,448 $ 9,766,616
Operating Expenses $ 680,846 $ 688,941
Professional Services $ 5,000 $ 5,000
Other Charges $ 833,659 $ 873,457
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 101,883 $ 141,325
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 10,952,836 $ 11,475,339
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY
04-160 AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (111) (112)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,995,925 $ 8,019,216
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,867,552 $ 19,266,600
Program Description: Centrally manages revenue, purchasing, payroll, computer
functions and support services (budget preparation, fiscal, legal, procurement, property
control, human resources, fleet and facility management, distribution of commodities
donated by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA), auditing, management and
information systems, print shop, mail room, document imaging and district office clerical
support, as well as management of the Department of Agriculture and Forestry’s funds).
Agricultural and Environmental Sciences -
Authorized Positions (107) (105)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (2) (2)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,711,969 $ 1,603,712
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,779,268 $ 12,927,974
Program Description: Samples and inspects seeds, fertilizers and pesticides; enforces
quality requirements and guarantees for such materials; assists farmers in their safe and
effective application, including remediation of improper pesticide application; and licenses
and permits horticulture related businesses including the regulation of the production of
medical marijuana.
Page 46 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Animal Health and Food Safety -
Authorized Positions (104) (102)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,791,841 $ 1,647,267
Discretionary Expenditures $ 13,935,898 $ 14,154,951
Program Description: Conducts inspection of meat and meat products, eggs, and fish and
fish products; controls and eradicates infectious diseases of animals and poultry; and
ensures the quality and condition of fresh produce and grain commodities. Also responsible
for the licensing of livestock dealers, the supervision of auction markets, and the control of
livestock theft and nuisance animals.
Agro-Consumer Services -
Authorized Positions (75) (77)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,168,877 $ 1,110,316
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,152,268 $ 8,206,332
Program Description: Regulates weights and measures; licenses weigh masters, scale
companies and technicians; licenses and inspects bonded farm warehouses and milk
processing plants; licenses grain dealers, warehouses and cotton buyers; and provides
regulatory services to ensure consumer protection for Louisiana producers and consumers.
Forestry -
Authorized Positions (181) (179)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,323,767 $ 2,226,048
Discretionary Expenditures $ 26,174,673 $ 19,297,435
Program Description: Promotes sound forest management practices and provides
technical assistance, insect and disease control and law enforcement for the state's forest
lands; conducts fire detection and suppression activities using surveillance aircraft, fire
towers, and fire crews; also provides conservation, education and urban forestry expertise.
Soil and Water Conservation -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 179,097 $ 189,853
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,907,404 $ 2,734,302
Program Description: Oversees a delivery network of local soil and water conservation
districts that provide assistance to land managers in conserving and restoring water quality,
wetlands and soil. Serves as the official state cooperative program with the Natural
Resources Conservation Service of the USDA.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 94,988,539 $ 91,384,006
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 9,428,506 $ 9,383,646
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 732,746 $ 644,199
Statutory Dedications:
Agricultural Commodity Dealers and
Warehouse Fund $ 255,350 $ 249,048
Feed and Fertilizer Fund $ 290,294 $ 277,850
Forestry Productivity Fund $ 38,728 $ 14,728
Horticulture and Quarantine Fund $ 328,330 $ 318,295
Imported Seafood Safety Fund $ 20,696 $ 20,063
Louisiana Agricultural Finance
Authority Fund $ 1,193,585 $ 1,141,433
Pesticide Fund $ 657,793 $ 591,383
Petroleum Products Fund $ 501,523 $ 458,561
Seed Fund $ 186,926 $ 181,213
Structural Pest Control Commission Fund $ 139,939 $ 135,517
Sweet Potato Pest and Diseases Fund $ 24,767 $ 24,010
Page 47 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Weights and Measures Fund $ 462,245 $ 480,840
Wildfire Suppression Subfund $ 155,967 $ 151,801
Federal Funds $ 754,081 $ 723,825
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 15,171,476 $ 14,796,412
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 17,095,596 $ 21,030,216
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 539,035 $ 492,535
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 7,519,997 $ 7,594,141
Statutory Dedications:
Agricultural Commodity Dealers and
Warehouse Fund $ 1,960,241 $ 2,051,118
Feed and Fertilizer Fund $ 2,548,029 $ 2,622,229
Forest Protection Fund $ 996,244 $ 820,000
Forestry Productivity Fund $ 311,272 $ 235,272
Horticulture and Quarantine Fund $ 2,271,670 $ 2,281,705
Imported Seafood Safety Fund $ 219,912 $ 220,545
Livestock Brand Commission Fund $ 25,000 $ 25,000
Louisiana Agricultural Finance
Authority Fund $ 12,697,477 $ 10,659,893
Pesticide Fund $ 5,662,379 $ 5,707,482
Petroleum Products Fund $ 4,807,265 $ 4,002,739
Seed Fund $ 939,387 $ 945,100
Structural Pest Control Commission Fund $ 1,412,092 $ 1,416,514
Sweet Potato Pests and Diseases Fund $ 175,233 $ 175,990
Weights and Measures Fund $ 2,859,444 $ 3,087,440
Wildfire Suppression Subfund $ 819,033 $ 749,878
Federal Funds $ 16,957,757 $ 12,469,797
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 79,817,063 $ 76,587,594
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 63,802,136 $ 65,224,580
Operating Expenses $ 15,213,631 $ 15,101,529
Professional Services $ 1,295,219 $ 1,295,219
Other Charges $ 6,666,085 $ 7,357,493
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 8,011,468 $ 2,405,185
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 94,988,539 $ 91,384,006
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
Hurricane Francine related expenses $ 195,089
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Forestry Program for fireman pay raises $ 5,193,022
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Soil and Water
Conservation Program for the vegetative
planting program for the coastal parishes $ 75,000
Page 48 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE
04-165 COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative/Fiscal Program -
Authorized Positions (73) (77)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,761,444 $ 4,214,514
Discretionary Expenditures $ 13,878,709 $ 44,237,301
Program Description: Provide necessary administrative and operational support to the
entire department, attracts insurers to the state in order to promote a more competitive
market, works to stabilize the property insurance market and provide outreach and
consumer assistance.
Market Compliance Program -
Authorized Positions (159) (154)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,713,241 $ 2,389,700
Discretionary Expenditures $ 46,695,730 $ 22,698,426
Program Description: Regulates the insurance industry in the state (licensing of
producers, insurance adjusters, public adjusters, and insurers) and serves as advocate for
insurance consumers.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 67,049,124 $ 73,539,941
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 5,903,065 $ 5,955,746
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Administrative Dedicated Fund Account
of the Department of Insurance $ 191,047 $ 191,047
Insurance Fraud Investigation
Dedicated Fund Account $ 300,789 $ 300,789
Federal Funds $ 79,784 $ 156,632
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 6,474,685 $ 6,604,214
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 180,000 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 31,050,859 $ 31,895,813
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Administrative Dedicated Fund Account
of the Department of Insurance $ 1,039,320 $ 1,039,320
Insurance Fraud Investigation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 2,584,044 $ 3,357,226
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Fortify Homes Program Fund $ 25,000,000 $ 30,000,000
Federal Funds $ 720,216 $ 643,368
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 60,574,439 $ 66,935,727
Page 49 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 27,155,867 $ 27,848,548
Operating Expenses $ 4,158,658 $ 4,215,735
Professional Services $ 7,995,230 $ 8,725,412
Other Charges $ 27,011,757 $ 32,040,634
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 727,612 $ 709,612
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 67,049,124 $ 73,539,941
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Administrative/Fiscal Program for grant
management for the Louisiana Fortify Homes
Program, including one (1) authorized position $ 85,136
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Administrative/Fiscal Program for one (1)
authorized position $ 175,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the Market
Compliance Program for oversight of
pharmaceutical benefit managers, including six
(6) authorized positions $ 2,200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the
Insurance Fraud Investigation Dedicated Fund
Account to the Market Compliance Program
for one (1) authorized position $ 118,229
SCHEDULE 05
LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURE FORECAST
In accordance with Act 401 of the 2017 Regular Legislative Session, below is the listing of
the incentive expenditure programs based on the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference. This department administers the following incentive expenditure programs:
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURES: AUTHORITY FORECAST
Motion Picture Investor Tax Credit R.S. 47:6007 $ 125,000,000
Digital Interactive Media and Software Act R.S. 47:6022 $ 62,000,000
Research and Development Tax Credit R.S. 47:6015 $ 12,000,000
Louisiana Quality Jobs Program Act R.S. 51:2451 $ 113,501,000
Louisiana Enterprise Zone Act R.S. 51:1781 $ 28,000,000
Retention and Modernization Act R.S. 51:2399.1 -
R.S. 51.2399.6 $ 6,000,000
Industrial Tax Equalization Program R.S. 47:3201 -
R.S. 47:3205 $ 2,367,000
Angel Investor Tax Credit Program R.S. 47:6020 $ 1,420,000
Musical and Theatrical Productions Income Tax
Credit R.S. 47:6034 $ 5,616,000
Sound Recording Investor Tax Credit R.S. 47:6023 $ 22,000
Exemptions for Manufacturing Establishments R.S. 47:4301 - $ Unable to
R.S. 47:4306 anticipate
Page 50 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
05-250 OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Economic Development Program -
Authorized Positions (213) (214)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,840,976 $ 5,315,764
Discretionary Expenditures $ 129,250,260 $ 54,092,086
Program Description: The mission of the Economic Development Program is to provide
leadership, along with quality administrative and legal services, which sustains and
promotes a globally competitive business climate that retains, creates, and attracts quality
jobs and increased investment for the benefit of the people of Louisiana; support statewide
economic development by providing expertise and incremental resources to leverage
business opportunities; encouragement and assistance in the startup of new businesses;
opportunities for expansion and growth of existing business and industry, including small
business; execution of an aggressive business recruitment program; partnering relationships
with communities for economic growth; expertise in the development and optimization of
global opportunities for trade and inbound investments; cultivation of top regional economic
development assets; protection and growth of the state's military and federal presence;
communication, advertising, and marketing of the state as a premier location to do business;
create value for existing, expanding, and new businesses in Louisiana by providing quality
assistance through marketing and administering tax, financial, and other assistance
products; and business intelligence to support these efforts.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 135,091,236 $ 59,407,850
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,264,248 $ 5,030,761
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from prior
and current year collections $ 436,425 $ 213,294
Federal Funds $ 140,303 $ 71,709
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 5,840,976 $ 5,315,764
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 56,543,433 $ 40,852,040
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 922,500 $ 175,000
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from prior
and current year collections $ 4,740,272 $ 4,894,735
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Entertainment Development
Dedicated Fund Account $ 7,084,178 $ 2,700,000
Statutory Dedications:
Marketing Fund $ 8,412,850 $ 2,000,000
Small Business Innovation Retention Fund $ 521,249 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 51,025,778 $ 3,470,311
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 129,250,260 $ 54,092,086
Page 51 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 27,801,838 $ 28,688,166
Operating Expenses $ 3,223,187 $ 3,173,101
Professional Services $ 17,119,048 $ 7,352,307
Other Charges $ 85,985,810 $ 20,194,276
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 961,353 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 135,091,236 $ 59,407,850
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Economic Development Program for
entrepreneurship training and small business
development $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Economic Development Program to
support regional economic development
activities statewide and to be distributed equally
among the eight regional economic development
organizations as recognized by the department $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Office of the
Secretary, Louisiana Department of Health to
the Economic Development Program for the
Rural Health Innovation Program $ 22,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to
the Economic Development Program for
administration of federal rural innovation
funding $ 2,000,000
SCHEDULE 06
DEPARTMENT OF CULTURE, RECREATION AND TOURISM
The Lieutenant Governor shall have the authority to transfer positions between the
Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism agencies or programs and to increase or
decrease positions and associated funding necessary to effectuate such transfers.
Provided, however, that the department shall submit a letter, which will include the number
of positions and the associated funding, notifying the commissioner of administration within
three (3) business days of any such transfer.
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURE FORECAST
In accordance with Act 401 of the 2017 Regular Legislative Session, below is the listing of
the incentive expenditure programs based on the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast. This department administers the following incentive
expenditure programs:
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURES: AUTHORITY FORECAST
Tax Credit for Rehabilitation of Historic Structures R.S. 47:6019 $ 85,000,000
Page 52 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
06-261 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative Program -
Authorized Positions (16) (18)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 247,040 $ 307,091
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,022,679 $ 6,229,111
Program Description: The mission of the Office of the Secretary is to position Louisiana
to lead through action in defining a New South through Culture, Recreation and Tourism,
through the development and implementation of strategic and integrated approaches to
management of the Office of State Parks, the Office of Tourism, the Office of State Museum,
the Office of Cultural Development, and the Office of State Library of Louisiana.
Management and Finance Program -
Authorized Positions (39) (39)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,207,367 $ 1,229,884
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,684,435 $ 6,104,128
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Management and Finance is to direct
the mandated functions of human resources, fiscal, and information services for the six
offices within the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism and the Office of the
Lieutenant Governor to support them in the accomplishment of their stated goals and
objectives, ensure compliance with legislative mandates, and increase efficiency and
productivity.
Louisiana Seafood Promotion and Marketing Board -
Authorized Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 62,523 $ 53,796
Discretionary Expenditures $ 524,529 $ 535,124
Program Description: The mission of the Louisiana Seafood Promotion and Marketing
Board is to give assistance to the state’s seafood industry through product promotion and
market development in order to enhance the economic well-being of the industry and of the
state, while increasing consumption and value of Louisiana Seafood products.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 22,748,573 $ 14,459,134
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,297,469 $ 1,381,117
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 77,499 $ 77,342
Statutory Dedications:
Litter Abatement Account $ 84,126 $ 83,956
Seafood Promotion and Marketing Fund $ 57,836 $ 48,356
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,516,930 $ 1,590,771
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 18,871,157 $ 10,535,070
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,598,630 $ 1,561,787
Statutory Dedications:
Litter Abatement Account $ 545,874 $ 546,044
Seafood Promotion and Marketing Fund $ 215,982 $ 225,462
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 21,231,643 $ 12,868,363
Page 53 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 6,738,903 $ 7,307,249
Operating Expenses $ 197,711 $ 187,182
Professional Services $ 10,848 $ 10,848
Other Charges $ 15,801,111 $ 6,953,855
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 22,748,573 $ 14,459,134
06-262 OFFICE OF THE STATE LIBRARY OF LOUISIANA
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Library Services -
Authorized Positions (48) (47)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,921,114 $ 1,964,281
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,043,769 $ 7,901,052
Program Description: The mission of the State Library of Louisiana is to foster a culture
of literacy, promote awareness of our state’s rich literary heritage, and ensure public access
to and preserve informational, educational, cultural, and recreational resources, especially
those unique to Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 9,964,883 $ 9,865,333
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,739,842 $ 1,792,664
Federal Funds $ 181,272 $ 171,617
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,921,114 $ 1,964,281
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,800,734 $ 3,661,233
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 821,436 $ 821,436
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 96,990 $ 90,000
Federal Funds $ 3,324,609 $ 3,328,383
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 8,043,769 $ 7,901,052
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 4,923,818 $ 5,099,762
Operating Expenses $ 584,406 $ 556,421
Professional Services $ 6,597 $ 6,597
Other Charges $ 4,351,882 $ 4,202,553
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 98,180 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 9,964,883 $ 9,865,333
06-263 OFFICE OF STATE MUSEUM
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Museum -
Authorized Positions (68) (68)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,732,009 $ 1,706,785
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,703,861 $ 8,764,283
Page 54 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The mission of the Office of State Museum is to maintain the
Louisiana State Museum as a true statewide museum system that is accredited by the
American Alliance of Museums; to collect, preserve, and interpret buildings, documents, and
artifacts that reveal Louisiana’s history and culture and to present those items using both
traditional and innovative technology to educate, enlighten, and provide enjoyment for the
people of Louisiana and its visitors.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,435,870 $ 10,471,068
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,536,847 $ 1,523,431
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 195,162 $ 183,354
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,732,009 $ 1,706,785
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,276,816 $ 5,170,673
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,245,312 $ 1,257,120
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from
Prior and Current Year Collections $ 1,281,733 $ 1,436,490
Federal Funds $ 900,000 $ 900,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 8,703,861 $ 8,764,283
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 6,291,158 $ 6,392,539
Operating Expenses $ 1,405,258 $ 1,498,568
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 2,539,454 $ 2,579,961
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 200,000 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 10,435,870 $ 10,471,068
06-264 OFFICE OF STATE PARKS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Parks and Recreation -
Authorized Positions (308) (307)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,686,932 $ 4,711,689
Discretionary Expenditures $ 40,132,365 $ 53,857,797
Program Description: The mission of the Parks and Recreation program is to serve the
citizens of Louisiana and visitors by preserving and interpreting natural areas of unique or
exceptional scenic value; planning, developing, and operating sites that provide outdoor
recreation opportunities in natural surroundings; preserving and interpreting historical and
scientific sites of statewide importance; and administering intergovernmental programs
related to outdoor recreation and trails.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 44,819,297 $ 58,569,486
Page 55 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,028,822 $ 3,139,759
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 3,037 $ 3,037
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana State Parks Improvement and
Repair Dedicated Fund Account $ 1,634,389 $ 1,549,441
Poverty Point Reservoir Development
Dedicated Fund Account $ 20,684 $ 19,452
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,686,932 $ 4,711,689
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 19,985,123 $ 31,419,363
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 224,122 $ 224,122
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,176,077 $ 1,176,077
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana State Parks Improvement and
Repair Dedicated Fund Account $ 12,803,072 $ 15,093,032
Poverty Point Reservoir Development
Dedicated Fund Account $ 479,316 $ 480,548
Federal Funds $ 5,464,655 $ 5,464,655
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 40,132,365 $ 53,857,797
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 23,844,460 $ 24,704,635
Operating Expenses $ 8,295,945 $ 8,271,465
Professional Services $ 67,667 $ 67,667
Other Charges $ 11,407,788 $ 10,869,804
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,203,437 $ 14,655,915
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 44,819,297 $ 58,569,486
06-265 OFFICE OF CULTURAL DEVELOPMENT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Cultural Development -
Authorized Positions (33) (33)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (7) (7)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 811,954 $ 1,051,124
Discretionary Expenditures $ 9,336,073 $ 8,365,699
Program Description: The mission of the Cultural Development program is to administer
statewide programs, provide technical assistance and education to survey and preserve
Louisiana’s historic buildings and sites—both historic and archaeological as well as objects
that convey the state’s rich heritage and French language through the program’s major
components: Historic Preservation, Archaeology, Arts, the Council for Development of
French in Louisiana, and the Atchafalaya National Heritage Area.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,148,027 $ 9,416,823
Page 56 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 445,179 $ 691,306
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 51,317 $ 50,272
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 78,928 $ 77,462
Federal Funds $ 236,530 $ 232,084
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 811,954 $ 1,051,124
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,167,363 $ 2,334,581
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,500,273 $ 2,501,318
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 723,302 $ 724,768
Federal Funds $ 2,945,135 $ 2,805,032
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 9,336,073 $ 8,365,699
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 3,815,220 $ 3,847,019
Operating Expenses $ 308,732 $ 308,732
Professional Services $ 5,178 $ 5,178
Other Charges $ 6,018,897 $ 5,255,894
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 10,148,027 $ 9,416,823
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the Cultural
Development Program for various initiatives $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Cultural Development Program for expenses
relating to French programming initiatives $ 325,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Cultural Development Program for arts
and festival support $ 400,000
Payable out of State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana Main Street Program $ 225,000
06-267 OFFICE OF TOURISM
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative -
Authorized Positions (7) (7)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 476,459 $ 476,357
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,910,040 $ 1,753,245
Page 57 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The mission of the Administrative program is to coordinate the
efforts and initiatives of the other programs in the Office of Tourism with the advertising
agency, other agencies in the department, and other public and private travel industry
partners in order to achieve the greatest impact on the tourism industry in Louisiana.
Marketing -
Authorized Positions (18) (18)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (1) (1)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 343,452 $ 350,253
Discretionary Expenditures $ 32,508,155 $ 33,729,113
Program Description: The mission of the Marketing program is to provide advertising and
publicity for the assets of Louisiana; to design, produce, and distribute advertising materials
in all media; and to reach as many potential tourists as possible with an invitation to visit
Louisiana.
Welcome Centers -
Authorized Positions (51) (51)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 373,057 $ 395,399
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,575,251 $ 3,876,696
Program Description: The mission of Louisiana’s Welcome Centers, which are located
along major highways entering the state and in two of Louisiana’s largest cities, is to
provide a safe, friendly environment in which to welcome visitors, provide them information
about area attractions, and to encourage them to spend more time in the state.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 39,186,414 $ 40,581,063
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,192,968 $ 1,222,009
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,192,968 $ 1,222,009
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 276,423 $ 1,423
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 43,216 $ 43,216
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 37,673,807 $ 39,314,415
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 37,993,446 $ 39,359,054
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 6,200,752 $ 6,746,397
Operating Expenses $ 9,363,408 $ 9,363,408
Professional Services $ 14,357,599 $ 15,856,662
Other Charges $ 9,161,075 $ 8,514,596
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 103,580 $ 100,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 39,186,414 $ 40,581,063
Page 58 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 07
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND DEVELOPMENT
07-273 ADMINISTRATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of the Secretary -
Authorized Positions (92) (80)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,074,728 $ 2,862,125
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,806,797 $ 11,958,398
Program Description: The mission of the Office of the Secretary is to provide
administrative direction and leadership, which will ensure that subordinate programs under
the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation and Development (DOTD) are managed
to provide the optimum benefits and services to the public within the constraints of available
funding and applicable regulations, and perform all operational functions with safety as a
priority.
Office of Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (107) (116)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,251,079 $ 3,253,636
Discretionary Expenditures $ 41,813,324 $ 44,652,490
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Management and Finance is to support
the mission of DOTD by providing services that enable the success of all DOTD agencies,
offices and programs.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 60,945,928 $ 62,726,649
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Transportation Trust Fund -
Federal Receipts $ 1,182,302 $ 1,145,258
Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 5,143,505 $ 4,970,503
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 6,325,807 $ 6,115,761
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 21,976 $ 21,976
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 101,505 $ 101,505
Statutory Dedications:
Transportation Trust Fund -
Federal Receipts $ 11,113,194 $ 12,150,238
Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 43,383,446 $ 44,337,169
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 54,620,121 $ 56,610,888
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 24,731,992 $ 25,633,792
Operating Expenses $ 1,653,176 $ 1,653,176
Professional Services $ 4,786,844 $ 4,285,903
Other Charges $ 29,773,916 $ 31,153,778
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 60,945,928 $ 62,726,649
Page 59 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
07-276 ENGINEERING AND OPERATIONS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of Project Delivery -
Authorized Positions (625) (625)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 18,592,639 $ 18,249,263
Discretionary Expenditures $ 176,980,766 $ 177,667,983
Program Description: The mission of the Project Delivery Program is to develop,
construct and operate a safe, cost-effective and efficient highway and public infrastructure
system which will satisfy the needs of the public and serve the economic development of the
State in an environmentally compatible manner, to provide strategic direction for a
seamless, multimodal transportation system.
Office of Operations -
Authorized Positions (3,469) (3,469)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 71,024,305 $ 70,419,770
Discretionary Expenditures $ 568,679,526 $ 488,132,476
Program Description: This mission of the Operations Program is to plan, design, build,
sustain, and operate a safe and reliable multimodal transportation and infrastructure system
that enhances mobility and economic opportunity.
Aviation -
Authorized Positions (12) (12)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 242,562 $ 325,639
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,844,478 $ 1,878,946
Program Description: The mission of the Aviation Program is overall responsibility for
facilitating, development, exercising regulatory oversight, and providing guidance for
Louisiana’s aviation system of over 650 public and private airports and heliports.
Office of Multimodal Commerce -
Authorized Positions (14) (13)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 383,631 $ 308,335
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,389,724 $ 3,299,541
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Multimodal Commerce is to administer
the planning and programming functions of the department related to commercial trucking,
ports and waterways, freight and passenger rail development, advise the Project Delivery
Program on intermodal issues, and implement the master plan as it relates to intermodal
transportation.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 841,137,631 $ 760,281,953
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 235,403 $ 179,327
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,041,471 $ 997,738
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 335,816 $ 320,055
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Right-of-Way Permit Processing
Dedicated Fund Account $ 58,091 $ 50,363
Page 60 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Transportation Trust Fund -
Federal Receipts $ 19,791,723 $ 18,928,345
Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 68,599,211 $ 68,665,687
Federal Funds $ 181,422 $ 161,492
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 90,243,137 $ 89,303,007
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 60,335,889 $ 66,924,481
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 43,517,204 $ 43,453,937
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 42,724,183 $ 30,335,855
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Bicycle and Pedestrian
Safety Dedicated Fund Account $ 5,870 $ 5,870
Right-of-Way Permit Processing
Dedicated Fund Account $ 371,909 $ 379,637
LTRC Transportation Training and
Education Center Dedicated
Fund Account $ 726,590 $ 726,590
Statutory Dedications:
Transportation Trust Fund -
Federal Receipts $ 153,095,234 $ 153,546,252
Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 332,383,278 $ 338,149,653
New Orleans Ferry Fund $ 1,140,000 $ 1,140,000
State Highway Improvement Fund $ 5,000,000 $ 5,000,000
Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure
Fund $ 78,417,758 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 33,176,579 $ 31,316,671
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 750,894,494 $ 670,978,946
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 413,207,092 $ 429,506,695
Operating Expenses $ 88,277,707 $ 59,900,346
Professional Services $ 63,185,289 $ 60,320,243
Other Charges $ 184,093,074 $ 129,522,699
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 92,374,469 $ 81,031,970
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 841,137,631 $ 760,281,953
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Operations for the Cameron Ferry
operations and maintenance contract $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Office of Operations Program for
improvements and road repairs on Highway
86 in Iberia Parish and Highway 89 in
Vermillion Parish $ 400,000
Page 61 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Operations Program for additional mowing
cycles along state roads $ 4,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Office of Operations for additional district
maintenance, in the event that House Bill No.
313 of the 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is enacted into law $ 63,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Operations Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the State Highway Improvement Fund by ($5,000,000)
in the event that House Bill No. 1072 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted into law.
SCHEDULE 08
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONS
CORRECTIONS SERVICES
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the secretary of the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, Corrections Services, may transfer, with the approval of the Commissioner
of Administration via midyear budget adjustment (BA-7 Form), up to twenty-five (25)
authorized positions and associated personal services funding from one budget unit to any
other budget unit and/or between programs within any budget unit within this schedule. Not
more than an aggregate of 100 positions and associated personal services may be transferred
between budget units and/or programs within a budget unit without the approval of the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Provided, however, that the department shall submit a monthly status report to the
commissioner of administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, which
format shall be determined by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Provided,
further, that this report shall be submitted via letter and shall include, but is not limited to,
actual and projected expenditures by agency by object code and projections of offender
population and expenditures for Corrections Services and Local Housing of State Adult
Offenders.
08-400 CORRECTIONS – ADMINISTRATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of the Secretary -
Authorized Positions (32) (32)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 889,291 $ 726,255
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,242,682 $ 4,197,998
Program Description: Provides department wide administration, policy development,
financial management, and audit functions; also operates the Crime Victim Services Bureau,
Corrections Organized for Re-entry (CORe), and Project Clean Up.
Office of Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (75) (85)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 30,003,458 $ 31,009,391
Discretionary Expenditures $ 50,848,975 $ 39,870,938
Page 62 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Encompasses fiscal services, budget services, information services,
food services, maintenance and construction, performance audit, training, procurement and
contractual review, and human resource programs of the department. Ensures that the
department's resources are accounted for in accordance with applicable laws and
regulations.
Adult Services -
Authorized Positions (115) (131)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 34,095,635 $ 42,515,935
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,960,804 $ 66,591,493
Program Description: Provides administrative oversight and support of the operational
programs of the adult correctional institutions; leads and directs the department's audit
team, which conducts operational audits of all adult institutions and assists all units with
maintenance of American Correctional Association (ACA) accreditation; and supports the
Administrative Remedy Procedure (offender grievance and disciplinary appeals).
Board of Pardons and Parole -
Authorized Positions (17) (17)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,412,938 $ 1,412,938
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 171,015
Program Description: Recommends clemency relief (commutation of sentence, restoration
of parole eligibility, pardon and restoration of rights) for offenders who have shown that
they have been rehabilitated and have been or can become law-abiding citizens. The Board
shall also determine the time and conditions of releases on parole of all adult offenders who
are eligible for parole and determine and impose sanctions for violations of parole. No
recommendation is implemented until the Governor signs the recommendation.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 134,453,783 $ 186,495,963
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 66,333,432 $ 75,602,705
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 52,589 $ 47,860
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 6,049 $ 5,517
Federal Funds $ 9,252 $ 8,437
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 66,401,322 $ 75,664,519
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 46,456,903 $ 49,794,125
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 13,883,077 $ 56,323,491
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 109,087 $ 109,619
Statutory Dedications:
Criminal Justice and First Responder Fund $ 3,000,000 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 4,603,394 $ 4,604,209
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 68,052,461 $ 110,831,444
Page 63 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 60,764,001 $ 64,333,555
Operating Expenses $ 2,686,897 $ 2,669,318
Professional Services $ 1,518,434 $ 1,518,434
Other Charges $ 69,230,507 $ 117,974,656
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 253,944 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 134,453,783 $ 186,495,963
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Adult Services Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 27,099
08-402 LOUISIANA STATE PENITENTIARY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (21) (19)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 400,118 $ 300,998
Discretionary Expenditures $ 22,416,553 $ 20,949,170
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (1,220) (1,360)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 148,386,165 $ 185,637,327
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 4,678 offenders; and maintenance and support of the facility and equipment. Provides
rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy, academic and vocational
programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs, on-the-job training, and
institutional work programs. Provides medical services, dental services, mental health
services, and substance abuse counseling (including a substance abuse coordinator and both
Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (13) (13)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 186,192 $ 186,067
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,657,352 $ 6,135,253
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
Auxiliary Account - Rodeo -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,800,000 $ 4,800,000
Account Description: Funds expenditures necessary for production of the annual Angola
Rodeo events, which are held each October and April. This Program is funded entirely from
Fees & Self-generated Revenues derived from the sale of admission tickets, hobby-craft sales
commissions, advertising, and other miscellaneous sources.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 181,846,380 $ 218,008,815
Page 64 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 147,939,607 $ 185,091,649
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 172,500 $ 172,500
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 860,368 $ 860,243
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 148,972,475 $ 186,124,392
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 22,416,553 $ 20,949,170
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 10,457,352 $ 10,935,253
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 32,873,905 $ 31,884,423
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 118,954,945 $ 148,277,980
Operating Expenses $ 31,519,460 $ 37,065,650
Professional Services $ 3,716,572 $ 3,716,572
Other Charges $ 26,636,866 $ 26,516,174
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,018,537 $ 2,432,439
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 181,846,380 $ 218,008,815
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 7,074,871
08-405 RAYMOND LABORDE CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 225,824 $ 222,999
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,819,762 $ 6,151,986
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (341) (341)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 37,054,237 $ 41,991,365
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 1,808 minimum and medium custody offenders; and maintenance and support of the
facility and equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy,
academic and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs,
on-the-job training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services (including
an infirmary unit), dental services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling
(including a substance abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics
Anonymous activities).
Page 65 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 57,106 $ 57,640
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,177,056 $ 2,515,705
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 45,333,985 $ 50,939,695
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 37,090,926 $ 42,025,229
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 144,859 $ 144,859
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 101,382 $ 101,916
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 37,337,167 $ 42,272,004
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,819,762 $ 6,151,986
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,177,056 $ 2,515,705
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 7,996,818 $ 8,667,691
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 33,617,209 $ 35,321,573
Operating Expenses $ 5,678,034 $ 6,049,287
Professional Services $ 435,565 $ 435,565
Other Charges $ 5,589,178 $ 6,367,270
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 13,999 $ 2,766,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 45,333,985 $ 50,939,695
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 1,427,561
08-406 LOUISIANA CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTE FOR WOMEN
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (7) (7)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 120,306 $ 123,227
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,957,494 $ 3,112,205
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (254) (254)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 30,966,210 $ 33,189,288
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Page 66 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 959 female offenders of all custody classes; and maintenance and support of the facility
and equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy,
academic and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs,
on-the-job training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services, dental
services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling (including a substance
abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 53,515 $ 47,285
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,478,369 $ 1,496,312
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 34,575,894 $ 37,968,317
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 30,940,017 $ 33,166,016
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 72,430 $ 72,430
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 127,584 $ 121,354
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 31,140,031 $ 33,359,800
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,957,494 $ 3,112,205
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,478,369 $ 1,496,312
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 3,435,863 $ 4,608,517
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 26,989,567 $ 28,755,604
Operating Expenses $ 4,227,962 $ 4,876,007
Professional Services $ 300,579 $ 300,579
Other Charges $ 3,010,809 $ 3,963,807
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 46,977 $ 72,320
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 34,575,894 $ 37,968,317
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 1,059,679
08-407 WINN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 219,930 $ 186,351
Page 67 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides institutional support services including American
Correctional Association (ACA) accreditation reporting efforts, heating and air conditioning
service contracts, risk management premiums, and major repairs.
Purchase of Correctional Services -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 288,970 $ 107,275
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Privately managed correctional facility operated by LaSalle
Corrections; provides for the necessary level of security for 10 male offenders.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 508,900 $ 293,626
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 288,970 $ 107,275
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 288,970 $ 107,275
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 219,930 $ 186,351
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 219,930 $ 186,351
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 508,900 $ 293,626
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 508,900 $ 293,626
08-408 ALLEN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (13) (13)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 200,379 $ 204,998
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,254,287 $ 5,775,483
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (285) (279)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 29,136,340 $ 30,987,046
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 1,474 offenders of various custody levels; and maintenance and support of the facility
and equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy,
academic and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs,
Page 68 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
on-the-job training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services, dental
services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling (including a substance
abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 46,301 $ 44,519
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,600,630 $ 1,608,444
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 36,237,937 $ 38,620,490
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 29,083,684 $ 30,939,009
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 78,032 $ 78,032
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 221,304 $ 219,522
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 29,383,020 $ 31,236,563
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,254,287 $ 5,775,483
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,600,630 $ 1,608,444
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 6,854,917 $ 7,383,927
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 25,007,068 $ 27,004,825
Operating Expenses $ 6,079,948 $ 6,450,742
Professional Services $ 300,037 $ 294,627
Other Charges $ 4,241,629 $ 4,750,796
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 609,255 $ 119,500
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 36,237,937 $ 38,620,490
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 1,094,212
08-409 DIXON CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (12) (12)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 207,231 $ 202,675
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,835,477 $ 7,280,528
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Page 69 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (446) (446)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 57,764,835 $ 60,970,933
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 1,800 minimum and medium custody offenders; and maintenance and support for the
facility and equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy,
academic and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs,
on-the-job training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services (including
an infirmary unit and dialysis treatment program), dental services, mental health services,
and substance abuse counseling (including a substance abuse coordinator and both
Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (5) (5)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 65,625 $ 63,704
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,883,172 $ 1,909,613
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 67,756,340 $ 70,427,453
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 55,808,516 $ 59,010,360
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,715,447 $ 1,715,447
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 513,728 $ 511,505
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 58,037,691 $ 61,237,312
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,819,653 $ 7,264,402
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,898,996 $ 1,925,739
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 9,718,649 $ 9,190,141
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 46,597,526 $ 48,112,487
Operating Expenses $ 8,003,373 $ 6,916,442
Professional Services $ 3,026,000 $ 3,026,000
Other Charges $ 8,988,320 $ 9,958,706
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,141,121 $ 2,413,818
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 67,756,340 $ 70,427,453
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 2,300,746
Page 70 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
08-413 ELAYN HUNT CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (9) (9)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 235,088 $ 140,105
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,081,878 $ 7,662,324
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (623) (615)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 77,653,929 $ 88,040,635
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 2,181 offenders of various custody levels; and maintenance and support of the facility
and equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy,
academic and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs,
on-the-job training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services, dental
services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling (including a substance
abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous activities).
Provides diagnostic and classification services for newly committed state offenders,
including a medical exam, psychological evaluation, and social workup.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (5) (5)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 81,732 $ 74,622
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,999,970 $ 1,977,137
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 87,052,597 $ 97,894,823
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 77,487,086 $ 87,778,809
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 243,048 $ 243,048
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 240,615 $ 233,505
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 77,970,749 $ 88,255,362
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,081,878 $ 7,662,324
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,999,970 $ 1,977,137
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 9,081,848 $ 9,639,461
Page 71 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 62,817,040 $ 69,760,221
Operating Expenses $ 16,448,080 $ 18,304,252
Professional Services $ 381,761 $ 381,761
Other Charges $ 7,364,676 $ 8,033,589
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 41,040 $ 1,415,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 87,052,597 $ 97,894,823
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 2,922,963
08-414 DAVID WADE CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (9) (9)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 180,132 $ 169,815
Discretionary Expenditures $ 5,124,765 $ 4,466,395
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (313) (313)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 35,308,604 $ 38,239,611
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 1,176 multi-level custody offenders; and maintenance and support of the facility and
equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy, academic
and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs, on-the-job
training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services (including an
infirmary unit), dental services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling
(including a substance abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics
Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 59,327 $ 57,880
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,618,608 $ 1,639,309
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 42,291,436 $ 44,573,010
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 35,159,418 $ 38,080,108
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 77,283 $ 77,283
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 311,362 $ 309,915
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 35,548,063 $ 38,467,306
Page 72 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,124,765 $ 4,466,395
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,618,608 $ 1,639,309
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 6,743,373 $ 6,105,704
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 32,395,610 $ 34,578,313
Operating Expenses $ 5,622,765 $ 5,024,322
Professional Services $ 403,238 $ 403,238
Other Charges $ 3,846,323 $ 4,175,137
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 23,500 $ 392,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 42,291,436 $ 44,573,010
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 1,318,509
08-415 ADULT PROBATION AND PAROLE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration and Support -
Authorized Positions (20) (20)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 748,011 $ 726,280
Discretionary Expenditures $ 6,247,532 $ 7,245,624
Program Description: Provides management direction, guidance, coordination, and
administrative support.
Field Services -
Authorized Positions (733) (733)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 104,176,842 $ 106,791,811
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides supervision of remanded clients; supplies investigative
reports for sentencing, release, and clemency; fulfills extradition requirements; and
supervises contract work release centers.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 111,172,385 $ 114,763,715
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 90,919,186 $ 93,662,227
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from prior
and current year collections $ 12,991,667 $ 12,866,667
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Sex Offender Registry Technology
Dedicated Fund Account $ 54,000 $ 54,000
Statutory Dedications:
Adult Probation & Parole Officer
Retirement Fund $ 960,000 $ 935,197
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 104,924,853 $ 107,518,091
Page 73 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 6,247,532 $ 7,245,624
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 6,247,532 $ 7,245,624
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 89,720,457 $ 90,662,149
Operating Expenses $ 8,701,502 $ 8,907,424
Professional Services $ 1,297,026 $ 1,292,526
Other Charges $ 11,158,734 $ 13,776,616
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 294,666 $ 125,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 111,172,385 $ 114,763,715
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Adult
Probation and Parole Officer Retirement Fund
to the Administration and Support Program $ 24,803
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration and Support Program by reducing the appropriation out of
the State General Fund (Direct) by ($24,803).
08-416 B. B. “SIXTY” RAYBURN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (9) (9)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 209,273 $ 168,247
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,796,105 $ 5,578,330
Program Description: Provides administration and institutional support. Administration
includes the warden, institution business office, and American Correctional Association
(ACA) accreditation reporting efforts. Institutional support includes telephone expenses,
utilities, postage, Office of Risk Management insurance, and lease-purchase of equipment.
Incarceration -
Authorized Positions (284) (284)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 32,600,211 $ 34,974,671
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides security; services related to the custody and care (offender
classification and record keeping and basic necessities such as food, clothing, and laundry)
for 1,314 multi-level custody offenders; and maintenance and support of the facility and
equipment. Provides rehabilitation opportunities to offenders through literacy, academic
and vocational programs, religious guidance programs, recreational programs, on-the-job
training, and institutional work programs. Provides medical services (including an
infirmary unit), dental services, mental health services, and substance abuse counseling
(including a substance abuse coordinator and both Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics
Anonymous activities).
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 54,771 $ 54,338
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,556,839 $ 1,572,405
Page 74 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Account Description: Funds the cost of providing an offender canteen to allow offenders
to use their accounts to purchase canteen items. Also provides for expenditures for the
benefit of the offender population from profits from the sale of merchandise in the canteen.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 39,217,199 $ 42,347,991
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 32,434,286 $ 34,767,720
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 156,064 $ 156,064
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 273,905 $ 273,472
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 32,864,255 $ 35,197,256
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,796,105 $ 5,578,330
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,556,839 $ 1,572,405
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 6,352,944 $ 7,150,735
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 28,808,287 $ 30,458,332
Operating Expenses $ 4,476,549 $ 4,832,529
Professional Services $ 101,970 $ 101,970
Other Charges $ 4,789,341 $ 5,724,810
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,041,052 $ 1,230,350
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 39,217,199 $ 42,347,991
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Incarceration Program for a pay increase
for correctional officers $ 1,388,300
PUBLIC SAFETY SERVICES
08-418 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND FINANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Management and Finance Program -
Authorized Positions (104) (107)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,321,522 $ 3,523,125
Discretionary Expenditures $ 24,071,112 $ 27,250,868
Program Description: Provides effective management and support services in an efficient,
expeditious, and professional manner to all budget units within Public Safety Services.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 27,392,634 $ 30,773,993
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 619,793 $ 623,519
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,068,309 $ 2,294,151
Statutory Dedications:
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 633,420 $ 605,455
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 3,321,522 $ 3,523,125
Page 75 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 3,146,926 $ 2,991,200
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 13,792,880 $ 17,292,548
Statutory Dedications:
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 5,145,687 $ 4,981,501
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 1,985,619 $ 1,985,619
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 24,071,112 $ 27,250,868
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 13,136,056 $ 14,779,671
Operating Expenses $ 3,325,896 $ 3,317,862
Professional Services $ 172,100 $ 172,100
Other Charges $ 10,756,581 $ 12,502,360
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 2,001 $ 2,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 27,392,634 $ 30,773,993
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program for
wildfire assistance $ 1,033,539
08-419 OFFICE OF STATE POLICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Traffic Enforcement Program -
Authorized Positions (982) (1,058)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 35,433,694 $ 13,470,311
Discretionary Expenditures $ 144,515,068 $ 190,495,948
Program Description: Enforces state laws relating to motor vehicles and streets and
highways of the state, investigates crashes, performs drug interdiction, aids motorists,
conducts crime prevention programs, promotes highway safety, and leads and assists local
and state law enforcement agencies; provides inspection and enforcement activities relative
to intrastate and interstate commercial vehicles; oversees the transportation of hazardous
materials; regulates the towing and wrecker industry; regulates explosives control; and
provides security for the Capital Complex and state-owned facilities across the state.
Criminal Investigation Program -
Authorized Positions (200) (200)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,645,162 $ 3,323,899
Discretionary Expenditures $ 30,136,656 $ 31,716,503
Program Description: Has responsibility for the enforcement of all statutes relating to
criminal activity; serves as a repository for information and point of coordination for multi-
jurisdictional investigations; investigates police shootings, corruption, and politically
sensitive cases, and supports local agencies and jurisdictions with investigative assistance,
violent crimes, and child predator investigations; enforces all local, state, and federal
statutes that prohibit the possession, use, and distribution of narcotics, dangerous drugs, and
prohibited substances; reviews referrals and complaints related to insurance fraud.
Operational Support Program -
Authorized Positions (415) (339)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 20,116,107 $ 15,603,968
Discretionary Expenditures $ 172,973,392 $ 170,661,341
Page 76 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides support services to personnel within the Office of State
Police and other public law enforcement agencies; operates the crime laboratory; trains and
certifies personnel on blood alcohol testing machinery and paperwork; serves as central
depository for criminal records; manages fleet operations and maintenance; issues
Concealed Handgun permits; provides security for elected officials; conducts background
investigations on new and current employees through its Internal Affairs Section; promotes
interoperability throughout the state; and manages and provides training, certification, and
recertification of all required law enforcement classes.
Gaming Enforcement Program -
Authorized Positions (211) (216)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,963,846 $ 5,959,232
Discretionary Expenditures $ 26,353,207 $ 28,474,825
Program Description: Regulates, licenses, audits, and investigates gaming activities in the
state, including video poker, riverboat, land-based casino, and Indian gaming, and gaming
equipment and manufacturers.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 445,137,132 $ 459,706,027
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 14,187,544 $ 8,187,590
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 793,306 $ 447,669
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 30,942,396 $ 13,457,782
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Insurance Verification System Dedicated
Fund Account $ 11,032,529 $ 11,032,529
Statutory Dedications:
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 12,265,109 $ 3,658,331
Louisiana State Police Salary Fund $ 1,314,356 $ 1,314,356
Federal Funds $ 623,569 $ 259,153
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 71,158,809 $ 38,357,410
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 114,582,467 $ 147,361,557
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 36,133,825 $ 38,778,251
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 74,587,355 $ 85,992,677
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Concealed Handgun Permit Dedicated
Fund Account $ 734,963 $ 734,963
Criminal Identification and
Information Dedicated Fund Account $ 6,500,000 $ 6,500,000
Explosives Trust Dedicated Fund Account $ 251,182 $ 251,182
Insurance Fraud Investigation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 5,187,785 $ 5,187,785
Insurance Verification System Dedicated
Fund Account $ 27,501,536 $ 27,501,536
Louisiana Towing and Storage Dedicated
Fund Account $ 300,000 $ 300,000
Motorcycle Safety, Awareness, and
Operator Training Program Dedicated
Fund Account $ 333,850 $ 333,850
Public Safety DWI Testing, Maintenance
and Training Dedicated Fund Account $ 440,825 $ 440,825
Right to Know Dedicated Fund Account $ 26,069 $ 26,069
Page 77 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Unified Carrier Registration
Agreement Dedicated Fund Account $ 12,482,044 $ 11,547,216
Sex Offender Registry Technology
Dedicated Fund Account $ 25,000 $ 25,000
Statutory Dedications:
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 42,742,693 $ 47,391,928
Sports Wagering Enforcement Fund $ 1,700,000 $ 2,127,230
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 5,297,174 $ 5,297,174
Hazardous Materials Emergency
Response Fund $ 106,453 $ 106,453
Criminal Justice and First Responder Fund $ 3,800,000 $ 0
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 1,952,084 $ 1,824,119
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 3,131,600 $ 3,442,100
Louisiana State Police Salary Fund $ 19,285,644 $ 19,117,303
Department of Public Safety Peace
Officers Fund $ 249,000 $ 249,000
Underground Damages Prevention Fund $ 15,000 $ 15,000
Federal Funds $ 16,611,774 $ 16,797,399
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 373,978,323 $ 421,348,617
Provided however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Fees and Self-
generated Revenues derived from federal and state drug and gaming asset forfeitures shall
be carried forward and shall be available for expenditure.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 273,175,264 $ 280,700,945
Operating Expenses $ 58,128,866 $ 59,347,333
Professional Services $ 1,751,312 $ 827,973
Other Charges $ 98,718,909 $ 113,812,988
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 13,362,781 $ 5,016,788
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 445,137,132 $ 459,706,027
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for the
Acadiana Criminalistics Laboratory $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Operational Support Program for the North
Louisiana Criminalistics Laboratory $ 1,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Traffic Enforcement Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($7,240,068).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the Office
of Motor Vehicles Driver's License Escrow
Dedicated Fund Account to the Traffic
Enforcement Program for personal services $ 7,240,068
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Traffic Enforcement Program for state
capitol complex security, including ten (10)
authorized positions $ 1,150,000
Page 78 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the Traffic
Enforcement Program for additional troopers
including ten (10) authorized positions $ 1,928,467
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Traffic
Enforcement for police equipment for the state
capitol complex $ 1,200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Traffic Enforcement Program $ 400,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Traffic Enforcement Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($400,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Riverboat
Gaming Enforcement Fund to the Traffic
Enforcement Program $ 3,555,349
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Traffic Enforcement Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($3,555,349).
08-420 OFFICE OF MOTOR VEHICLES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Licensing Program -
Authorized Positions (566) (546)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 9,698,508 $ 9,661,532
Discretionary Expenditures $ 100,394,418 $ 77,083,510
Program Description: Through field offices and headquarter units, issues Louisiana
driver’s licenses, identification cards, license plates, registrations and certificates of titles;
maintains driving records and vehicle records; enforces the state’s mandatory automobile
insurance liability insurance laws; reviews and processes files received from law
enforcement agencies and courts, governmental agencies, insurance companies and
individuals; takes action based on established law, policies and procedures; complies with
several federal/state mandated and regulated programs such as Motor Voter Registration
process and the Organ Donor process.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 110,092,926 $ 86,745,042
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 751 $ 722
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 9,660,748 $ 9,625,221
Federal Funds $ 37,009 $ 35,589
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 9,698,508 $ 9,661,532
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 125,000 $ 0
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 471,749 $ 471,778
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 55,267,078 $ 56,179,721
Page 79 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Trucking Research and Education
Council Fund Account $ 900,000 $ 900,000
Office of Motor Vehicles Customer
Service and Technology Dedicated
Fund Account $ 6,800,000 $ 6,800,000
Handling Fee Escrow Dedicated
Fund Account $ 4,150,870 $ 4,150,870
Unified Carrier Registration Agreement
Dedicated Fund Account $ 171,007 $ 171,007
Insurance Verification System Dedicated
Fund Account $ 1,181,921 $ 1,181,921
Statutory Dedications:
Modernization and Security Fund $ 24,100,000 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 7,266,793 $ 7,228,213
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 100,394,418 $ 77,083,510
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 46,521,535 $ 46,225,187
Operating Expenses $ 8,406,313 $ 8,656,313
Professional Services $ 267,286 $ 142,286
Other Charges $ 54,848,163 $ 31,721,256
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 49,629 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 110,092,926 $ 86,745,042
Provided however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Fees and Self-
generated Revenues shall be carried forward and shall be available for expenditure.
EXPENDITURES:
Licensing Program for IT Modernization project $ 7,300,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 7,300,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,282,454
State General Fund by:
Fees and Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Account:
Office of Motor Vehicles Special Identification
Card Dedicated Fund Account $ 2,717,546
Statutory Dedications:
Modernization and Security Fund $ 3,300,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 7,300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers to the Licensing Program $ 400,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Licensing Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Fees and Self-generated Revenues by ($400,000).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Licensing Program for the Legacy Donor
Foundation for organ donor awareness $ 125,000
Page 80 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Licensing Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State General
Fund by Fees and Self-generated Revenues ($1,928,467) and (25) authorized positions.
08-422 OFFICE OF STATE FIRE MARSHAL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Fire Prevention Program -
Authorized Positions (206) (202)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,406,504 $ 4,509,105
Discretionary Expenditures $ 37,665,839 $ 37,624,236
Program Description: Performs fire and safety inspections of all facilities requiring state
or federal licenses; certifies health care facilities for compliance with fire and safety codes;
certifies and licenses fire protection sprinklers and extinguishers; inspects boiler and certain
pressure vessels; licenses manufacturers, distributors, and retailers of fireworks.
Investigates fires not covered by a recognized fire protection bureau; maintains a data
depository and provides statistical analyses of all fires. Reviews final construction plans
and specifications for new or remodeled buildings in the state (except one and two family
dwellings) for compliance with fire, safety and accessibility laws; reviews designs and
calculations for fire extinguishing systems, alarm systems, portable fire extinguishers, and
dry chemical suppression systems.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 42,072,343 $ 42,133,341
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 30,137 $ 27,690
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 675,072 $ 620,255
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Fire Marshal Fund $ 3,701,295 $ 3,859,162
Federal Funds $ 0 $ 1,998
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,406,504 $ 4,509,105
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,084,515 $ 2,086,962
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 4,781,000 $ 4,993,317
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Industrialized Building Program Dedicated
Fund Account $ 300,000 $ 300,000
Louisiana Life Safety and Property
Protection Trust Dedicated Fund
Account $ 725,000 $ 725,000
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Fire Marshal Fund $ 25,939,508 $ 26,589,670
Two Percent Fire Insurance Fund $ 1,960,000 $ 1,160,000
Louisiana Manufactured Housing
Commission Fund $ 305,775 $ 305,775
Volunteer Firefighter Tuition
Reimbursement Fund $ 250,000 $ 250,000
Fire and Emergency Training Academy
Film Library Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Federal Funds $ 1,270,041 $ 1,163,512
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 37,665,839 $ 37,624,236
Page 81 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 24,209,289 $ 26,266,017
Operating Expenses $ 4,012,326 $ 3,995,826
Professional Services $ 7,219 $ 7,219
Other Charges $ 12,843,509 $ 10,864,279
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,000,000 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 42,072,343 $ 41,133,341
Provided however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior-year Interagency
Transfers and Fees and Self-generated Revenues shall be carried forward and shall be
available for expenditure.
EXPENDITURES:
Fire Prevention Program for the purchase of equipment
for the Fire and Emergency Training Academy $ 500,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 500,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 65,217
Federal Funds $ 434,783
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 500,000
08-423 LOUISIANA GAMING CONTROL BOARD
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Gaming Control Board -
Authorized Positions (4) (5)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 163,773 $ 171,647
Discretionary Expenditures $ 949,933 $ 1,123,894
Program Description: Promulgates and enforces rules which regulate operations in the
state relative to provisions of the Louisiana Riverboat Economic Development and Gaming
Control Act, the Louisiana Economic Development and Gaming Corporation Act, and the
Video Draw Poker Devices Control law. Further the board has all regulatory, enforcement
and supervisory authority that exists in the state as to gaming on Indian lands.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,113,706 $ 1,295,541
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 666 $ 666
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 163,107 $ 170,981
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 163,773 $ 171,647
Page 82 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Pari-mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 82,427 $ 82,427
Sports Wagering Enforcement Fund $ 105,020 $ 281,855
Riverboat Gaming Enforcement Fund $ 762,486 $ 759,612
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 949,933 $ 1,123,894
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 779,824 $ 864,872
Operating Expenses $ 133,020 $ 143,620
Professional Services $ 66,717 $ 66,717
Other Charges $ 134,145 $ 143,732
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 76,600
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,113,706 $ 1,295,541
08-424 LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative Program -
Authorized Positions (12) (12)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 219,480 $ 210,839
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,579,275 $ 1,576,628
Program Description: Promulgates and enforces rules which regulate the distribution,
handling and storage, and transportation of liquefied petroleum gases; inspects storage
facilities and equipment; examines and certifies personnel engaged in the industry.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,798,755 $ 1,787,467
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Commission
Rainy Day
Dedicated Fund Account $ 219,480 $ 210,839
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 219,480 $ 210,839
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Commission
Rainy Day
Dedicated Fund Account $ 1,579,275 $ 1,576,628
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,579,275 $ 1,576,628
Page 83 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,275,651 $ 1,237,508
Operating Expenses $ 163,959 $ 186,104
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 359,145 $ 363,855
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,798,755 $ 1,787,467
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the
Liquefied Petroleum Gas Commission Rainy
Day Dedicated Fund Account to the
Administrative Program for software
maintenance $ 90,000
08-425 LOUISIANA HIGHWAY SAFETY COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative Program -
Authorized Positions (15) (15)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 331,499 $ 369,285
Discretionary Expenditures $ 23,636,516 $ 24,129,054
Program Description: Provides the mechanism through which the state receives federal
funds for highway safety purposes; conducts analyses of highway safety initiatives; contracts
with law enforcement agencies to maintain compliance with federal mandates; conducts
public information/education initiatives in nine highway safety priority areas.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 23,968,015 $ 24,498,339
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 172,851 $ 195,206
Federal Funds $ 158,648 $ 174,079
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 331,499 $ 369,285
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 412,350 $ 412,350
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 730,280 $ 707,925
Federal Funds $ 22,493,886 $ 23,008,779
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 23,636,516 $ 24,129,054
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,777,872 $ 1,914,724
Operating Expenses $ 223,188 $ 223,188
Professional Services $ 4,177,050 $ 4,177,050
Other Charges $ 17,789,905 $ 18,183,377
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 23,968,015 $ 24,498,339
Page 84 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
YOUTH SERVICES
08-403 OFFICE OF JUVENILE JUSTICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Youth Services -
Authorized Positions (1,070) (1,223)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 20,862,795 $ 23,650,140
Discretionary Expenditures $ 177,554,382 $ 202,687,596
Program Description: Provides beneficial administration, policy development, financial
management and leadership; and develops and implements evident based practices/formulas
for juvenile services. Provides for the custody, care, and treatment of adjudicated youth
through enforcement of laws and implementation of programs designed to ensure the safety
of public, staff, and youth; and to reintegrate youth into society. The region also provides
a community-based system of care that supervises the needs of the youth after reintegration
into society. Provides a community-based system of care that addresses the needs of youth
committed to custody and/or supervision.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 235,682 $ 235,682
Program Description: The Auxiliary Account was created to administer a service to
youthful offenders within the agency’s secure care facilities. The fund is used to account for
juvenile purchases of consumer items from the facility’s canteen. In addition to, telephone
commissions, hobby craft sales, donations, visitation sales, recycling, contraband, and photo
sales. Funding in this account will be used to replenish canteens; fund youth recreation and
rehabilitation programs within Acadiana, Bridge City, Columbia, Jetson, and Swanson
Correctional Centers For Youth. This account is funded entirely with Fees and Self-
generated Revenues.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 198,652,859 $ 226,573,418
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 20,100,526 $ 22,887,672
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 605,430 $ 601,741
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 144,523 $ 148,531
Federal Funds $ 12,316 $ 12,196
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 20,862,795 $ 23,650,140
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 156,601,407 $ 181,734,820
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 18,529,191 $ 18,532,880
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,630,964 $ 1,626,956
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Youthful Offender Management
Dedicated Fund Account $ 149,022 $ 149,022
Federal Funds $ 879,480 $ 879,600
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 177,790,064 $ 202,923,278
Page 85 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 101,221,942 $ 128,422,580
Operating Expenses $ 7,628,462 $ 8,771,059
Professional Services $ 2,155,838 $ 2,188,773
Other Charges $ 87,196,617 $ 85,284,426
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 450,000 $ 1,906,580
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 198,652,859 $ 226,573,418
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, cash generated by each budget unit within Schedule 09 may be
pooled with any other budget unit within Schedule 09 to avoid a cash deficit. No budget unit
may expend more revenues than are appropriated to it in this Act except upon the approval
of the Division of Administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, or as
may otherwise be provided for by law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department shall purchase medical
services for consumers in the most cost effective manner. The secretary is directed to utilize
various cost containment measures to ensure expenditures remain at the level appropriated
in this Schedule, including but not limited to precertification, preadmission screening,
diversion, fraud control, utilization review and management, prior authorization, service
limitations, drug therapy management, disease management, cost sharing, and other
measures as permitted under federal law.
Beginning on October 15, 2026, and monthly thereafter, the department shall submit to the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget for its review a report itemizing the means of
financing and expenditures for Schedule 09-306 Medical Vendor Payments. The department
may vary the forecasting methodologies utilized to produce the reports as necessary to
ensure the submission of the most accurate projections of revenues and expenditures as
practical.
The first report shall include a detailed itemization of the actual means of financing and
expenditures for Medical Vendor Payments in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and budgeted means
of financing and the initial allocation of payments and year-to-date expenditures for Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 delineated by provider group, state agency, or managed care program. The
reporting on the managed care expenditures shall differentiate between expenditures on the
ACA Expansion population and the non-expansion population. The first report shall also
include, for both the prior and current fiscal years, an itemization of supplemental or directed
payment programs by provider group as well as all supplemental or directed payments and
uncompensated care costs payments to the LSU Public Private Partnership hospitals. Finally,
the report shall also provide the total amount of the expenditures on the Managed Care
Incentive Program for both the prior and current fiscal years.
In the second report and each subsequent report submitted monthly thereafter, the
department shall include a section detailing the budgeted means of financing versus the
projected use of those means of financing to fund the projected expenditures and as adjusted
for projected revenue collections by source. In the event a surplus is projected, the
department shall provide an explanation of the source of any surplus revenues and the
rationale of the department’s proposed use of the means of financing. In the event a deficit
is projected due to the budgeted means of finance or estimated revenue collections being
insufficient to finance projected expenditures, the department shall inform the committee of
any other sources of revenues that may be available or adjustments in expenditures that
could be implemented within the department to aid in alleviating the projected deficit. Also,
beginning with the second report and continuing in each report submitted monthly thereafter,
the department shall delineate, in the same manner as presented in the first report of the
fiscal year, the initial allocation of payments, total projected expenditures, and year-to-date
expenditures in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for each allocation within the programs, the
Page 86 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
supplemental or directed payment programs, the supplemental or directed payments and
uncompensated care costs payments to the LSU Public Private Partnership hospitals, and the
total expenditures on the Managed Care Incentive Program.
Further, each report shall include a section specifying the total amount of pharmacy rebates
projected to be received by the end of the fiscal year delineated between those generated by
drug utilization of the expansion enrollees versus the non-expansion enrollees and, for the
non-expansion enrollees, between those receiving health care services under the fee-for-
service program versus the managed care program. In addition, each report shall include a
section on current expansion and non-expansion enrollment in the Medicaid program and
projected expansion and non-expansion enrollment through the end of the fiscal year.
Finally, each report shall include a thorough explanation of all policy changes proposed or
implemented by the department since the preceding report was submitted to the committee,
including but not limited to those being proposed or implemented by administrative rule
making, state plan amendment, waiver application, or contract amendment. Such
explanations shall include whether the policy change will result in an increase or decrease
in revenue collections and/or expenditures.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and specifically R.S. 39:82(E), for
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 any over-collected funds, including interagency transfers, fees and
self-generated revenues, federal funds, and surplus statutory dedicated funds generated and
collected by any agency in Schedule 09 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 may be carried forward
and expended in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 in the Medical Vendor Program. Revenues from
refunds and recoveries in the Medical Vendor Program are authorized to be expended in
Fiscal Year 2026-2027. No such carried forward funds, which are in excess of those
appropriated in this Act, may be expended without the express approval of the Division of
Administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Health may transfer, with the approval of the commissioner of administration
via midyear budget adjustment (BA-7 Form), up to twenty-five (25) authorized positions and
associated personnel services funding if necessary from one budget unit to any other budget
unit and/or between programs within any budget unit within this schedule. Not more than
an aggregate of one-hundred (100) positions and associated personal services may be
transferred between budget units and/or programs within a budget unit without the approval
of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Health is authorized to transfer, with the approval of the commissioner of
administration through midyear budget adjustments, funds and authorized positions from one
budget unit to any other budget unit and/or between programs within any budget unit within
this schedule. Such transfers shall be made solely to provide for the effective delivery of
services by the department, promote efficiencies and enhance the cost effective delivery of
services. Not more than six million dollars may be transferred pursuant to this authority. The
secretary and the commissioner shall promptly notify the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget of any such transfer.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department shall not be under any
obligation to perform any of the services as described in R.S. 46:2116, et seq., and may
utilize other revenue sources to provide these services if available. Provided, further, that any
additional funding for state plan personal assistance services may be used as state match for
available federal funds.
In addition to all other reductions required by this Act, the commissioner of administration
is hereby authorized and directed to reduce the aggregate total State General Fund (Direct)
appropriations in this Act to the Louisiana Department of Health by ($37,415,684).
Page 87 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
09-300 JEFFERSON PARISH HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Jefferson Parish Human Services Authority
Authorized Other Charges Positions (145) (141)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,868,981 $ 2,839,739
Discretionary Expenditures $ 17,460,073 $ 18,374,918
Program Description: Jefferson Parish Human Services Authority provides the
administration, management, and operation of mental health, developmental disabilities,
and substance abuse services for the citizens of Jefferson Parish.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 20,329,054 $ 21,214,657
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,868,981 $ 2,839,739
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,868,981 $ 2,839,739
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 12,554,907 $ 13,469,752
State General Fund By:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,180,166 $ 2,180,166
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,725,000 $ 2,725,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 17,460,073 $ 18,374,918
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 20,329,054 $ 21,214,657
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 20,329,054 $ 21,214,657
09-301 FLORIDA PARISHES HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Florida Parishes Human Services Authority
Authorized Other Charges Positions (181) (181)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,560,385 $ 3,733,890
Discretionary Expenditures $ 24,598,011 $ 25,586,097
Program Description: Florida Parishes Human Services Authority directs the operation
and management of public community-based programs and services relative to addictive
disorders, developmental disabilities, and mental health in the parishes of Livingston, St.
Helena, St. Tammany, Tangipahoa and Washington.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 28,158,396 $ 29,319,987
Page 88 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,489,205 $ 2,734,808
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 612,103 $ 570,904
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 428,472 $ 399,632
Federal Funds $ 30,605 $ 28,546
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 3,560,385 $ 3,733,890
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 14,051,559 $ 14,967,547
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 7,251,241 $ 7,292,440
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,325,816 $ 2,354,656
Federal Funds $ 969,395 $ 971,454
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 24,598,011 $ 25,586,097
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 1,038,220 $ 1,038,220
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 27,120,176 $ 28,281,767
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 28,158,396 $ 29,319,987
09-302 CAPITAL AREA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Capital Area Human Services District
Authorized Other Charges Positions (218) (216)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,375,741 $ 4,280,197
Discretionary Expenditures $ 27,523,041 $ 27,843,736
Program Description: Capital Area Human Services District directs the operation of
community-based programs and services related to behavioral health, developmental
disabilities, and substance abuse services for the parishes of Ascension, East Baton Rouge,
East Feliciana, Iberville, Pointe Coupee, West Baton Rouge, and West Feliciana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 31,898,782 $ 32,123,933
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,020,688 $ 4,280,197
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 274,644 $ 0
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 80,409 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,375,741 $ 4,280,197
Page 89 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 14,247,428 $ 14,213,070
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 9,802,914 $ 10,077,558
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 3,472,699 $ 3,553,108
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 27,523,041 $ 27,843,736
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 31,898,782 $ 32,123,933
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 31,898,782 $ 32,123,933
09-303 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Developmental Disabilities Council -
Authorized Positions (8) (8)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 166,788 $ 156,739
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,675,209 $ 2,456,840
Program Description: The Developmental Disabilities Council is a 28 member, Governor
appointed board whose function is to implement the Federal Developmental Disabilities
Assistance and Bill of Rights Act (P.L. 106-402; R.S. 28:750-758; R.S. 36:251) in Louisiana.
The focus of the Council is to facilitate change in Louisiana's system of supports and
services to individuals with disabilities and their families in order to enhance and improve
their quality of life. The Council plans and advocates for greater opportunities for
individuals with disabilities in all areas of life, and supports activities, initiatives and
practices that promote the successful implementation of the Council's Mission and mandate
for systems change.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 2,841,997 $ 2,613,579
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
Federal Funds $ 166,788 $ 156,739
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 166,788 $ 156,739
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,007,517 $ 757,517
Federal Funds $ 1,667,692 $ 1,699,323
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 2,675,209 $ 2,456,840
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 883,535 $ 900,232
Operating Expenses $ 150,985 $ 150,985
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 1,805,159 $ 1,558,362
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 2,318 $ 4,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 2,841,997 $ 2,613,579
Page 90 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Developmental Disabilities Council for
Families Helping Families $ 250,000
09-304 METROPOLITAN HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Metropolitan Human Services District
Authorized Other Charges Positions (121) (121)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,862,820 $ 2,427,242
Discretionary Expenditures $ 28,352,642 $ 28,753,414
Program Description: Metropolitan Human Services District provides the administration,
management, and operation of behavioral health and developmental disability services for
the citizens of Orleans, Plaquemines, and St. Bernard parishes.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 31,215,462 $ 31,180,656
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,862,820 $ 2,427,242
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,862,820 $ 2,427,242
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 15,428,561 $ 16,579,333
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 9,339,786 $ 9,339,786
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,229,243 $ 1,229,243
Federal Funds $ 2,355,052 $ 1,605,052
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 28,352,642 $ 28,753,414
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 31,215,462 $ 31,180,656
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 31,215,462 $ 31,180,656
09-305 MEDICAL VENDOR ADMINISTRATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Medical Vendor Administration -
Authorized Positions (2,158) (2,149)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 202,565,050 $ 243,034,176
Discretionary Expenditures $ 654,060,793 $ 709,368,025
Program Description: Develops, implements, and enforces the administrative and
programmatic policies of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) and
Medicaid programs with respect to eligibility, reimbursement, and monitoring of quality-
driven health care services in Louisiana, in concurrence with evidence-based best practices
as well as federal and state laws and regulations.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 856,625,843 $ 952,402,201
Page 91 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 45,356,611 $ 61,029,381
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 142,441 $ 700,900
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,186,500 $ 1,316,904
Statutory Dedications:
Medical Assistance Programs Fraud
Detection Fund $ 391,008 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 155,488,490 $ 179,986,991
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 202,565,050 $ 243,034,176
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 153,113,043 $ 223,996,110
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 41,523,130 $ 40,964,671
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 3,013,500 $ 2,883,096
Statutory Dedications:
Medical Assistance Programs Fraud
Detection Fund $ 1,016,492 $ 0
Fraud Detection Fund $ 724,294 $ 724,294
Modernization and Security Fund $ 5,000,000 $ 504,454
Federal Funds $ 449,670,334 $ 440,295,400
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 654,060,793 $ 709,368,025
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 170,256,996 $ 198,320,471
Operating Expenses $ 7,902,267 $ 8,815,329
Professional Services $ 278,899,583 $ 265,600,339
Other Charges $ 399,566,997 $ 479,666,062
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 856,625,843 $ 952,402,201
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Medical Vendor Administration Program for
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
(SNAP) activities, including four (4) authorized
positions $ 185,886
EXPENDITURES:
Medical Vendor Administration
for the Compliance and Audit Team $ 400,041
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 400,041
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 200,021
Federal Funds $ 200,020
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 400,041
EXPENDITURES:
Medical Vendor Administration
for the Medicaid call center $ 5,958,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 5,958,000
Page 92 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,489,500
Federal Funds $ 4,468,500
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 5,958,000
09-306 MEDICAL VENDOR PAYMENTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Payments to Private Providers -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 6,734,162,948 $ 7,860,075,754
Discretionary Expenditures $13,853,453,134 $11,185,794,292
Program Description: Provides payments to private providers of health care services to
Louisiana residents who are eligible for Title XIX (Medicaid), while ensuring that
reimbursements to providers of medical services to Medicaid recipients are appropriate.
Payments to Public Providers -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 77,776,334 $ 74,857,875
Discretionary Expenditures $ 186,580,337 $ 193,449,920
Program Description: Provides payments to public providers of health care services to
Louisiana residents who are eligible for Title XIX (Medicaid), while ensuring that
reimbursements to providers of medical services to Medicaid recipients are appropriate.
Medicare Buy-Ins & Supplements -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 887,692,709 $ 896,137,878
Discretionary Expenditures $ 14,011,791 $ 5,566,622
Program Description: Provides medical insurance for eligible Medicaid and CHIP
enrollees through the payment of premiums to other entities. This avoids potential
additional Medicaid costs for those eligible individuals who cannot afford to pay their own
“out-of-pocket” Medicare costs.
Uncompensated Care Costs -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 76,854,498 $ 76,854,498
Discretionary Expenditures $ 226,721,973 $ 215,523,782
Program Description: Payments to inpatient and outpatient medical care providers
serving a disproportionately large number of uninsured and low-income individuals.
Hospitals are reimbursed for their uncompensated care costs associated with the free care
which they provide.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $22,057,235,724 $20,508,260,621
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,876,752,556 $ 1,793,787,246
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 69,405,245 $ 9,326,711
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 97,271,262 $ 135,491
Statutory Dedications:
Health Excellence Fund $ 4,885,591 $ 4,626,441
Hospital Stabilization Fund $ 131,877,586 $ 134,281,049
Louisiana Fund $ 3,940,148 $ 4,023,065
Louisiana Medical Assistance Trust Fund $ 292,389,555 $ 744,418,067
Page 93 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
New Opportunities Waiver Fund $ 43,348,066 $ 43,348,066
Community Options Waiver Fund $ 12,081,168 $ 18,781,270
Federal Funds $ 5,244,535,312 $ 6,155,198,599
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 7,776,486,489 $8,907,926,005
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 618,056,667 $ 676,738,081
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 161,108,273 $ 183,438,272
Fees & Self-generated Revenue $ 772,790,347 $ 685,429,662
Statutory Dedications:
Disability Services Fund $ 2,388,500 $ 2,388,500
Health Excellence Fund $ 21,029,508 $ 19,914,022
Hospital Stabilization Fund $ 516,354,655 $ 525,765,197
Louisiana Fund $ 16,746,583 $ 17,099,001
Louisiana Medical Assistance Trust Fund $ 807,871,769 $ 271,963,572
Medicaid Trust Fund for the Elderly $ 1,741,651 $ 0
Federal Funds $11,362,661,282 $ 9,217,598,309
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $14,280,749,235 $11,600,334,616
Expenditure Controls:
Provided, however, that the Louisiana Department of Health may, to control expenditures
to the level appropriated herein for the Medical Vendor Payments program, negotiate
supplemental rebates for the Medicaid pharmacy program in conjunction with the preferred
drug list. In these negotiations, the preferred drug list may be adjusted to limit brand name
drug products in each therapeutic category while ensuring appropriate access to medically
necessary medication.
Provided, however, that the Louisiana Department of Health shall continue with the
implementation of sustainability strategies to control the costs of the
Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities Home and Community Based Waivers in order that
the continued provision of Community Based Waivers for the citizens with developmental
disabilities is not jeopardized.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $22,057,235,724 $20,512,160,621
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $22,057,235,724 $20,512,160,621
EXPENDITURES:
Payments to Private Providers Program for 750
Community Choice Waiver slots $ 10,331,872
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,331,872
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Community Options Waiver Fund $ 3,300,000
Federal Funds $ 7,031,872
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 10,331,872
Page 94 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Provided, however, that from the monies appropriated to the Payments to Private Providers
Program, the amount of $728,042 in State General Fund (Direct) shall be allocated to the
Covenant House New Orleans for youth homelessness initiatives.
Provided, however, that from the monies appropriated to the Payments to Private Providers
Program, the amount of $784,370 in State General Fund (Direct), $18,861 in Statutory
Dedications out of the Medical Assistance Trust Fund, and $1,711,582 in Federal Funds
shall be allocated for medically necessary dental procedures required for clearance to receive
another Medicaid-covered medical procedure, in the event that House Bill No. 222 of the
2026 Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature becomes law.
Payable out of Federal Funds to the
Payments to Public Providers Program
for Medicaid payments to the Office for
Citizens with Developmental Disabilities $ 2,600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Payments to Private Providers Program $ 1,791,584
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program by reducing the appropriation out
of the State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Fund by
($1,791,584).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Health
Excellence Fund to the Payments to
Private Providers Program $ 17,430,105
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program by reducing the appropriation out
of the State General Fund (Direct) by ($17,430,105).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program by reducing the appropriation out
of the State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Medical Assistance
Trust Fund by ($2,169,491).
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Payments to Private Providers Program by reducing the appropriation out
of Federal Funds by ($67,556,830).
EXPENDITURES:
Payments to Private Providers Program
for an increase in the Medicaid
reimbursement rates for Vagus Nerve
Stimulation Therapy Implants $ 1,000,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,000,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 319,400
Federal Funds $ 680,600
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 1,000,000
Page 95 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
EXPENDITURES:
Payments to Private Providers Program
for increases in the reimbursement rates
for Medicaid home and community-based
services for individuals with developmental,
intellectual or adult-onset disabilities $ 33,562,930
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 33,562,930
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Community Options Waiver Fund $ 3,985,866
Disability Services Fund $ 6,734,134
Federal Funds $ 22,842,930
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 33,562,930
Provided, however, that the department shall consult with stakeholders representing
individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities and stakeholders representing
individuals with adult-onset disabilities in the development of the structure of the Medicaid
reimbursement rate increases for home and community-based services for which funding is
appropriated herein.
Provided, however, that from the monies appropriated to the Payments to Private Providers
Program, the amount of $2,500,000 in State General Fund (Direct) and $7,916,667 in
Federal Funds shall be allocated for an increase in the Medicaid reimbursement rates for
independent rural health clinics, in the event that House Bill No. 971 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
09-307 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Management and Finance Program-
Authorized Positions (748) (753)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (0) (15)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 22,810,604 $ 28,104,710
Discretionary Expenditures $ 133,847,561 $ 322,860,761
Program Description: Provides management, supervision and support services for: Legal
Services; Media and Communications; Executive Administration; Fiscal Management;
Planning and Budget; Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports; Minority Health
Access and Planning; Health Standards; Disability Determination Services; Program
Integrity and Internal Audit.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 156,658,165 $ 350,965,471
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 13,014,789 $ 15,971,207
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 6,184,965 $ 6,477,533
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 501,359 $ 364,829
Statutory Dedications:
Medical Assistance Program Fraud
Detection Program $ 9,495 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 3,099,996 $ 5,291,141
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 22,810,604 $ 28,104,710
Page 96 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 51,613,352 $ 59,999,942
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 7,795,219 $ 8,919,686
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,368,042 $ 2,504,572
Statutory Dedications:
Medical Assistance Program Fraud
Detection Fund $ 90,505 $ 0
Nursing Home Residents' Trust Fund $ 150,000 $ 150,000
Early Childhood Supports and Services
Program Fund $ 9,000,000 $ 7,151,560
Health Care Employment Reinvestment
Opportunity (H.E.R.O.) Fund $ 14,904,814 $ 0
Rural Primary Care Physicians
Development Fund $ 0 $ 2,673,634
Federal Funds $ 47,925,629 $ 241,461,367
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 133,847,561 $ 322,860,761
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 79,855,609 $ 92,873,070
Operating Expenses $ 2,198,602 $ 5,759,643
Professional Services $ 6,999,705 $ 10,099,881
Other Charges $ 67,604,249 $ 257,600,618
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 156,658,165 $ 366,333,212
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Management and Finance Program for
CrescentCare Health Clinic facility
improvements $ 250,000
Payable out of Federal Funds for personnel
costs of Disability Determination Services staff $ 1,790,438
Payable out of the State General Fund by Statutory
Dedications out of the Health Care Employment
Reinvestment Opportunity (H.E.R.O.) Fund
for grant funding $ 11,948,055
09-309 SOUTH CENTRAL LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
South Central Louisiana Human Services Authority
Authorized Other Charges Positions (144) (147)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,982,109 $ 3,104,425
Discretionary Expenditures $ 26,606,126 $ 26,302,602
Program Description: South Central Louisiana Human Services Authority provides access
for individuals with behavioral health and developmental disabilities to integrated primary
care and community-based services while promoting wellness, recovery, and independence
through education and the choice of a broad range of programmatic and community
resources to the parishes of Assumption, Lafourche, St. Charles, St. James, St. John the
Baptist, St. Mary, and Terrebonne.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 29,588,235 $ 29,407,027
Page 97 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,359,175 $ 2,493,150
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 357,478 $ 324,486
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 265,456 $ 240,955
Federal Funds $ 0 $ 45,834
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,982,109 $ 3,104,425
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 15,685,327 $ 16,370,144
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 7,586,255 $ 6,456,247
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,834,544 $ 3,022,045
Federal Funds $ 500,000 $ 454,166
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 26,606,126 $ 26,302,602
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 2,279,323 $ 2,279,323
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 27,308,912 $ 27,127,704
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 29,588,235 $ 29,407,027
09-310 NORTHEAST DELTA HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Northeast Delta Human Services Authority
Authorized Other Charges Positions (97) (99)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,982,886 $ 1,975,199
Discretionary Expenditures $ 16,227,595 $ 16,396,627
Program Description: Northeast Delta Human Services Authority increases public
awareness of and provides access for individuals with behavioral health and developmental
disabilities to integrated community-based services while promoting wellness, recovery, and
independence through education and the choice of a broad range of programmatic and
community resources for the parishes of Jackson, Lincoln, Union, Morehouse, West Carroll,
East Carroll, Ouachita, Richland, Madison, Caldwell, Franklin, and Tensas.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 18,210,481 $ 18,371,826
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,595,117 $ 1,606,975
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 361,067 $ 342,868
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 26,702 $ 25,356
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,982,886 $ 1,975,199
Page 98 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 11,051,500 $ 11,507,587
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,122,353 $ 4,140,552
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,053,742 $ 748,488
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 16,227,595 $ 16,396,627
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 18,210,481 $ 18,371,826
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 18,210,481 $ 18,371,826
09-320 OFFICE OF AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration Protection and Support -
Authorized Positions (218) (219)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 22,182,263 $ 23,767,721
Discretionary Expenditures $ 27,109,922 $ 33,252,578
Program Description: Provides access to quality long-term services and supports for the
elderly and adults with disabilities in a manner that supports choice, informal caregiving,
and effective use of public resources.
Villa Feliciana Medical Complex -
Authorized Positions (216) (216)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,809,859 $ 5,205,025
Discretionary Expenditures $ 26,983,212 $ 26,919,176
Program Description: Provides long-term care, rehabilitative services, infectious disease
services, and an acute care hospital for medically complex residents with chronic diseases,
disabilities, and terminal illnesses.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 60,000 $ 60,000
Program Description: Provides residents with opportunities to participate in therapeutic
activities as approved by their treatment teams. It also provides therapeutic and social
activities to create a homelike atmosphere and environment for residents.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 81,145,256 $ 89,204,500
Page 99 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 20,410,488 $ 20,770,094
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 6,416,974 $ 8,049,983
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 65,167 $ 56,120
Statutory Dedications:
Traumatic Brain and Spinal Cord
Injury Trust Fund $ 99,493 $ 96,549
Federal Funds $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 26,992,122 $ 28,972,746
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,828,700 $ 4,962,252
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 46,016,247 $ 50,949,324
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 717,513 $ 726,560
Statutory Dedications:
Nursing Home Residents' Trust Fund $ 2,300,000 $ 2,300,000
Traumatic Brain and Spinal Cord
Injury Trust Fund $ 1,108,941 $ 1,111,885
Federal Funds $ 181,733 $ 181,733
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 54,153,134 $ 60,231,754
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 49,970,487 $ 49,614,145
Operating Expenses $ 6,095,352 $ 6,295,868
Professional Services $ 1,516,351 $ 1,584,351
Other Charges $ 23,563,066 $ 31,213,653
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 496,483
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 81,145,256 $ 89,204,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administration Protection and Support
Program for the Permanent Supportive Housing
Program $ 2,582,289
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Protection and Support Program by reducing the
appropriation out of the State General Fund by Interagency Transfers by ($2,582,289).
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Traumatic Brain
and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund to the
Administration Protection and Support Program $ 200,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Administration Protection and Support Program by reducing the
appropriation out of the State General Fund (Direct) by ($200,000).
Page 100 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
09-324 LOUISIANA EMERGENCY RESPONSE NETWORK
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Emergency Response Network -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 245,859 $ 236,424
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,038,871 $ 2,127,919
Program Description: To safeguard the public health, safety and welfare of the people of
the State of Louisiana against unnecessary trauma and time-sensitive related deaths and
incidents of morbidity due to trauma.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 2,284,730 $ 2,364,343
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 245,859 $ 236,424
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 245,859 $ 236,424
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,998,871 $ 2,094,419
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 40,000 $ 33,500
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 2,038,871 $ 2,127,919
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,447,585 $ 1,510,825
Operating Expenses $ 195,183 $ 195,183
Professional Services $ 392,840 $ 392,840
Other Charges $ 249,122 $ 265,495
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 2,284,730 $ 2,364,343
09-325 ACADIANA AREA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Acadiana Area Human Services District
Authorized Other Charges Positions (119) (118)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,390,158 $ 2,326,520
Discretionary Expenditures $ 20,344,768 $ 21,249,118
Program Description: Acadiana Area Human Services District increases public awareness
of and provides access for individuals with behavioral health and developmental disabilities
to integrated community-based services while promoting wellness, recovery, and
independence through education and the choice of a broad range of programmatic and
community resources in the parishes of Acadia, Evangeline, Iberia, Lafayette, St. Landry,
St. Martin, and Vermilion.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 22,734,926 $ 23,575,638
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,390,158 $ 2,326,520
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,390,158 $ 2,326,520
Page 101 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 12,700,658 $ 13,605,008
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 5,107,914 $ 5,107,914
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,536,196 $ 1,536,196
Federal Funds $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 20,344,768 $ 21,249,118
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 176,386 $ 176,386
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 22,558,540 $ 23,399,252
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 22,734,926 $ 23,575,638
09-326 OFFICE OF PUBLIC HEALTH
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Public Health Services -
Authorized Positions (1,234) (1,230)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 57,896,433 $ 58,853,494
Discretionary Expenditures $ 541,285,276 $ 536,157,867
Program Description: 1) Operate a centralized vital event registry and health data
analysis office for the government and people of the state of Louisiana. To collect,
transcribe, compile, analyze, report, preserve, amend, and issue vital records including
birth, death, fetal death, abortion, marriage, and divorce certificates and operate the
Louisiana Putative Father Registry, the Orleans Parish Marriage License Office, and with
recording all adoptions, legitimatizations, and other judicial edicts that affect the state’s
vital records. To also maintain the state’s health statistics repository and publishes the Vital
Statistics Reports and the Louisiana Health Report Card. 2) Provide for and assure
educational, clinical, and preventive services to Louisiana citizens to promote reduced
morbidity and mortality resulting from: Chronic diseases; Infectious/communicable
diseases; High risk conditions of infancy and childhood; Accidental and unintentional
injuries. 3) Provide for the leadership, administrative oversight, and grants management
for those programs related to the provision of preventive health services to the citizens of
the state. 4) Promote a reduction in infectious and chronic disease morbidity and mortality
and a reduction in communicable/infectious disease through the promulgation,
implementation and enforcement of the State Sanitary Code.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 599,181,709 $ 595,011,361
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 12,660,835 $ 10,293,637
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 225,710 $ 146,847
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 25,947,460 $ 28,183,199
Statutory Dedications:
Telecommunications for the Deaf Fund $ 80,282 $ 74,281
Federal Funds $ 18,982,146 $ 20,155,530
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 57,896,433 $ 58,853,494
Page 102 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 59,435,507 $ 60,809,275
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 84,780,216 $ 85,493,662
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 31,610,112 $ 30,229,288
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Vital Records Conversion Dedicated
Fund Account $ 425,404 $ 1,675,404
Oyster Sanitation Dedicated Fund Account $ 274,089 $ 174,350
Emergency Medical Technician Dedicated
Fund Account $ 0 $ 28,000
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Fund $ 9,815,747 $ 9,815,747
Telecommunications for the Deaf Fund $ 5,430,657 $ 5,436,658
Rural Primary Care Physicians
Development Fund $ 2,673,634 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 346,839,910 $ 342,495,483
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 541,285,276 $ 536,157,867
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 147,099,093 $ 150,192,884
Operating Expenses $ 32,847,095 $ 32,082,044
Professional Services $ 61,279,572 $ 60,538,614
Other Charges $ 357,557,478 $ 352,197,819
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 398,471 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 599,181,709 $ 595,011,361
09-327 OFFICE OF THE SURGEON GENERAL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of the Surgeon General -
Authorized Positions (7) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 88,915 $ 74,737
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,731,247 $ 683,535
Program Description: The Office of the Surgeon General shall be responsible for leading
and coordinating efforts of the Louisiana Department of Health that are intended to provide
clinical and medical guidance and recommendations to improve health outcomes for all
residents of this state, across all populations and age groups. The department may
consolidate efforts on healthcare provisions and outcomes for all programs within the
department as deemed appropriate by the secretary of the department after consultation with
the surgeon general. The surgeon general shall serve as the chief medical officer of the
Louisiana Department of Health and the state’s leading advocate for wellness and disease
prevention.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 4,820,162 $ 758,272
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 88,915 $ 74,737
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 88,915 $ 74,737
Page 103 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,702,530 $ 683,535
Federal Funds $ 3,028,717 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 4,731,247 $ 683,535
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,162,636 $ 636,100
Operating Expenses $ 30,377 $ 21,977
Professional Services $ 302,559 $ 0
Other Charges $ 3,324,590 $ 100,195
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 4,820,162 $ 758,272
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of the Surgeon General Program
to align with projected expenditures $ 91,155
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of the Surgeon General Program for
personal services $ 88,711
09-330 OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Behavioral Health Administration and
Community Oversight -
Authorized Positions (108) (110)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 8,292,644 $ 8,565,004
Discretionary Expenditures $ 125,410,623 $ 136,061,099
Program Description: The Behavioral Health Administration and Community Oversight
Program provides the results oriented managerial, fiscal, and supportive functions,
including business intelligence, quality management, and evaluation and research, which
are necessary to advance state behavioral health care goals, adhere to state and federal
funding requirements, monitor the operations of Medicaid-related specialized behavioral
health services and support the provision of behavioral health services for non-Medicaid
adults and children not within the scope of Healthy Louisiana.
Hospital Based Treatment -
Authorized Positions (1,526) (1,523)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 296,074,497 $ 297,817,450
Discretionary Expenditures $ 67,938,752 $ 47,651,221
Program Description: The Hospital Based Treatment Program provides comprehensive,
integrated, evidence-informed treatment and support services, enabling persons to function
at their optimal level, thus promoting recovery.
Auxiliary Account
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 20,000 $ 20,000
Program Description: The Auxiliary Program provides therapeutic activities to patients
as approved by treatment teams.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 497,736,516 $ 490,114,774
Page 104 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 186,718,290 $ 187,136,700
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 119,381,266 $ 119,049,722
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 20,092 $ 18,993
Federal Funds $ 725,907 $ 177,039
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 306,845,555 $ 306,382,454
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 53,095,345 $ 67,585,300
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 48,782,513 $ 26,183,700
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,367,058 $ 1,368,157
Statutory Dedications:
Behavioral Health and Wellness Fund $ 1,400,000 $ 1,400,000
Compulsive and Problem Gaming Fund $ 5,600,000 $ 5,845,000
Health Care Facility Fund $ 280,000 $ 280,000
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 1,565,801 $ 1,721,051
Federal Funds $ 78,800,244 $ 79,349,112
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 190,890,961 $ 183,732,320
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 181,157,449 $ 183,758,405
Operating Expenses $ 46,470,094 $ 46,484,596
Professional Services $ 12,101,588 $ 12,101,588
Other Charges $ 255,946,483 $ 247,770,185
Acquisitions/ Major Repairs $ 2,060,902 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 497,736,516 $ 490,114,774
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Behavioral Health and Community Oversight
Program for the Crisis Center in
Shreveport for start-up costs $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Compulsive
and Problem Gaming Fund to the Behavioral
Health Administration and Community
Oversight Program $ 180,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Health
Care Facility Fund to the Hospital Based
Treatment Program $ 50,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Hospital Based Treatment Program by reducing the appropriation out of
the State General Fund (Direct) by ($50,000).
Page 105 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
09-340 OFFICE OF INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY
SUPPORTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration and General Support Program -
Authorized Positions (91) (92)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,035,315 $ 4,990,680
Discretionary Expenditures $ 17,229,125 $ 14,826,322
Program Description: Provides effective and responsive leadership of the developmental
disabilities services system. The Administration Program provides system design, policy
direction, administrative support functions, and operational oversight for the four waiver
services, the state-operated supports and services center, and resource centers.
Community-Based Program -
Authorized Positions (58) (60)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,399,481 $ 3,154,884
Discretionary Expenditures $ 37,101,940 $ 37,674,018
Program Description: Manages the delivery of individualized community-based supports
and services including Home and Community-based (HCBS) waiver services, through
assessments, information/choice, planning and referral, in a manner that affords
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities to achieve their personally defined
outcomes and goals. Community–Family Support, Pre-Admission Screening & Resident
Review (PASRR), Single Point of Entry, Early Steps, and the four waiver programs (New
Opportunities Waiver, Children’s Choice Waiver, Supports Waiver and Residential Options
Waiver), and the Money Follows the Person Demonstration Grant.
Pinecrest Supports and Services Center -
Authorized Positions (1,329) (1,329)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 20,645,810 $ 19,663,547
Discretionary Expenditures $ 119,367,782 $ 123,312,555
Program Description: Provides for the administration and operation of the Pinecrest
Supports and Services Center (PSSC) to ensure quality services and/or supports to the
maximum number of individuals within the available resources. Support the provision of
opportunities for more accessible, integrated and community-based living options. The
Residential Services activity provides specialized residential services to individuals with
developmental disabilities and co morbid complex medical, behavioral, and psychiatric
needs in a manner that supports the goal of returning or transitioning individuals to
community-based options. Services include operation of 24-hour support and active
treatment services delivered in the Intermediate Care Facility/Developmental Disabilities
(ICF/DD) facility to services provided to persons who live in their own homes. The
Resource Center activity administers Resource Centers services whose primary functions
include building community capacity, partnerships and collaborative relationships with
providers, community professionals, other state agencies, educational institutions,
professional organizations and other stakeholders to efficiently target gaps and improve
multiple efforts. Other services provided through the Resource Centers activity include
statewide supports and services to people who need intensive treatment intervention to allow
them to remain in their community living setting. This includes initial and ongoing
assessment, psychiatric services, family support and education, support coordination and
any other services critical to an individual’s ability to live successfully in the community.
The closed facilities activity provides for the ongoing costs associated with closed or
privatized facilities.
Central Louisiana Supports and Services -
Authorized Positions (197) (197)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,159,078 $ 2,155,251
Discretionary Expenditures $ 23,239,052 $ 24,737,637
Page 106 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides support services for the Instructional and Residential
Activities, provides instructional services through a total program designed to
“mainstream” or return the individual to his or her parish as a contributor to society, and
provides total residential care including training and specialized treatment services to
orthopedically handicapped individuals to maximize self-help skills for independent living.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 35,167 $ 32,799
Discretionary Expenditures $ 630,551 $ 648,250
Program Description: Provides therapeutic activities to patients, as approved by treatment
teams, funded by the sale of merchandise.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 225,843,301 $ 231,195,943
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,162,923 $ 6,936,968
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 23,585,227 $ 22,562,352
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 35,167 $ 32,799
Federal Funds $ 491,534 $ 465,042
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ $28,274,851 $ 29,997,161
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 36,558,172 $ 34,760,863
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 147,836,306 153,316,449
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 4,105,446 $ 4,123,145
Statutory Dedications:
Disability Services Fund $ 1,743,513 $ 1,646,820
Federal Funds $ 7,325,013 $ 7,351,505
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 197,568,450 $ 201,198,782
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 148,038,011 $ 152,831,302
Operating Expenses $ 17,662,831 $ 17,662,831
Professional Services $ 10,035,042 $ 10,285,042
Other Charges $ 46,194,750 $ 46,318,968
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 3,912,667 $ 4,097,800
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 225,843,301 $ 231,195,943
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from Medical Vendor
Payments to Central Louisiana Supports and
Services Center for acquisitions and major
repairs $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from Medical Vendor
Payments to Pinecrest Supports and Services
Center for acquisitions, major repairs, and
professional services $ 2,000,000
Page 107 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Disability
Services Fund to the Communty-Based
Program $ 1,770,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Community-Based Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($1,770,000).
09-350 OFFICE ON WOMEN'S HEALTH AND COMMUNITY HEALTH
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office on Women’s Health and Community Health -
Authorized Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 174,643 $ 218,641
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,132,594 $ 1,037,647
Program Description: The Office on Women's Health and Community Health serves as a
clearinghouse, coordinating agency, and resource center for women's health data and
strategies, services, programs, and initiatives that address women’s health-related concerns.
This office focuses on health needs throughout a woman's life, including chronic or acute
conditions that significantly affect women, access to healthcare for women, and women's
health disparities.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,307,237 $ 1,256,288
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 174,643 $ 176,578
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 0 $ 42,063
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 174,643 $ 218,641
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 879,186 $ 826,302
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 253,408 $ 211,345
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,132,594 $ 1,037,647
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,148,286 $ 1,182,056
Operating Expenses $ 19,214 $ 19,214
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 139,737 $ 55,018
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,307,237 $ 1,256,288
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office on Women's Health and Community
Health Program for the Lupus Commission in the event
House Bill No. 237 of the 2026 Regular Session
of the Louisiana Legislature becomes law $ 109,985
Page 108 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to develop the infrastructure for data analysis
and reporting, resource coordination, and
stakeholder engagement to improve collaboration
and advance women's health innovation and
outcomes $ 930,000
09-375 IMPERIAL CALCASIEU HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Imperial Calcasieu Human Services Authority
Authorized Other Charges Positions (84) (82)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,534,994 $ 1,660,345
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,768,970 $ 13,520,284
Program Description: Imperial Calcasieu Human Services Authority ensures that citizens
with mental health, addictions, and developmental challenges residing in the parishes of
Allen, Beauregard, Calcasieu, Cameron, and Jefferson Davis are empowered and self-
determination is valued such that individuals live satisfying, hopeful, and contributing lives.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 14,303,964 $ 15,180,629
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,314,998 $ 1,226,958
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 125,542 $ 333,268
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 81,875 $ 86,338
Federal Funds $ 12,579 $ 13,781
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,534,994 $ 1,660,345
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 8,328,795 $ 9,293,500
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 3,059,629 $ 2,851,903
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,268,125 $ 1,263,662
Federal Funds $ 112,421 $ 111,219
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 12,768,970 $ 13,520,284
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 1,467,000 $ 1,467,000
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 12,836,964 $ 13,713,629
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 14,303,964 $ 15,180,629
09-376 CENTRAL LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Central Louisiana Human Services District
Authorized Other Charges Positions (89) (88)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,666,235 $ 1,766,845
Discretionary Expenditures $ 16,960,436 $ 17,293,571
Page 109 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Central Louisiana Human Services District increases public
awareness of and provides access for individuals with behavioral health and developmental
disabilities to integrated community-based services while promoting wellness, recovery, and
independence through education and the choice of a broad range of programmatic and
community resources for the parishes of Grant, Winn, LaSalle, Catahoula, Concordia,
Avoyelles, Rapides, and Vernon.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 18,626,671 $ 19,060,416
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,379,250 $ 1,493,398
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 286,985 $ 273,447
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,666,235 $ 1,766,845
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 9,534,902 $ 9,854,499
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 6,425,534 $ 6,439,072
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 16,960,436 $ 17,293,571
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 18,626,671 $ 19,060,416
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 18,626,671 $ 19,060,416
09-377 NORTHWEST LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Northwest Louisiana Human Services District
Authorized Other Charges Positions (91) (91)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,558,796 $ 1,601,711
Discretionary Expenditures $ 15,037,185 $ 15,419,985
Program Description: Northwest Louisiana Human Services District increases public
awareness of and to provides access for individuals with behavioral health and
developmental disabilities to integrated community-based services while promoting
wellness, recovery, and independence through education and the choice of a broad range
of programmatic and community resources for the parishes of Caddo, Bossier, Webster,
Claiborne, Bienville, Red River, Desoto, Sabine and Natchitoches.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 16,595,981 $ 17,021,696
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,212,842 $ 1,305,441
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 169,453 $ 160,247
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 176,501 $ 136,023
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,558,796 $ 1,601,711
Page 110 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 8,135,895 $ 8,469,011
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 6,077,791 $ 6,086,997
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 823,499 $ 863,977
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 15,037,185 $ 15,419,985
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 16,595,981 $ 17,021,696
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 16,595,981 $ 17,021,696
SCHEDULE 10
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
The Department of Children and Family Services is hereby authorized to promulgate
emergency rules to facilitate the expenditure of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
(TANF) funds as authorized in this Act.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Secretary of the Department of Children and
Family Services may transfer, with the approval of the Commissioner of Administration, via
mid-year budget adjustment (BA-7 Form), up to 25 authorized positions and associated
personal services funding between programs within a budget unit within this Schedule. Not
more than an aggregate of 100 positions and associated personal services funding may be
transferred between programs within a budget unit without the approval of the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Provided, however, that the department shall submit a bi-monthly status report on the Child
Welfare System Modernization Project and any other child welfare related technology
project to the commissioner of administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget.
10-360 OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Division of Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (259) (257)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 40,107,609 $ 37,373,043
Discretionary Expenditures $ 107,504,987 $ 120,079,932
Program Description: Coordinates department efforts by providing leadership, support,
and oversight to all Department of Children and Family Services programs. This program
will promote efficient professional and timely responses to employees, partners, and clients.
Major functions of this program include the Office of the Secretary, Bureau of Audit and
Compliance, General Counsel, Fiscal Services, Budget, Administrative Services, Systems,
Digital Services, Procurement, and Human Resources.
Division of Child Welfare -
Authorized Positions (1,540) (1,540)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 285,124,325 $ 290,301,532
Discretionary Expenditures $ 122,785,212 $ 129,036,561
Page 111 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides for the public child welfare functions of the state, including
prevention services that promote safety and the well-being of children to prevent child abuse
and neglect; child protective services; family strengthening and support services; stability
and permanence for foster children in the state’s custody; adoption placement services for
foster children; foster and adoptive recruitment and training of foster and adoptive parents;
and subsidies for adoptive parents of special needs children.
Division of Family Support -
Authorized Positions (387) (387)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 99,189,334 $ 72,890,607
Discretionary Expenditures $ 133,126,269 $ 142,675,132
Program Description: Makes payments directly to, or on behalf of, eligible recipients for
the following: Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funded services and
initiatives; payments to child day care and transportation providers, and for various
supportive services for FITAP and other eligible recipients; incentive payments to District
Attorneys for child support enforcement activities; and cash grants to impoverished
refugees, and repatriated U.S. citizens. Also is responsible for the Customer Service Call
Center and monitoring domestic violence services contracts. Child support enforcement
payments are held in trust by the agency for the custodial parent and do not flow through
the agency's budget.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 787,837,736 $ 792,356,807
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 159,217,853 $ 142,687,281
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 13,374,757 $ 18,758,736
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 15,489,397 $ 13,998,643
Federal Funds $ 236,339,261 $ 225,120,522
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 424,421,268 $ 400,565,182
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 93,333,707 $ 127,624,075
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,207,189 $ 4,229,695
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,052,841 $ 1,081,122
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Battered Women Shelter
Dedicated Fund Account $ 92,753 $ 92,753
Federal Funds $ 264,729,978 $ 258,763,980
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 363,416,468 $ 391,791,625
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 295,571,020 $ 283,207,143
Operating Expenses $ 30,184,611 $ 25,967,962
Professional Services $ 1,879,794 $ 11,607,994
Other Charges $ 460,202,311 $ 471,573,708
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 787,837,736 $ 792,356,807
Page 112 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Division of Family Support Program for
youth and family support programs $ 400,000
Provided, however, that from the monies appropriated from State General Fund (Direct), the
amount of $4,000,000 shall be allocated to the Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care
Initiative.
SCHEDULE 11
DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND ENERGY
11-431 CONSERVATION AND ENERGY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Natural Resource Management -
Authorized Positions (378) (376)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 10,034,341 $ 10,594,520
Discretionary Expenditures $ 217,095,140 $ 190,691,132
Program Description: Promotes sustainable and responsible use of energy and natural
resources of our state. The Executive Office of the Secretary, provides leadership,
coordination, and policy direction to ensure consistency across the department. The Office
of Permitting and Compliance and the Office of Enforcement oversees permitting,
compliance, and enforcement activities to ensure responsible development and regulatory
accountability. The Office of State Resources manages and stewards the state’s natural
resource assets for long-term public benefit under the direction of the State Mineral and
Energy Board. The Office of Energy supports energy policy, development, regulatory
reporting, and data tracking to advance efficient use of traditional and alternative energy
resources. The Office of Administration supports departmental operations and financial
systems, including oversight of the Natural Resources Trust Authority to ensure financial
security and responsible resource development. In addition, the Louisiana Oil Spill
Coordinator’s Office ensures statewide preparedness and response to oil spills, coordinating
efforts to protect public health, environmental resources, and coastal and inland waters.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 227,129,481 $ 201,285,652
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,667,348 $ 2,875,705
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,313,964 $ 1,260,264
Fees & Self-generated Revenues
Dedicated Fund Accounts:
Oil and Gas Regulatory
Dedicated Fund Account $ 1,977,399 $ 1,844,760
Statutory Dedications:
Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage
Trust Fund $ 117,854 $ 148,390
Mineral and Energy Operation Fund $ 1,414,243 $ 1,780,674
Oilfield Site Restoration Fund $ 353,561 $ 445,169
Oil Spill Contingency Fund $ 471,415 $ 590,774
Federal Funds $ 1,718,557 $ 1,648,784
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 10,034,341 $ 10,594,520
Page 113 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 26,353,686 $ 20,877,956
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 5,933,891 $ 2,147,880
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 212,011 $ 706,758
Fees & Self-generated Revenues
Dedicated Fund Accounts:
Coastal Resources Trust
Dedicated Fund Account $ 4,186,554 $ 4,136,554
Fisherman's Gear Compensation and
Underwater Obstruction Removal
Dedicated Fund Account $ 982,000 $ 982,000
Oil and Gas Regulatory
Dedicated Fund Account $ 13,104,350 $ 12,638,792
Statutory Dedications:
Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage
Trust Fund $ 2,666,245 $ 2,635,709
Mineral and Energy Operation Fund $ 10,117,110 $ 14,853,816
Natural Resources Restoration Fund $ 2,175,000 $ 2,175,000
Oilfield Site Restoration Fund $ 27,619,290 $ 19,027,099
Oil Spill Contingency Fund $ 7,262,411 $ 7,143,052
Modernization and Security Fund $ 2,500,000 $ 0
Natural Resources Financial Security Fund $ 0 $ 876,080
Federal Funds $ 113,982,592 $ 102,490,436
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 217,095,140 $ 190,691,132
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 45,562,228 $ 48,899,110
Operating Expenses $ 38,090,452 $ 28,033,593
Professional Services $ 22,719,532 $ 12,046,226
Other Charges $ 119,141,980 $ 111,654,323
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,615,289 $ 652,400
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 227,129,481 $ 201,285,652
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the
Coastal Resources Trust Dedicated Fund Account
to the Natural Resource Management Program
for the Northwest Little Lake Marsh Creation
project $ 2,600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the Oil
and Gas Regulatory Dedicated Fund Account to
the Natural Resource Management Program for
mitigation efforts of a sulfur mine salt dome collapse,
in the event that House Bill No. 313 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature
becomes law $ 5,000,000
Page 114 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Carbon Dioxide
Geologic Storage Trust Fund to the Natural
Resource Management Program for cooperative
endeavor agreements with laboratories, in the
event the House Bill No. 313 of the 2026 Regular
Session of the Louisiana Legislature
becomes law $ 1,000,000
SCHEDULE 12
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURE FORECAST
In accordance with Act 401 of the 2017 Regular Legislative Session, below is the listing of
the incentive expenditure programs due to the most recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast. This department administers the following incentive expenditure programs:
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURES: AUTHORITY FORECAST
Procurement Processing Company Rebate Program R.S. 47:6351 $ 83,864,000
New Markets Tax Credit R.S. 47:6016.1 $ 11,250,000
12-440 OFFICE OF REVENUE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Tax Collection -
Authorized Positions (635) (635)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (15) (15)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 18,661,059 $ 18,558,715
Discretionary Expenditures $ 111,592,619 $ 101,770,949
Program Description: Comprises the entire tax collection effort of the office, which is
organized into four major divisions and the Office of Legal Affairs. The Office of
Management and Finance handles accounting, support services, human resources
management, information services, and internal audit. Tax Administration Group I is
responsible for collection, operations, personal income tax, sales tax, post processing
services, and taxpayer services. Tax Administration Group II is responsible for audit
review, research and technical services, excise taxes, corporation income and franchise
taxes, and severance taxes. Tax Administration Group III is responsible for field audit
services, district offices, regional offices, and special investigations.
Alcohol and Tobacco Control -
Authorized Positions (68) (68)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,366,241 $ 1,351,973
Discretionary Expenditures $ 9,178,525 $ 8,660,088
Program Description: Regulates the alcoholic beverage and tobacco industries in the
state; licenses alcoholic beverage manufacturers, native wineries, retailers, and wholesalers
as well as retail and wholesale tobacco product dealers and enforces state alcoholic
beverage and tobacco laws.
Office of Charitable Gaming -
Authorized Positions (20) (20)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 304,000 $ 396,313
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,380,878 $ 2,338,539
Page 115 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Licenses, educates, and monitors organizations conducting
legalized gaming as a fund-raising mechanism; provides for the licensing of commercial
lessors and related matters regarding electronic video bingo and progressive mega-jackpot
bingo.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 143,483,322 $ 133,076,577
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,583 $ 2,522
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 20,273,034 $ 20,250,115
Statutory Dedications:
Tobacco Regulation Enforcement Fund $ 55,683 $ 54,364
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 20,331,300 $ 20,307,001
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 512,417 $ 512,478
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 122,037,374 $ 111,653,548
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Entertainment Development
Dedicated Fund Account $ 100,000 $ 100,000
Statutory Dedications:
Tobacco Regulation Enforcement Fund $ 502,231 $ 503,550
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 123,152,022 $ 112,769,576
Provided, however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Fees and Self-
generated Revenues derived from the Office of Alcohol and Tobacco Control and the Office
of Charitable Gaming shall be carried forward and shall be available for expenditure.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 76,883,523 $ 80,565,948
Operating Expenses $ 7,854,783 $ 7,849,365
Professional Services $ 4,720,290 $ 4,539,397
Other Charges $ 52,794,234 $ 39,964,200
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,230,492 $ 157,667
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 143,483,322 $ 133,076,577
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the Tax
Collection Program for contractual services $ 193,390
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from Louisiana Department of
Health - Office of the Secretary to the Tax Collection
Program for administering tax credits to rural
providers $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Interagency Transfers from the Department of
Conservation and Energy to the Tax Collection
Program for document processing services $ 50,000
Page 116 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 13
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
13-856 OFFICE OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of the Secretary -
Authorized Positions (69) (67)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,241,820 $ 2,346,635
Discretionary Expenditures $ 6,718,856 $ 6,993,854
Program Description: The mission of the Office of the Secretary (OSEC) is to provide
strategic administrative oversight necessary to advance and fulfill the role, scope and
function of the department. As the managerial and overall policy coordinating agency for
the department, the Office of the Secretary will facilitate achievement of environmental
improvements by promoting initiatives that serve a broad environmental mandate, and by
representing the department when dealing with external agencies. OSEC will ensure the
department meets its performance and policy objectives by working and coordinating with
all program offices.
Office of Environmental Compliance -
Authorized Positions (239) (239)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,478,674 $ 5,296,427
Discretionary Expenditures $ 23,826,867 $ 23,144,260
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Environmental Compliance (OEC),
consisting of the Surveillance, Emergency and Radiological Services, and Enforcement
Divisions, is to protect the health, safety and welfare of the people and environmental
resources of Louisiana. OEC protects the citizens of the state by conducting inspections of
permitted and non-permitted facilities, assessing environmental conditions, responding to
environmental incidents such as unauthorized releases, spills and citizen complaints, and
by providing compliance assistance to the community when appropriate. The OEC
establishes a multimedia compliance approach; creates a uniform approach for compliance
activities; assigns accountability and responsibility to appropriate parties; and provides
standardized response training for all potential responders. The OEC provides for vigorous
and timely resolution of enforcement actions.
Office of Environmental Services -
Authorized Positions (158) (168)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 10,269,806 $ 10,314,442
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,657,549 $ 8,646,865
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Environmental Services (OES) is to
ensure that the citizens of Louisiana have a clean and healthy environment to live and work
in for present and future generations. This will be accomplished by regulating pollution
sources through permitting activities, which are consistent with laws and regulations by
timely and clearly communicating with the regulated community, and by providing improved
public participation. The OES will provide technical guidance for permit applications,
improve permit tracking and increase focus on applications with the highest potential for
environmental impact.
Office of Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (58) (59)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 10,921,694 $ 11,278,790
Discretionary Expenditures $ 52,482,998 $ 56,329,010
Page 117 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Management & Finance is to provide
comprehensive support to all Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) offices and
stakeholders as necessary to carry out the mission of the department. This is accomplished
by providing financial and administrative services including human resources, accounting
and budgeting, and other general services to the department and its employees.
Office of Environmental Assessment -
Authorized Positions (188) (188)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 15,152,957 $ 15,005,309
Discretionary Expenditures $ 26,302,571 $ 18,026,697
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Environmental Assessment (OEA) is to
maintain and enhance the environment of the state in order to promote and protect the
health, safety and welfare of the people of Louisiana. This program provides an efficient
means to develop, implement and enforce regulations, assess, inventory, monitor and
analyze releases, and pursue efforts to prevent and to remediate contamination of the
environment. The OEA also strives to develop plans and projects to assist stakeholders via
financial assistance in environmental restoration and protection actions.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 161,053,792 $ 157,382,289
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 313,663 $ 303,987
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 29,115 $ 1,784
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,679 $ 2,539
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Environmental Trust
Dedicated Fund Account $ 27,426,587 $ 27,769,629
Waste Tire Management
Dedicated Fund Account $ 127,571 $ 120,929
Lead Hazard Reduction
Dedicated Fund Account $ 19,661 $ 18,637
Statutory Dedications:
Hazardous Waste Site Cleanup Fund $ 414,575 $ 397,644
Oil Spill Contingency Fund $ 28,534 $ 28,534
Clean Water State Revolving Fund $ 459,940 $ 441,146
Federal Funds $ 15,242,626 $ 15,156,774
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 44,064,951 $ 44,241,603
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 14,560,743 $ 11,580,926
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 136,054 $ 8,216
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 22,111 $ 22,251
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Environmental Trust
Dedicated Fund Account $ 49,572,688 $ 50,225,012
Motor Fuels Underground Storage
Tank Trust Dedicated Fund Account $ 21,249,485 $ 21,249,485
Waste Tire Management
Dedicated Fund Account $ 14,754,150 $ 14,760,792
Lead Hazard Reduction
Dedicated Fund Account $ 130,339 $ 131,363
Page 118 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Hazardous Waste Site Cleanup Fund $ 7,150,228 $ 6,485,539
Brownfields Cleanup Revolving
Loan Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Oil Spill Contingency Fund $ 198,440 $ 198,440
Clean Water State Revolving Fund $ 3,040,686 $ 3,059,480
Federal Funds $ 6,123,917 $ 5,369,182
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY): $ 116,988,841 $ 113,140,686
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 81,116,571 $ 84,210,281
Operating Expenses $ 4,157,655 $ 4,143,018
Professional Services $ 4,835,129 $ 4,135,689
Other Charges $ 68,960,299 $ 64,059,301
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,984,138 $ 834,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 161,053,792 $ 157,382,289
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues out of the
Environmental Trust Dedicated Fund Account to
the Office of Management and Finance for
development of a statewide permitting dashboard $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Fees and
Self-generated Revenues out of the Lead Hazard
Reduction Dedicated Fund Account to the Office
of Environmental Services for updates to
permitting software and additional lead hazard
inspection training, in the event that Senate Bill
No. 274 of the 2026 Regular Session
of the Legislature is enacted into law $ 115,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by Statutory
Dedications out of the Hazardous Waste Site
Cleanup Fund to the Office of Environmental
Assessment to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 212,688
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Environmental Services Program for the
maintenance of storm water litter and plastics
management for Capitol Lake $ 350,000
SCHEDULE 14
LOUISIANA WORKS
14-474 WORKFORCE SUPPORT AND TRAINING
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of Workers’ Compensation Administration -
Authorized Positions (136) (129)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,072,247 $ 1,927,650
Discretionary Expenditures $ 73,733,147 $ 74,441,973
Program Description: To establish standards of payment; to administer, review, and
adjudicate injured worker claims; and to receive, process, hear, and resolve legal actions
Page 119 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
in compliance with state statutes. This office is also responsible for educating and
influencing employers and employees in the adoption of comprehensive safety and health
policies, practices, and procedures. Additionally, the office administers the Second Injury
Fund, encouraging the employment, re-employment, and retention of workers with
permanent partial disabilities by reimbursing eligible employers or insurers for qualifying
workers’ compensation benefit costs, and collecting assessments from insurance carriers
and self-insured employers to support the program.
Office of Unemployment Insurance Administration -
Authorized Positions (232) (219)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,999,153 $ 2,883,382
Discretionary Expenditures $ 29,292,339 $ 26,710,181
Program Description: To promote a stable, growth-oriented Louisiana through the
administration of a solvent and secure Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund, which is
supported by employer taxes, and to ensure the timely and accurate payment of
unemployment compensation benefits to eligible unemployed workers.
Office of Workforce Development -
Authorized Positions (512) (478)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,991,820 $ 6,536,566
Discretionary Expenditures $ 196,063,574 $ 200,658,795
Program Description: To provide high-quality employment and training services,
supportive services, and timely and accurate labor market information to employers, job
seekers, customers, and stakeholders; to support informed workforce decisions; and to
develop a diversely skilled workforce with access to good-paying jobs. This office also
supports and protects the rights and interests of Louisiana’s workers through the
administration and enforcement of state worker protection statutes and regulations.
Office of Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (95) (113)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 11,696,690 $ 12,107,078
Discretionary Expenditures $ 25,192,277 $ 27,468,943
Program Description: To provide executive leadership, strategic direction, and centralized
management of all departmental programs; to develop, promote, and implement policies,
mandates, and administrative frameworks; to ensure fiscal integrity, operational efficiency,
and regulatory compliance; and to provide technical and administrative support necessary
to fulfill the mission of the Louisiana Works. This office is responsible for ensuring the
quality of services provided, communicating departmental priorities, fostering effective
relationships with stakeholders, and supporting department management, programs,
employees, and external partners including the Division of Administration, federal and state
agencies, local political subdivisions, citizens of Louisiana, and vendors.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 347,041,247 $ 352,734,568
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 32,400
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 31,826 $ 1,397,712
Statutory Dedications:
Workers’ Compensation Second
Injury Fund $ 191,065 $ 179,605
Office of Workers’ Compensation
Administrative Fund $ 2,959,831 $ 2,526,939
Page 120 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Incumbent Worker Training Account $ 748,769 $ 589,786
Penalty and Interest Account $ 1,379,330 $ 1,070,988
Blind Vendors Trust Fund $ 66,784 $ 60,927
Federal Funds $ 17,382,305 $ 17,596,319
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 22,759,910 $ 23,454,676
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 20,680,735 $ 20,816,160
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 29,497,307 $ 35,080,655
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 72,219 $ 72,219
Statutory Dedications:
Workers’ Compensation Second
Injury Fund $ 60,697,177 $ 60,780,590
Office of Workers' Compensation
Administrative Fund $ 16,047,645 $ 16,527,329
Incumbent Worker Training Account $ 25,106,264 $ 25,412,108
Employment Security Administration
Account $ 3,991,157 $ 4,000,000
Penalty and Interest Account $ 5,535,691 $ 5,632,676
Blind Vendors Trust Fund $ 483,553 $ 502,671
Federal Funds $ 162,169,589 $ 160,455,484
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 324,281,337 $ 329,279,892
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 94,736,670 $ 99,536,857
Operating Expenses $ 13,587,660 $ 13,599,160
Professional Services $ 13,733,168 $ 16,472,105
Other Charges $ 224,983,749 $ 223,126,446
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 347,041,247 $ 352,734,568
EXPENDITURES:
Office of Workforce Development for Louisiana
Rehabilitation Services $ 9,380,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 9,380,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,000,000
Federal Funds $ 7,380,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 9,380,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to reduce the means
of finance for the Office of Workforce Development Program by reducing the appropriation
out of State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Incumbent Worker Training
Account by ($24,341,385), Federal Funds by ($7,116,020) and the total number of
Authorized Positions by twenty-eight (28) positions in the event that House Bill No. 951 of
the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
Page 121 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
EXPENDITURES:
Office of Business Workforce Solutions -
Authorized Positions (30) $ 31,457,405
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 31,457,405
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Incumbent Worker Training Account $ 24,341,385
Federal Funds $ 7,116,020
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 31,457,405
Provided however, that the total appropriation provided for herein for the Office of Business
Workforce Solutions Program shall only take effect and become operative in the event that
House Bill No. 951 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Management and Finance
Program for the Louisiana Science, Technology,
Engineering, and Mathematics (LaSTEM)
program, including two (2) authorized positions
in the event that House Bill No. 445 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into
law $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Cybersecurity Talent Initiative Fund to the Office
of Management and Finance Program for the
expansion of cybersecurity programs, in the
event that Senate Bill No. 484 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted
into law $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Office of
Workers' Compensation Administrative Fund
to the Office Of Workers' Compensation
Administration Program for an All Workers'
Compensation Medical Claims Database,
including three (3) authorized positions, in the
event that Senate Bill No. 408 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted into law $ 643,143
SCHEDULE 16
DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE AND FISHERIES
16-511 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND FINANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Management and Finance -
Authorized Positions (45) (45)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,610,166 $ 1,631,232
Discretionary Expenditures $ 38,373,829 $ 22,845,703
Page 122 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Performs the financial, licensing, program evaluation, planning,
and general support service functions for the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries so that
the department’s mission of conservation of renewable natural resources is accomplished.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 39,983,995 $ 24,476,935
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 206,368
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 1,603,683 $ 1,418,616
Federal Funds $ 6,483 $ 6,248
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,610,166 $ 1,631,232
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 9,604,498 $ 10,785,650
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Duck License, Stamp,
and Print Dedicated Fund Account $ 10,450 $ 10,450
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 15,688,789 $ 10,773,087
Marsh Island Operating Fund $ 6,200 $ 6,200
Modernization and Security Fund $ 9,568,204 $ 0
Rockefeller Wildlife Refuge and Game
Preserve Fund $ 24,040 $ 24,040
Seafood Promotion and Marketing Fund $ 23,209 $ 23,209
Louisiana Outdoors Forever Fund $ 3,225,607 $ 1,000,000
Federal Funds $ 222,832 $ 223,067
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 38,373,829 $ 22,845,703
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 5,841,557 $ 6,114,117
Operating Expenses $ 2,297,195 $ 2,297,195
Professional Services $ 59,867 $ 59,867
Other Charges $ 31,785,376 $ 16,005,756
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 39,983,995 $ 24,476,935
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Conservation
Fund to the Management and Finance Program
for a federal advocacy provider $ 130,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Conservation
Fund to the Office of Management and Finance
for facility staffing, including nine (9) authorized
positions $ 1,611,299
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Conservation
Fund to the Management and Finance Program
for a professional services contract $ 100,000
Page 123 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Conservation
Fund to the Management and Finance Program
for staff reorganization, including three (3)
authorized positions $ 249,908
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Management and Finance Program to
support the removal of invasive species $ 1,000,000
16-512 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative -
Authorized Positions (25) (24)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 713,955 $ 594,783
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,098,209 $ 2,901,389
Program Description: Provides executive leadership and legal support to all department
programs and staff; executes and enforces the laws, rules, and regulations of the state
relative to wildlife and fisheries for the purpose of conservation and renewable natural
resources and relative to boating and outdoor safety for continued use and enjoyment by
current and future generations.
Enforcement Program -
Authorized Positions (257) (256)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 8,235,136 $ 8,097,285
Discretionary Expenditures $ 38,830,618 $ 39,436,820
Program Description: To establish and maintain compliance through the execution and
enforcement of laws, rules and regulations of the state relative to the management,
conservation and protection of renewable natural resources and fisheries resources and
relative to providing public safety on the state’s waterways and lands for the continued use
and enjoyment by current and future generations.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 50,877,918 $ 51,030,277
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,516,485 $ 5,664,578
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 22,291 $ 20,959
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 9,392 $ 8,913
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 3,251,670 $ 2,855,990
Federal Funds $ 149,253 $ 141,628
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 8,949,091 $ 8,692,068
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 24,792,758 $ 28,389,436
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 464,379 $ 308,345
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 117,608 $ 118,087
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Oyster Sanitation Dedicated
Fund Account $ 217,975 $ 173,193
Page 124 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 11,936,010 $ 9,130,015
Crab Development, Management,
and Derelict Crab Trap Removal
Account $ 113,000 $ 113,000
Litter Abatement Account $ 99,800 $ 99,800
Marsh Island Operating Fund $ 32,038 $ 32,038
Oyster Resource Management Account $ 262,000 $ 262,000
Rockefeller Wildlife Refuge and
Game Preserve Fund $ 116,846 $ 116,846
Shrimp Development and Management
Account $ 70,900 $ 70,900
Wildlife Habitat and Natural Heritage
Trust $ 135,169 $ 135,169
Federal Funds $ 3,570,344 $ 3,389,380
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 41,928,827 $ 42,338,209
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 37,816,372 $ 38,452,029
Operating Expenses $ 6,493,337 $ 6,205,216
Professional Services $ 127,798 $ 257,798
Other Charges $ 4,812,596 $ 4,929,234
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,627,815 $ 1,316,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 50,877,918 $ 51,160,277
EXPENDITURES:
Administrative Program for educational staffing,
including forty-three (43) authorized positions $ 10,887,220

TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,887,220
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 56,666
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 280,000
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Alligator Resource Dedicated
Fund Account $ 280,174
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 1,902,894
Federal Funds $ 8,367,486
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 10,887,220
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Administrative Program for personal services,
including one (1) authorized position $ 72,934
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Enforcement Program for wildlife enforcement
vehicles and boats $ 914,414
Page 125 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
16-513 OFFICE OF WILDLIFE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Wildlife Program -
Authorized Positions (226) (186)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,938,704 $ 4,920,815
Discretionary Expenditures $ 68,519,576 $ 50,472,722
Program Description: Provides wise stewardship of the state’s wildlife and habitats, to
maintain biodiversity, including plant and animal species of special concern and to provide
outdoor opportunities for present and future generations to engender a greater appreciation
of the natural environment.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 73,458,280 $ 55,393,537
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 262,827
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 40,632 $ 38,893
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Alligator Resource
Dedicated Fund Account $ 207,018 $ 198,162
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 3,118,610 $ 2,915,760
Federal Funds $ 1,572,444 $ 1,505,173
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,938,704 $ 4,920,815
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,391,215 $ 1,426,580
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,117,295 $ 4,176,004
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 310,227 $ 834,527
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Louisiana Alligator Resource
Dedicated Fund Account $ 2,696,898 $ 2,450,446
Louisiana Duck License, Stamp, and
Print Dedicated Fund Account $ 1,309,341 $ 1,034,600
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 9,350,345 $ 5,987,535
Conservation - Black Bear Account $ 208,500 $ 208,500
Conservation - Quail Account $ 25,587 $ 18,987
Conservation - White Tail Deer Account $ 15,700 $ 15,700
Louisiana Fur Public Education and
Marketing Fund $ 68,049 $ 59,500
Louisiana Wild Turkey Fund $ 30,100 $ 32,850
Marsh Island Operating Fund $ 155,570 $ 129,570
MC Davis Conservation Fund $ 10,775 $ 5,400
Oil Spill Contingency Fund $ 323,659 $ 331,159
Rockefeller Wildlife Refuge and Game
Preserve Fund $ 4,585,403 $ 3,393,343
Rockefeller Wildlife Refuge Trust and
Protection Fund $ 5,027,997 $ 3,274,130
Page 126 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Russell Sage Special Fund #2 $ 2,500,000 $ 2,500,000
White Lake Property Fund $ 1,920,500 $ 1,455,000
Wildlife Habitat and Natural Heritage
Trust $ 1,622,325 $ 1,830,682
Federal Funds $ 32,850,090 $ 21,308,209
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 68,519,576 $ 50,472,722
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 23,555,355 $ 24,365,464
Operating Expenses $ 6,332,844 $ 6,291,590
Professional Services $ 5,748,064 $ 4,080,689
Other Charges $ 24,861,280 $ 20,954,138
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 12,960,737 $ 10,093,769
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 73,458,280 $ 65,785,650
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Conservation
Incentive Program Account to the Wildlife Program
for enhancement of wildlife habitats and to manage
native species on private lands $ 500,000
16-514 OFFICE OF FISHERIES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Fisheries Program -
Authorized Positions (233) (211)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,208,814 $ 5,118,425
Discretionary Expenditures $ 81,457,129 $ 56,517,677
Program Description: Manages living aquatic resources and their habitat, gives fishery
industry support, and provides access, opportunity and understanding of the Louisiana
aquatic resources to citizens and others beneficiaries of these sustainable resources.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 86,665,943 $ 61,636,102
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 303,471
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 243,555 $ 218,590
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Aquatic Plant Control Dedicated
Fund Account $ 304,938 $ 273,681
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund $ 3,600,384 $ 3,371,392
Federal Funds $ 1,059,937 $ 951,291
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 5,208,814 $ 5,118,425
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 1,709,576
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 21,681,817 $ 15,154,795
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 180,000 $ 80,531
Page 127 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Aquatic Plant Control Dedicated
Fund Account $ 4,801,739 $ 4,607,779
Oyster Sanitation Dedicated Fund
Account $ 104,665 $ 109,367
Statutory Dedications:
Artificial Reef Development Fund $ 7,587,695 $ 7,193,279
Conservation Fund $ 8,848,189 $ 6,662,033
Crab Development, Management, and
Derelict Crab Trap Removal Account $ 90,119 $ 106,667
Oyster Development Fund $ 149,989 $ 158,631
Oyster Resource Management
Account $ 7,876,642 $ 3,198,824
Saltwater Fish Research and
Conservation Fund $ 1,300,000 $ 1,300,000
Shrimp Development and
Management Account $ 220,000 $ 220,000
Shrimp Marketing and Promotion Fund $ 180,000 $ 180,000
Charter Boat Fishing Fund $ 816,450 $ 816,450
Federal Funds $ 27,619,824 $ 15,019,745
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 81,457,129 $ 56,517,677
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 23,791,168 $ 24,662,186
Operating Expenses $ 25,383,649 $ 21,811,342
Professional Services $ 3,131,656 $ 4,821,380
Other Charges $ 31,098,544 $ 10,855,572
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 3,260,926 $ 1,841,936
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 86,665,943 $ 63,992,416
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Fisheries Program for the restoration of the
striped bass population $ 139,406
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Oyster
Resource Management Account to the Office of
Fisheries Program for oyster research projects $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Fisheries Program for salvinia control on
Lake Bistineau $ 200,000
Page 128 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 17
DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE
17-560 STATE CIVIL SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration and Support -
Authorized Positions (105) (105)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,286,023 $ 3,402,873
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,182,862 $ 13,371,653
Program Description: The mission of the Administration and Support Program is to
provide state agencies with an effective human resources system that ensures quality service
and accountability to the public interest by maintaining a balance between discretion and
control, making that balance flexible enough to match the rapidly changing environment in
which government operates. In addition, the program maintains the official personnel
records of the state. In the area of Human Resources management, the program promotes
effective human resource management throughout state government by developing,
implementing, and evaluating systems for job evaluation, pay, employment, promotion and
personnel management and by administering these systems through rules, policies and
practices that encourage wise utilization of the state's financial and human resources.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 15,468,885 $ 16,774,526
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior and
Current Year Collections $ 3,189,075 $ 3,302,371
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from
Prior and Current Year Collections $ 96,948 $ 100,502
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 3,286,023 $ 3,402,873
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior and
Current Year Collections $ 11,830,140 $ 12,983,317
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from
Prior and Current Year Collections $ 352,722 $ 388,336
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 12,182,862 $ 13,371,653
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 13,534,970 $ 14,746,977
Operating Expenses $ 1,088,039 $ 1,113,329
Professional Services $ 30,000 $ 30,000
Other Charges $ 813,276 $ 873,075
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 2,600 $ 11,145
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 15,468,885 $ 16,774,526
Page 129 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
17-561 MUNICIPAL FIRE AND POLICE CIVIL SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (21) (21)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,638,128 $ 3,202,467
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: The mission of the Office of State Examiner, Municipal Fire and
Police Civil Service, is to administer an effective, cost-efficient civil service system based
on merit, efficiency, fitness, and length of service, consistent with the law and professional
standards, for fire fighters and police officers in all municipalities in the state having
populations of not less than 7,000 nor more than 500,000 inhabitants to which the law
applies, and in all parish fire departments and fire protection districts regardless of
population, in order to provide a continuity in quality of law enforcement and fire protection
for the citizens of the state in both rural and urban areas.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 3,638,128 $ 3,202,467
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Municipal Fire and Police Civil Service
Operating Dedicated Fund Account $ $3,638,128 $ 3,202,467
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 3,638,128 $ 3,202,467
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 2,475,386 $ 2,593,105
Operating Expenses $ 431,171 $ 431,983
Professional Services $ 649,294 $ 20,000
Other Charges $ 82,277 $ 97,379
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 60,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 3,638,128 $ 3,202,467
17-562 ETHICS ADMINISTRATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (41) (41)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 926,907 $ 917,486
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,333,042 $ 4,581,655
Program Description: The mission of Ethics Administration is to provide staff support for
the Louisiana Board of Ethics, which administers and enforces Louisiana’s conflicts of
interest legislation, campaign finance disclosure requirements, and lobbyist registration and
disclosure laws, to achieve compliance by governmental officials, public employees,
candidates, and lobbyists and to provide public access to disclosed information.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 5,259,949 $ 5,499,141
Page 130 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 912,640 $ 904,132
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 14,267 $ 13,354
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 926,907 $ 917,486
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,161,472 $ 4,419,511
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 171,570 $ 162,144
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 4,333,042 $ 4,581,655
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 4,422,919 $ 4,618,412
Operating Expenses $ 287,321 $ 327,342
Professional Services $ 59,918 $ 0
Other Charges $ 489,791 $ 553,387
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 5,259,949 $ 5,499,141
17-563 STATE POLICE COMMISSION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (4) (4)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 114,082 $ 113,536
Discretionary Expenditures $ 792,413 $ 796,645
Program Description: The mission of the State Police Commission is to provide a separate
merit system for the commissioned officers of Louisiana State Police. In accomplishing this
mission, the program administers entry-level law enforcement examinations and
promotional examinations, processes personnel actions, issues certificates of eligibles, and
schedules appeals and pay hearings. The State Police Commission was created by
constitutional amendment to provide an independent civil service system for all regularly
commissioned full-time law enforcement officers employed by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, Office of State Police, or its successor, who are graduates of the
State Police training academy of instruction and are vested with full state police powers, as
provided by law, and persons in training to become such officers.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 906,495 $ 910,181
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 114,082 $ 113,536
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 114,082 $ 113,536
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 737,413 $ 741,645
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 55,000 $ 55,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 792,413 $ 796,645
Page 131 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 574,492 $ 583,736
Operating Expenses $ 30,900 $ 30,900
Professional Services $ 209,447 $ 209,447
Other Charges $ 91,656 $ 80,098
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 6,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 906,495 $ 910,181
17-565 BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 270,922 $ 264,247
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,496,080 $ 1,583,609
Program Description: Provides an appeals board to hear and decide on disputes and
controversies between taxpayers and the Department of Revenue; reviews and makes
recommendations on tax refund claims, claims against the state, industrial tax exemptions,
and business tax credits.
Local Tax Division -
Authorized Positions (3) (3)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 52,783 $ 6,612
Discretionary Expenditures $ 478,435 $ 517,740
Program Description: Provides an appeals board to hear and decide on disputes and
controversies between taxpayers and local taxing authorities; reviews and makes
recommendations on tax refund claims against local taxing authorities.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 2,298,220 $ 2,372,208
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 265,894 $ 242,780
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 57,811 $ 28,079
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 323,705 $ 270,859
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 1,670,965 $ 1,768,067
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 303,550 $ 333,282
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,974,515 $ 2,101,349
Page 132 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,830,060 $ 1,866,828
Operating Expenses $ 201,143 $ 221,143
Professional Services $ 75,000 $ 75,000
Other Charges $ 192,017 $ 209,237
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 2,298,220 $ 2,372,208
SCHEDULE 19
HIGHER EDUCATION
The following sums are hereby appropriated for the payment of operating expenses
associated with carrying out the functions of postsecondary education.
In accordance with Article VIII, Section 12 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and in
acknowledgment of the responsibilities which are vested in the management boards of
postsecondary education, all appropriations for postsecondary education institutions which
are part of a university or college system are made to their respective management boards
and shall be administered by the same management boards and used solely as provided by
law.
Considering the recommendations provided by the formula and plan adopted by the Board
of Regents, monies shall be allocated to each postsecondary education institution within each
postsecondary education system as provided herein. In order to effectively utilize the
appropriation authority provided herein, allocations to institutions within each system may
be adjusted by each management board as authorized for program transfers in accordance
with R.S. 17:3351 and R.S. 39:73 as long as the total system appropriation remains
unchanged.
The distribution shall be implemented by the Division of Administration. All key and
supporting performance objectives and indicators for the higher education agencies shall be
adjusted to reflect the funds received pursuant to this Act.
Provided, however, in the event that any legislative instrument of the 2026 Regular Session
of the Legislature providing for an increase in tuition and mandatory attendance fees is
enacted into law, such funds resulting from the implementation of such enacted legislation
in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 shall be included as part of the appropriation for the respective
public postsecondary education management board.
19-671 BOARD OF REGENTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Board of Regents -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,159,688 $ 4,491,116
Discretionary Expenditures $ 90,104,154 $ 115,584,872
Program Description: The Board of Regents plans, coordinates and has budgetary
responsibility for all public postsecondary education as constitutionally mandated that is
effective and efficient, quality driven, and responsive to the needs of citizens, business,
industry, and government.
Office of Student Financial Assistance -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,656,771 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 396,855,778 $ 389,064,336
Page 133 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The Office of Student Financial Assistance Program is to provide
direction and administrative support services for internal and external clients. This is
achieved by, maintaining the highest level of customer satisfaction; partnering with the
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education to maximize access to postsecondary
education through state student financial assistance policies and programs; augmenting
student services and programs by maximizing federal revenues; administering the Federal
Family Education Loan (FFEL) program; administering state and federal scholarships,
grant and tuition savings programs to maximize the opportunities for Louisiana students to
pursue their postsecondary educational goals; and to financially assist any student by
efficiently administering the Taylor Opportunity Program for Students (TOPS), to maximize
access to postsecondary education programs.
Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,331,131 $ 1,089,494
Discretionary Expenditures $ 24,988,695 $ 25,137,427
Program Description: The Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium (LUMCON) will
conduct research and education programs directly relevant to Louisiana's needs in marine
and coastal science, develop products that educate local, national, and international
audiences, and serve as a facility for all Louisiana schools with interests in marine research
and education in order to make all levels of society increasingly aware of the economic and
cultural value of Louisiana’s coastal and marine environments.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 518,096,217 $ 535,367,245
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 6,147,590 $ 5,580,610
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 6,147,590 $ 5,580,610
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 290,218,313 $ 287,195,957
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 14,256,109 $ 14,256,109
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 15,850,299 $ 15,850,299
Fees & Self-generated Revenues Dedicated
Fund Accounts:
Proprietary School Students Protection
Dedicated Fund Account $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Statutory Dedications:
Rockefeller Wildlife Refuge Trust and
Protection Fund $ 60,000 $ 60,000
Louisiana Quality Education
Support Fund $ 18,930,000 $ 18,930,000
TOPS Fund $ 117,656,613 $ 125,324,600
Medical and Allied Health Professional
Education Scholarship and Loan Fund $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Support Education in Louisiana First Fund $ 38,251 $ 37,521
Higher Education Initiatives Fund $ 5,000,000 $ 5,000,000
Louisiana Cybersecurity Talent Initiative
Fund $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
Health Care Employment Reinvestment
Opportunity (H.E.R.O.) Fund $ 1,306,929 $ 0
M.J. Foster Promise Program Fund $ 10,500,000 $ 25,000,000
Geaux Teach Fund $ 2,500,000 $ 2,500,000
Federal Funds $ 34,232,149 $ 34,232,149
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 511,948,627 $ 529,786,635
Page 134 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Provided, however, and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior year Interagency
Transfers derived from LOUIS: The Louisiana Library Network shall be carried forward and
shall be available for expenditure.
Provided, however, that on a quarterly basis, the Board of Regents shall submit to the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget a quarterly expense report indicating the number of
Go Grant awards made year-to-date on behalf of full-time, half-time and part-time students
at each of the state's public and private postsecondary institutions, beginning October 1,
2026. Such report shall also include quarterly updated projections of anticipated total Go
Grant expenditures for Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
Provided, further, that, if at any time during Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the agency's internal
projection of anticipated Go Grant expenditures exceeds $70,480,716, the Board of Regents
shall immediately notify the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Provided, however, that of the funds appropriated in this Schedule for the Board of Regents
Program, an amount not to exceed $2,900,000 shall be deposited in the Louisiana Student
Tuition Assistance and Revenue Trust Program's Savings Enhancement Fund. Funds in the
Savings Enhancement Fund may be committed and expended by the Louisiana Tuition Trust
Authority as earnings enhancements and as interest on earnings enhancements, all in
accordance with the provisions of law and regulation governing the Louisiana Student
Tuition Assistance and Revenue Trust (START).
All balances of accounts and funds derived from the administration of the Federal Family
Education Loan Program and deposited in the agency's Federal Reserve and Operating Funds
shall be invested by the State Treasurer and the proceeds there from credited to those
respective funds in the State Treasury and shall not be transferred to the State General Fund
nor used for any purpose other than those authorized by the Higher Education Act of 1965,
as reauthorized and amended. All balances which remain unexpended at the end of the fiscal
year shall be retained in the accounts and funds of the Board of Regents Program and may
be expended by the agency in the subsequent fiscal year as appropriated.
The special programs identified below are funded within the Statutory Dedication amount
appropriated above. They are identified separately here to establish the specific amount
appropriated for each category.
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund:
Enhancement of Academics and Research $ 9,885,074 $ 14,288,375
Recruitment of Superior Graduate Fellows $ 1,020,000 $ 1,820,000
Endowment of Chairs $ 2,020,000 $ 3,220,000
Carefully Designed Research Efforts $ 5,414,204 $ 4,033,441
Administrative Expenses $ 590,722 $ 568,184
Total $ 18,930,000 $ 23,930,000
Contracts for the expenditure of funds from the Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund
may be entered into for periods of not more than six years.
Provided, however, that from the monies appropriated from State General Fund (Direct), the
amount of $1,225,289 shall be allocated to the Louisiana Poison Control Center at the
Louisiana State University Health Sciences Center-Shreveport. Provided, further, that these
monies shall not be included as a component of the funds provided for the purposes as
specified in the distribution of the plan and formula as approved by the Board of Regents.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Board of Regents for the Louisiana
Hunger Free Campus designation program and
grant program $ 1,000,000
Page 135 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Higher
Education Initiatives Fund to the Board of
Regents Program for institution accreditation $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Office of Student Financial Assistance
Program for Taylor Opportunity Program for
Students (TOPS) awards as projected by the
Office of Student Financial Assistance $ 4,465,532
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Education Quality Support Fund for the
endowment of chairs, enhancement of academics
and research, and recruitment of graduate fellows $ 5,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Postsecondary Inclusive Education Fund to the
Board of Regents Program for inclusive
postsecondary programs $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium
Program to align with the most recent REC
forecast $ 1,391
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Supporting
Programs, Opportunities, Resources, and Teams
(SPORT) Fund to the Board of Regents Program
to align with the most recent REC forecast $ 23,880,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Board of Regents Program for higher
education formula $ 56,000,000
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Board of Regents Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund (Direct) by ($3,000,000) in the event that House Bill No. 445 of the 2026
Regular Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Board of Regents Program by reducing the appropriation out of the State
General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Cybersecurity Talent Initiative
Fund by ($1,000,000), in the event that Senate Bill No. 484 of the 2026 Regular Session of
the Legislature is enacted into law.
19-600 LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 139,758,973 $ 128,287,414
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,247,551,508 $ 1,279,128,245
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,387,310,481 $ 1,407,415,659
Page 136 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 139,758,973 $ 128,287,414
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 139,758,973 $ 128,287,414
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 351,038,888 $ 357,205,851
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 8,485,184 $ 8,485,184
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 839,034,535 $ 875,340,751
Statutory Dedications:
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 3,634,771 $ 4,094,310
Higher Education Campus Revitalization
Fund $ 9,000,000 $ 0
Support Education in Louisiana First Fund $ 19,353,254 $ 19,002,034
Equine Health Studies Program Fund $ 750,000 $ 750,000
Criminal Justice and First Responder Fund $ 2,000,000 $ 0
Shreveport Riverfront and Convention
Center and Independence Stadium Fund $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Education Excellence Fund $ 36,601 $ 31,840
Federal Funds $ 14,018,275 $ 14,018,275
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,247,551,508 $ 1,279,128,245
Provided, however, that from monies appropriated from State General Fund (Direct) to the
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors and allocated to the Louisiana State
University Health Sciences Center - Shreveport, the amount of $1,225,289 shall be allocated
to the Louisiana Poison Control Center and such allocation shall not be reduced under any
circumstance by the Louisiana State Health Sciences Center - Shreveport.
Provided, however, that from monies appropriated from State General Fund (Direct) to the
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors, the amount of $5,100,000 shall be
allocated to the LSU Energy Institute, formerly the Center for Energy Studies, and such
allocation shall not be reduced under any circumstance by the Louisiana State University
Board of Supervisors.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University-
A&M College for graduate assistantships $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for research support at the
Louisiana State University Agricultural
Center $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University
Health Sciences Center - New Orleans $ 1,250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University
Health Sciences Center - Shreveport $ 1,250,000
Page 137 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the Louisiana
State University Board of Supervisors due to
changes in enrollment, fees, and tuition $ 15,355,250
Provided, however, that the amount appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated as follows:
LSU - A & M College $ 13,700,000
LSU Health Sciences Center - Shreveport $ 1,355,250
LSU - Eunice $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the Louisiana State University -
Agricultural Center $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University
A&M College for graduate assistantships $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors
for campus safety upgrades at Louisiana State
University - Shreveport $ 2,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for recruitment for Pennington
Biomedical Research Center $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for additional parking on
campus at Louisiana State University -
Alexandria $ 950,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for youth development program
needs at Louisiana State University -
Agricultural Center $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for operating funds at the
Louisiana Tumor Registry at Louisiana State
University Health Sciences Center - New Orleans $ 900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for competitive pay advantage at
Louisiana State University - Eunice $ 1,000,000
Page 138 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for operating expenses at
Louisiana State University - Eunice $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for the Louisiana State University -
A & M College for health affairs $ 231,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Modernization
and Security Fund to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors for campus
security at Louisiana State University A&M
College $ 750,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Higher
Education Campus Revitalization Fund to
the Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University -
Alexandria for land acquisitions and
facilities $ 3,800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors to Louisiana
State University - A&M College to align with
the most recent REC forecast $ 33,085
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors
to align with the most recent REC forecast $ 704,277
Provided, however, the $704,277 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors shall be
allocated as follows:
LSU - A&M College $ 310,843
LSU - Alexandria $ 9,625
LSU Health Sciences Center - Shreveport $ 96,353
LSU Health Sciences Center - New Orleans $ 148,159
LSU - Eunice $ 8,958
LSU - Shreveport $ 22,653
LSU - Agricultural Center $ 104,308
Pennington Biomedical Research Center $ 3,378
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Louisiana State University Board of
Supervisors for Louisiana State University –
A&M College for maintenance of the oak
trees on the Baton Rouge Campus $ 385,000
Out of the funds appropriated herein to the Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors,
the following amounts shall be allocated to each higher education institution.
Page 139 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Louisiana State University Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 30,000,000
Louisiana State University - A &M College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 61,906,165 $ 56,947,906
Discretionary Expenditures $ 747,147,205 $ 728,204,813
Role, Scope and Mission Statement: As the flagship institution in the state, the vision of
Louisiana State University (LSU) is to be a leading research-extensive university,
challenging undergraduate and graduate students to achieve the highest levels of intellectual
and personal development. Designated as a land-, sea-, and space-grant institution, the
mission of LSU is the generation, preservation, dissemination, and application of knowledge
and cultivation of the arts. In implementing its mission, LSU is committed to offer a broad
array of undergraduate degree programs and extensive graduate research opportunities
designed to attract and educate highly-qualified undergraduate and graduate students;
employ faculty who are excellent teacher-scholars, nationally competitive in research and
creative activities, and who contribute to a world-class knowledge base that is transferable
to educational, professional, cultural and economic enterprises; and use its extensive
resources to solve economic, environmental and social challenges.
Louisiana State University - Alexandria -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,993,837 $ 3,766,333
Discretionary Expenditures $ 40,106,153 $ 52,931,606
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Louisiana State University at Alexandria (LSUA)
offers Central Louisiana access to affordable baccalaureate and associate degrees in a
caring environment that challenges students to seek excellence in and bring excellence to
their studies and their lives. LSUA is committed to a reciprocal relationship of enrichment
with the community it serves.
Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center - New Orleans -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 28,010,452 $ 21,583,027
Discretionary Expenditures $ 142,675,277 $ 155,665,607
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The LSU Health Sciences Center–New Orleans
(LSUHSC-NO) provides education, research, and public service through direct patient care
and community outreach. LSUHSC-NO comprises the Schools of Allied Health Professions,
Dentistry, Graduate Studies, Medicine, Nursing, and Public Health. LSUHSC-NO creates
a learning environment of excellence, in which students are prepared for career success and
faculty are encouraged to participate in research promoting the discovery and dissemination
of new knowledge, securing extramural support, and translating their findings into improved
education and patient care. Each year LSUHSC-NO contributes a major portion of the
renewal of the needed health professions workforce. It is a local, national, and international
leader in research. LSUHSC-NO promotes disease prevention and health awareness for
patients and the greater Louisiana community. It participates in mutual planning with
community partners and explores areas of invention and collaboration to implement new
endeavors for outreach in education, research, service and patient care.
Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center - Shreveport -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 19,042,598 $ 20,787,573
Discretionary Expenditures $ 103,087,559 $ 99,934,450
Page 140 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The primary mission of Louisiana State University
Health Sciences Center–Shreveport (LSUHSC-S) is to provide education, patient care
services, research, and community outreach. LSUHSC-S encompasses the School of
Medicine in Shreveport, the School of Graduate Studies in Shreveport, and the School of
Allied Health Professions in Shreveport. In implementing its mission, LSUHSC-S is
committed to: Educating physicians, biomedical scientists, fellows and allied health
professionals based on state-of-the-art curricula, methods, and facilities; preparing students
for careers in health care service, teaching or research; providing state-of-the-art clinical
care, including a range of special services to an expanding regional base of patients;
achieving distinction and international recognition for basic science and clinical research
programs that contribute to the body of knowledge and practice in science and medicine;
supporting the region and the State in economic growth and prosperity by utilizing research
and knowledge to engage in productive partnerships with the private sector.
Louisiana State University - Eunice -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,605,536 $ 1,556,477
Discretionary Expenditures $ 16,576,066 $ 17,730,914
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Louisiana State University at Eunice (LSUE) is a
comprehensive, open admissions institution of higher education. The University is dedicated
to high quality, low-cost education and is committed to academic excellence and the dignity
and worth of the individual. To this end, Louisiana State University at Eunice offers
associate degrees, certificates and continuing education programs as well as transfer
curricula. Its curricula span the liberal arts, sciences, business and technology, pre-
professional and professional areas for the benefit of a diverse population. All who can
benefit from its resources deserve the opportunity to pursue the goal of lifelong learning and
to expand their knowledge and skills at LSUE.
Louisiana State University - Shreveport -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,404,511 $ 5,415,171
Discretionary Expenditures $ 66,086,504 $ 65,577,290
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The mission of Louisiana State University in
Shreveport is to provide stimulating and supportive learning environment in which students,
faculty, and staff participate freely in the creation, acquisition, and dissemination of
knowledge; encourage an atmosphere of intellectual excitement; foster the academic and
personal growth of students; produce graduates who possess the intellectual resources and
professional personal skills that will enable them to be effective and productive members of
an ever-changing global community and enhance the cultural, technological, social, and
economic development of the region through outstanding teaching, research, and public
service.
Louisiana State University - Agricultural
Center -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 16,260,634 $ 12,889,872
Discretionary Expenditures $ 99,292,008 $ 99,874,559
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The overall mission of the LSU Agricultural Center
is to enhance the quality of life for people through research and educational programs that
develop the best use of natural resources, conserve and protect the environment, enhance
development of existing and new agricultural and related enterprises, develop human and
community resources, and fulfill the acts of authorization and mandates of state and federal
legislative bodies.
Pennington Biomedical Research Center -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,535,240 $ 5,341,055
Discretionary Expenditures $ 32,580,736 $ 29,209,006
Page 141 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The research at the Pennington Biomedical Research
Center is multifaceted, yet focused on a single mission: to promote longer, healthier lives
through nutritional research and preventive medicine. The center's mission is to attack
chronic diseases such as cancer, heart disease, diabetes, and stroke before they become
killers. The process begins with basic research in cellular and molecular biology, progresses
to tissues and organ physiology, and is extended to whole body biology and behavior. The
research is then applied to human volunteers in a clinical setting. Ultimately, findings are
extended to communities and large populations and then shared with scientists and spread
to consumers across the world through public education programs and commercial
applications.
19-615 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Southern University Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 23,792,912 $ 19,139,024
Discretionary Expenditures $ 168,162,553 $ 163,568,847
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 191,955,465 $ 182,707,871
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 23,792,912 $ 19,139,024
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 23,792,912 $ 19,139,024
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 43,131,107 $ 35,593,018
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,476,791 $ 4,476,791
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 112,289,046 $ 115,289,046
Statutory Dedications:
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
Pari-Mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Support Education in Louisiana First Fund $ 2,793,388 $ 2,742,693
Southern University AgCenter Program
Fund $ 750,000 $ 750,000
Education Excellence Fund $ 18,012 $ 13,090
Federal Funds $ 3,654,209 $ 3,654,209
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 168,162,553 $ 163,568,847
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of
Supervisors for the Southern University
Agricultural Research and Extension Center $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Southern University
Board of Supervisors for Southern University -
A&M College to align with the most recent
REC forecast $ 14,302
Page 142 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Southern University Board of Supervisors to
align with the most recent REC forecast $ 101,652
Provided, however, the $101,652 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Southern University Board of Supervisors shall be allocated as
follows:
Southern University - A&M College $ 66,558
Southern University - Law Center $ 7,266
Southern University - New Orleans $ 19,025
Southern University - Shreveport $ 6,809
Southern University - Agricultural Research & Extension Center $ 1,994
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Southern University Board of Supervisors due
to changes in enrollment $ 1,000,000
Provided, however, that the amount appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated as follows:
SU-Agricultural & Mechanical College $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of
Supervisors for operations at Southern
University at New Orleans $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University Board of
Supervisors for the weekend and evening
college at Southern University New Orleans $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University System Board of
Supervisors for the Southern University - Law
Center $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University System Board of
Supervisors for the Southern University System
utility master plan $ 1,300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University System Board of
Supervisors for operating expenses relating to
the Mobile Health Unit at Southern University
at Shreveport $ 295,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University System Board of
Supervisors for workforce training and
development programs at Southern University
at Shreveport $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Southern University System Board of
Supervisors $ 2,905,000
Page 143 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Out of the funds appropriated herein to the Southern University Board of Supervisors, the
following amounts shall be allocated to each higher education institution.
Southern University Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 501,003 $ 479,517
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,564,377 $ 3,612,902
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The Southern University Board of Supervisors shall
exercise power necessary to supervise and manage the campuses of postsecondary education
under its control, to include receipt and expenditure of all funds appropriated for the use of
the board and the institutions under its jurisdiction in accordance with the Master Plan, set
tuition and attendance fees for both residents and nonresidents, purchase/lease land and
purchase/construct buildings (subject to Regents approval), purchase equipment, maintain
and improve facilities, employ and fix salaries of personnel, review and approve curricula,
programs of study (subject to Regents approval), award certificates and confer degrees and
issue diplomas, adopt rules and regulations and perform such other functions necessary to
the supervision and management of the university system it supervises. The Southern
University System is comprised of the campuses under the supervision and management of
the Board of Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College
as follows: Southern University Agricultural and Mechanical College (SUBR), Southern
University at New Orleans (SUNO), Southern University at Shreveport (SUSLA), Southern
University Law Center (SULC) and Southern University Agricultural Research and
Extension Center (SUAG).
Southern University - Agricultural &
Mechanical College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 12,235,419 $ 11,732,359
Discretionary Expenditures $ 93,362,948 $ 96,162,142
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Southern University and Agricultural & Mechanical
College (SUBR) serves the educational needs of Louisiana’s population through a variety
of undergraduate, graduate, and professional programs. The mission of Southern University
and A&M College, an Historically Black, 1890 land-grant institution, is to provide
opportunities for a diverse student population to achieve a high-quality, global educational
experience, to engage in scholarly, research, and creative activities, and to give meaningful
public service to the community, the state, the nation, and the world so that Southern
University graduates are competent, informed, and productive citizens.
Southern University - Law Center -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,053,515 $ 2,190,158
Discretionary Expenditures $ 22,199,313 $ 20,416,635
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Southern University Law Center (SULC) offers legal
training to a diverse group of students in pursuit of a Juris Doctorate degree. SULC seeks
to maintain its historical tradition of providing legal education opportunities to students
facing economic or structural barriers to advance society with competent, ethical
individuals, professionally equipped for positions of responsibility and leadership; provide
a comprehensive knowledge of the civil law in Louisiana; and promote legal services in
underprivileged urban and rural communities.
Southern University - New Orleans -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,037,365 $ 1,785,815
Discretionary Expenditures $ 21,033,316 $ 17,743,209
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Southern University–New Orleans (SUNO) primarily
serves the educational and cultural needs of the Greater New Orleans metropolitan area.
SUNO creates and maintains an environment conducive to learning and growth, promotes
Page 144 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
the upward mobility of students by preparing them to enter into new, as well as traditional,
careers and equips them to function optimally in the mainstream of American society. SUNO
provides a sound education tailored to special needs of students coming to an open
admissions institution and prepares them for full participation in a complex and changing
society. SUNO provides instruction for the working adult populace of the area who seek to
continue their education in the evening or on weekends.
Southern University - Shreveport -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,906,912 $ 1,807,732
Discretionary Expenditures $ 14,611,875 $ 13,881,698
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Southern University–Shreveport (SUSLA) primarily
serves the Shreveport/Bossier City metropolitan area. SUSLA serves the educational needs
of this population primarily through a select number of associates degree and certificate
programs. These programs are designed for a number of purposes; for students who plan
to transfer to a four-year institution to pursue further academic training, for students
wishing to enter the workforce and for employees desiring additional training and/or
retraining.
Southern University - Agricultural Research &
Extension Center -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,058,698 $ 1,143,443
Discretionary Expenditures $ 13,390,724 $ 11,752,261
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The mission of the Southern University Agricultural
Research and Extension Center (SUAREC) is to conduct basic and applied research and
disseminate information to the citizens of Louisiana in a manner that is useful in addressing
their scientific, technological, social, economic and cultural needs. The center generates
knowledge through its research and disseminates relevant information through its extension
program that addresses the scientific, technological, social, economic and cultural needs of
all citizens, with particular emphasis to equipping students with the skills, experiences, and
credentials needed to thrive in varied professional environments. Cooperation with federal
agencies and other state and local agencies ensure that the overall needs of citizens of
Louisiana are met through the effective and efficient use of the resources provided to the
center.
19-620 UNIVERSITY OF LOUISIANA BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 114,950,499 $ 107,932,793
Discretionary Expenditures $ 917,496,877 $ 898,465,667
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,032,447,376 $ 1,006,398,460
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 114,950,499 $ 107,932,793
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 114,950,499 $ 107,932,793
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 199,468,553 $ 175,796,330
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 259,923 $ 259,923
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 693,993,461 $ 705,227,599
Page 145 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Calcasieu Parish Fund $ 406,545 $ 347,730
Calcasieu Parish Higher Education
Improvement Fund $ 1,452,073 $ 1,452,073
Higher Education Campus Revitalization
Fund $ 6,250,000 $ 0
Support Education in Louisiana First Fund $ 15,666,322 $ 15,382,012
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 917,496,877 $ 898,465,667
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for accreditation of the College
of Pharmacy at University of Louisiana
at Monroe $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for McNeese State University
Athletic Department for a sound system $ 425,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for Grambling State University
to strengthen recruitment to focus on graduate
education and adult learners over 25 $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for the College of Pharmacy at the
University of Louisiana at Monroe $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for Nicholls State University for
operating expenses for the Maritime Academy $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for Nicholls State University for
the Coastal Center $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors for Southeastern Louisiana University $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors to the University of Louisiana
at Lafayette for the Cajun Advanced
Picosatellite Program $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for Gayle Hall at McNeese State University $ 600,000
Page 146 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for McNeese State University Police
Department for radios $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Higher
Education Campus Revitalization Fund to the
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
for the University of Louisiana at Lafayette for
repairs to Duson Tower #0599 $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Calcasieu
Parish Higher Education Improvement Fund to
the University of Louisiana Board of
Supervisors to McNeese State University to
align with the most recent REC forecast $ 71,106
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors
to align with the most recent REC forecast $ 570,108
Provided, however, the $570,108 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors shall be allocated
as follows:
Nicholls State University $ 40,133
Grambling State University $ 37,449
Louisiana Tech University $ 70,880
McNeese State University $ 45,708
University of Louisiana at Monroe $ 67,639
Northwestern State University $ 46,820
Southeastern Louisiana University $ 74,192
University of Louisiana at Lafayette $ 95,569
University of New Orleans $ 91,718
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana System Board
of Supervisors $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana System Board
of Supervisors for Grambling State University $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the University of Louisiana System Board
of Supervisors for Louisiana Tech University
for conference realignment $ 4,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
University of Louisiana System Board of
Supervisors for a scoreboard at McNeese
State University $ 1,500,000
Page 147 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Out of the funds appropriated herein to the University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors,
the following amounts shall be allocated to each higher education institution.
University of Louisiana Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 834,068 $ 780,175
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,930,697 $ 6,528,237
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The University of Louisiana System is composed of
the nine institutions under the supervision and management of the Board of Supervisors for
the University of Louisiana System: Grambling State University, Louisiana Tech University,
McNeese State University, Nicholls State University, Northwestern State University of
Louisiana, Southeastern Louisiana University, the University of Louisiana at Lafayette, the
University of Louisiana at Monroe, and the University of New Orleans. The Board of
Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System shall exercise power as necessary to
supervise and manage the institutions of postsecondary education under its control,
including receiving and expending all funds appropriated for the use of the board and the
institutions under its jurisdiction in accordance with the Master Plan; setting tuition and
attendance fees for both residents and nonresidents; purchasing or leasing land and
purchasing or constructing buildings subject to approval of the Regents; purchasing
equipment; maintaining and improving facilities; employing and fixing salaries of
personnel; reviewing and approving curricula and programs of study subject to approval
of the Regents; awarding certificates, conferring degrees, and issuing diplomas; adopting
rules and regulations; and performing such other functions as are necessary to the
supervision and management of the system.
Nicholls State University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 9,424,008 $ 9,095,555
Discretionary Expenditures $ 57,188,746 $ 57,475,439
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Nicholls State University is a comprehensive,
regional, selective admissions university that provides a unique blend of excellent academic
programs to meet the needs of Louisiana and beyond. For more than half a century, the
university has been the leader in postsecondary education in an area rich in cultural and
natural resources. While maintaining major partnerships with businesses, local school
systems, community agencies, and other educational institutions, Nicholls actively
participates in the educational, social, and cultural infrastructure of the region. Nicholls’
location in the heart of South Louisiana and its access to the Gulf of Mexico and to one of
the nation’s major estuaries provides valuable opportunities for instruction, research and
service, particularly in the fields of marine biology, petroleum technology, and culinary arts.
Nicholls makes significant contributions to the economic development of the region,
maintaining a vital commitment to the well-being of its people through programs that have
strong ties to a nationally recognized health care industry in the Thibodaux – Houma
metropolitan area, to area business and industry, and to its K-12 education system. As such,
it is a center for collaborative, scientific, technological, cultural, educational and economic
leadership and services in South Central Louisiana.
Grambling State University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 6,496,918 $ 5,171,074
Discretionary Expenditures $ 49,921,914 $ 48,870,991
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Grambling State University (GSU) is a
comprehensive, historically-black institution that offers a broad spectrum of undergraduate
and graduate programs of study. The university embraces its founding principle of
educational opportunity, is committed to the education of minorities in American society,
and seeks to reflect in all of its programs the community present in the world. The GSU
community of learners strives for excellence in the pursuit of knowledge. The university
prepares its graduates to compete and succeed in careers, to contribute to the advancement
of knowledge, and to lead productive lives as informed citizens in a democratic society. It
Page 148 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
provides a living and learning environment to nurture students’ development for leadership
in academics, athletics, campus governance, and future pursuits. Grambling advances the
study and preservation of African American history, art and culture, and seeks to foster in
its students a commitment to service to improve the quality of life for all.
Louisiana Tech University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 14,978,611 $ 15,123,752
Discretionary Expenditures $ 125,553,116 $ 133,683,748
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Louisiana Tech University recognizes its threefold
obligation to advance the state of knowledge, to disseminate knowledge, and to provide
strong outreach and service programs and activities. To fulfill its obligations, the university
will maintain a strong research, creative environment, and intellectual environment that
encourages the development and application of knowledge. Recognizing that service is an
important function of every university, Louisiana Tech provides outreach programs and
activities to meet the needs of the region and the state. Louisiana Tech views graduate study
and research as integral to the university’s purpose. Committed to graduate education
through the doctorate, it will conduct research appropriate to the level of academic
programs offered and will have a defined ratio of undergraduate to graduate enrollment.
Doctoral programs will continue to focus on fields of study in which the university has the
ability to achieve national competitiveness or to respond to specific state or regional needs.
As such, Louisiana Tech will provide leadership for the region’s engineering, science and
business innovation.
McNeese State University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 8,444,774 $ 8,251,173
Discretionary Expenditures $ 69,973,801 $ 69,406,357
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: McNeese State University is a comprehensive
institution that provides leadership for educational, cultural, and economic development for
southwest Louisiana. It offers a wide range of baccalaureate programs and select graduate
programs appropriate for the workforce, allied health, and intellectual capital needs of the
area. The institution promotes diverse economic growth and provides programs critical to
the oil, gas, petrochemical, and related industries operating in the region. Its academic
programs and services are vital resources for increasing the level of education, productivity,
and quality of life for the citizens of Louisiana. The university allocates resources and
functions according to principles and values that promote accountability for excellence in
teaching, scholarship and service, and for cultural awareness and economic development.
McNeese emphasizes teaching excellence to foster student access and success, and it seeks
partnerships and collaboration with community and educational entities to facilitate
economic growth and opportunity in Southwest Louisiana. Instructional delivery via
distance learning technology enables a broader student population to reach higher
education goals.
University of Louisiana at Monroe -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 11,701,208 $ 11,248,687
Discretionary Expenditures $ 95,121,417 $ 91,096,935
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: A comprehensive senior institution of higher
learning, the University of Louisiana at Monroe (UL Monroe) offers a complete educational
experience emphasizing a learning environment where excellence is the hallmark. The
university dedicates itself to student learning, pure and applied research, and advancing
knowledge through traditional and alternative delivery modalities. With its human,
academic, and physical resources, UL Monroe enhances the quality of life in the mid-South.
UL Monroe is committed to serving as a gateway to academic studies for citizens living in
the urban and rural regions of the mid-South and the world beyond. The university offers a
broad array of academic and professional programs from the associate level through the
doctoral degree, including the state’s only public doctor of pharmacy program. Coupled
Page 149 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
with research and service, these programs address the postsecondary educational needs of
the area’s citizens, businesses, and industries.
Northwestern State University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 9,264,954 $ 9,098,427
Discretionary Expenditures $ 82,180,125 $ 80,225,276
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Located in rural Louisiana between the population
centers of Alexandria and Shreveport, Northwestern State University serves a wide
geographic area between the borders of Texas and Mississippi. It serves the educational and
cultural needs of the region through traditional and electronic delivery of courses. Distance
education continues to be an increasingly integral part of Northwestern’s degree program
delivery, providing flexibility for serving the educational needs and demands of students,
state government, and private enterprise. Northwestern’s commitment to undergraduate and
graduate education and to public service enable it to favorably affect the economic
development of the region and to improve the quality of life for its citizens. The university’s
Leesville campus, in close proximity to the Fort Johnson U.S. Army base, offers a prime
opportunity for the university to provide educational experiences to military personnel
stationed there, and, through electronic program delivery, to armed forces throughout the
world. Northwestern is also home to the Louisiana Scholars College, the state’s selective
admissions college for the liberal arts.
Southeastern Louisiana University -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 16,502,141 $ 15,114,339
Discretionary Expenditures $ 127,878,264 $ 129,088,623
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The mission of Southeastern Louisiana University
is to lead the educational, economic, and cultural development of the southeast region of the
state known as the Northshore. Its educational programs are based on evolving curricula
that address emerging regional, national, and international priorities. The university
promotes student success and retention as well as intellectual and personal growth through
a variety of academic, social, vocational, and wellness programs. Southeastern’s credit and
non-credit educational experiences emphasize challenging, relevant course content and
innovative, effective delivery systems. Global perspectives are broadened through
opportunities to work and study abroad. Through its Centers of Excellence, Southeastern
embraces active partnerships that benefit faculty, students, and the region it serves. Dynamic
collaborative efforts range from local to global in scope and encompass education, business,
industry, and the public sector. Of particular interest are partnerships that directly or
indirectly contribute to economic renewal and diversification.
University of Louisiana at Lafayette -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 24,683,656 $ 22,967,703
Discretionary Expenditures $ 204,595,470 $ 201,437,672
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The University of Louisiana at Lafayette (UL
Lafayette) takes as its primary purpose the examination, transmission, preservation, and
extension of mankind’s intellectual traditions. The university provides intellectual leadership
for the educational, cultural, and economic development of its region and the state through
its instructional, research, and service activities. Graduate study and research are integral
to the university’s mission. Doctoral programs will continue to focus on fields of study in
which UL Lafayette has the ability to achieve national competitiveness or to respond to
specific state or regional needs. The university extends its resources to all constituencies
it serves through research centers, continuing education, public outreach programs, cultural
activities, and access to campus facilities. Because of its location in the heart of South
Louisiana, UL Lafayette will continue its leadership in maintaining instructional and
research programs that preserve Louisiana’s history and the rich Cajun and Creole
cultures.
Page 150 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
University of New Orleans -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 12,620,161 $ 11,081,908
Discretionary Expenditures $ 101,153,327 $ 80,652,389
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The University of New Orleans (UNO) is the
comprehensive metropolitan research university providing essential support for the
economic, educational, social, and cultural development of the New Orleans metropolitan
area. The institution's primary service area includes Orleans Parish and the seven
neighboring parishes of Jefferson, St. Bernard, St. Charles, St. Tammany, St. John, St.
James, and Plaquemine. As an institution that imposes admissions criteria, UNO serves the
educational needs of this population primarily through a wide variety of baccalaureate
programs in the arts, humanities, sciences, and social sciences and in the professional areas
of business, education, and engineering. UNO offers a variety of graduate programs,
including doctoral programs in chemistry, education, engineering and applied sciences,
financial economics, political science, psychology, and urban studies. As an urban university
serving the state's largest metropolitan area, UNO directs its resources and efforts towards
partnerships with business and government to address the complex issues and opportunities
that affect New Orleans and the surrounding metropolitan area.
19-649 LOUISIANA COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 50,193,334 $ 45,410,276
Discretionary Expenditures $ 297,152,507 $ 305,061,458
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 347,345,841 $ 350,471,734
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 50,193,334 $ 45,410,276
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 50,193,334 $ 45,410,276
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 103,288,085 $ 110,462,538
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 175,812,107 $ 178,722,107
Statutory Dedications:
Calcasieu Parish Fund $ 135,515 $ 115,910
Calcasieu Parish Higher Education
Improvement Fund $ 484,025 $ 484,025
Workforce Training Rapid Response Fund $ 10,000,000 $ 10,000,000
Orleans Parish Excellence Fund $ 354,527 $ 290,789
Higher Education Campus Revitalization
Fund $ 2,000,000 $ 0
Support Education in Louisiana First Fund $ 5,078,248 $ 4,986,089
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 297,152,507 $ 305,061,458
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors for operating expenses at the
River Parish Community College Hyundai Steel
Training Center $ 3,300,000
Page 151 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges Board of Supervisors for Delgado
Community College Small Business Center
and StartUp U Program $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Louisiana Community and Technical College
Board of Supervisors to support workforce
operations related to high-demand technical
programming at L.E. Fletcher Technical
Community College $ 1,300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges Board of Supervisors for programmatic
needs in the Maritime, Advanced Manufacturing
and Energy, and Healthcare programs at Delgado
Community College $ 4,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Higher
Education Campus Revitalization Fund to the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors for the River Parishes
Community College for equipment and
training programs at training sites $ 3,300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors due to changes in
enrollment $ 1,025,000
Provided, however, that the amount appropriated above from Fees and Self-generated
Revenues shall be allocated as follows:
South Louisiana Community College $ 600,000
L.E. Fletcher Technical Community College $ 425,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Calcasieu
Parish Higher Education Improvement Fund to
the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges Board of Supervisors to SOWELA
Technical Community College to align with the
most recent REC forecast $ 23,702
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors to align with the most
REC forecast $ 184,803
Provided, however, the $184,803 in Statutory Dedications out of the Support Education in
Louisiana First Fund to the Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges Board of
Supervisors shall be allocated as follows:
Page 152 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Baton Rouge Community College $ 26,844
Delgado Community College $ 45,790
Nunez Community College $ 5,254
Bossier Parish Community College $ 16,424
South Louisiana Community College $ 26,839
River Parishes Community College $ 8,669
Louisiana Delta Community College $ 14,475
Northwest Louisiana Technical Community College $ 7,839
SOWELA Technical Community College $ 10,988
L.E. Fletcher Technical Community College $ 6,185
Northshore Technical Community College $ 8,056
Central Louisiana Technical Community College $ 7,440
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Louisiana Community and Technical College
Board of Supervisors for Welding and
Manufacturing programs at Nunez Community
College $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges Board of Supervisors for startup costs
for the aerospace program at Nunez Community
College $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
L.E. Fletcher Technical Community
College $ 1,000,000
Out of the funds appropriated herein to the Board of Supervisors of Community and
Technical Colleges, the following amounts shall be allocated to each higher education
institution.
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges
Board of Supervisors -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,598,840 $ 2,519,745
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,828,650 $ 1,839,087
Role, Scope and Mission Statement: Prepares Louisiana’s citizens for workforce success,
prosperity, continued learning, and improved quality of life. The Board of Supervisors of the
Louisiana Community and Technical Colleges System (LCTCS) provides effective and
efficient management of the colleges within the System through policy making and oversight
to educate and prepare Louisiana residents for workforce success, prosperity and improved
quality of life.
Baton Rouge Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,421,886 $ 4,678,251
Discretionary Expenditures $ 40,929,931 $ 43,535,500
Page 153 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: An open admission, two-year post-secondary public
institution. The mission of Baton Rouge Community College includes the offering of the
highest quality collegiate and career education through comprehensive curricula allowing
for transfer to four-year colleges and universities, community education programs and
services life-long learning, and distance learning programs. This variety of offerings will
prepare students to enter the job market, to enhance personal and professional growth, or
to change occupations through training and retraining. The curricular offerings shall
include courses and programs leading to transfer credits and to certificates, diplomas, and
associate degrees. All offerings are designed to be accessible, affordable, and or high
educational quality. Due to its location, BRCC is particularly suited to serve the special
needs of area business and industries and the local, state, and federal governmental
complex.
Delgado Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 11,663,974 $ 10,746,356
Discretionary Expenditures $ 72,741,563 $ 69,343,151
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Delgado Community College provides a learning
centered environment in which to prepare students from all backgrounds to attain their
educational, career, and personal goals, to think critically, to demonstrate leadership, and
to be productive and responsible citizens. Delgado is a comprehensive, multi-campus, open-
admissions, public higher education institution providing pre-baccalaureate programs,
occupational and technical training, developmental studies, and continuing education.
Nunez Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,705,893 $ 1,652,751
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,373,634 $ 11,546,603
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Offers associate degrees and occupational
certificates in keeping with the demands of the area it services. Curricula at Nunez focuses
on the development of the total person by offering a blend of occupational sciences, and the
humanities. In recognition of all needs of the individuals we serve, Nunez Community
College will provide a comprehensive educational program that helps students cultivate
values and skills in critical thinking, decision-making and problem solving, as well as
prepare them for productive satisfying careers, and offer courses that transfer to senior
institutions.
Bossier Parish Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 5,369,235 $ 3,647,261
Discretionary Expenditures $ 30,381,642 $ 32,033,094
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Provides instruction and service to its community.
This mission is accomplished through courses and programs that provide sound academic
education, broad career and workforce training, continuing education, and varied
community services. The college provides a wholesome, ethical, and intellectually
stimulating environment in which students develop their academic and vocational skills to
compete in a technological society.
South Louisiana Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,054,785 $ 6,475,943
Discretionary Expenditures $ 27,368,961 $ 29,889,584
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Provides multi-campus public educational programs
that lead to achievement of associate degrees of art, science, or applied science; transfer to
four-year institutions; acquisition of the technical skills to participate successfully in the
workplace and economy; promotion of economic development and job mastery of skills
Page 154 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
necessary for competence in industry specific to south Louisiana; and completion of
development or remedial cultural enrichment, lifelong learning and life skills.
River Parishes Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,648,906 $ 2,086,930
Discretionary Expenditures $ 14,633,833 $ 14,818,040
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: River Parishes Community College is an open-
admission, two-year, post-secondary public institution serving the river parishes. The
College provides transferable courses and curricula up to and including Certificates and
Associates degrees. River Parishes Community College also collaborates with the
communities it serves by providing programs for personal, professional, and academic
growth.
Louisiana Delta Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,755,681 $ 3,431,134
Discretionary Expenditures $ 18,928,873 $ 19,109,628
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Offers quality instruction and service to the
residents of its northeastern twelve-parish area. This will be accomplished by the offering
of course and programs that provide sound academic education, broad based vocational and
career training, continuing educational and various community and outreach services. The
College will provide these programs in a challenging, wholesale, ethical, and intellectually
stimulating setting where students are encouraged to develop their academic, vocational,
and career skills to their highest potential in order to successfully compete in this rapidly
changing and increasingly technology-based society.
Northwest Louisiana Technical Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,643,884 $ 1,486,429
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,463,056 $ 7,382,136
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: The main mission of the Northwest Louisiana
Technical Community College remains workforce development. The Northwest Louisiana
Technical Community College provides affordable technical academic education needed to
assist individuals in making informed and meaningful occupational choices to meet the labor
demands of industry. Included is training, retraining, cross training and continuous
upgrading of the state's workforce so that citizens are employable at both entry and
advanced levels.
SOWELA Technical Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,901,079 $ 2,895,795
Discretionary Expenditures $ 20,834,116 $ 21,019,737
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Provides a lifelong learning and teaching
environment designed to afford every student an equal opportunity to develop to his/her full
potential. SOWELA Technical Community College is a public, comprehensive technical
community college offering programs including associate degrees, diplomas, and technical
certificates as well as non-credit courses. The college is committed to accessible and
affordable quality education, relevant training, and re-training by providing post-secondary
academic and technical education to meet the educational advancement and workforce
development needs of the community.
L.E. Fletcher Technical Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,142,805 $ 1,970,265
Discretionary Expenditures $ 12,109,275 $ 13,093,904
Page 155 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: L.E. Fletcher Technical Community College is an
open-admission, two-year public institution of higher education dedicated to offering
quality, economical technical programs and academic courses to the citizens of south
Louisiana for the purpose of preparing individuals for immediate employment, career
advancement and future learning.
LCTCSOnline -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,238,628 $ 1,238,628
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: A statewide centralized solution for developing and
delivering educational programming online via the Internet. LCTCSOnline currently
provides over 50 courses and one full general education program for community college and
technical college students. LCTCSOnline courses and programs are available through and
students are awarded credit by an accredited LCTCS institution. LCTCSOnline develops and
delivers courses and programs via a centralized portal where students can search a catalog
of classes, choose classes, request enrollment and, once enrolled, attends classes. Student
may order publisher content and eBooks, check their progress and see their grades in the
same portal. To participate in LCTCSOnline, LCTCS colleges much be accredited either by
the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools (SACS) or by the Council on Occupational
Education (COE). Students who enroll in LCTCSOnline classes must first be admitted at an
accredited college with the appropriate accreditation to offer the course or program. The
college at which the student is admitted and will receive a credential is considered the Home
College. The Home College will provide all student support services including program
advising, financial aid, and library services. It is the policy of LCTCSOnline to use only
eBooks where available that results in significant cost savings to the student and assures that
the course materials will be available on the first day of class. The goal of LCTCSOnline is
to create greater access and variety of high quality programming options while containing
student costs. LCTCSOnline will provide competency-based classes in which students may
enroll any day of the year.
Northshore Technical Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,681,010 $ 2,313,518
Discretionary Expenditures $ 16,919,880 $ 18,707,128
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Northshore Technical Community College (NTCC)
is a public, technical community college offering programs including associate degrees,
diplomas, and technical certificates. These offerings provide skilled employees for business
and industry that contribute to the overall economic development and workforce needs of
the state. NTCC is dedicated to increasing opportunities for access and success, ensuring
quality and accountability, enhancing services to communities and state, providing effective
articulation and credit transfer to other institutions of higher education, and contributing
to the development of business, industry and the community through customized education,
job training and re-training. NTCC is committed to providing quality workforce training and
transfer opportunities to students seeking a competitive edge in today's global economy.
Central Louisiana Technical Community College -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,605,356 $ 1,505,898
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,530,465 $ 8,635,238
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Central Louisiana Technical Community College
(CLTCC) is a two-year public technical community college offering associate degrees,
certificates, and diplomas that prepare individuals for high-demand occupations and
transfer opportunities. The college continuously monitors emerging trends, by maintaining
proactive business advisory committees and delivering on-time industry-based certifications
and high quality customized training for employers. CLTCC pursues responsive, innovative
educational and business partnership strategies in an environment that promotes life-long
Page 156 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
learning, and produces a knowledgeable and skilled workforce as well as confident citizens
who grow viable businesses for the future. Using innovative educational strategies, the
college creates a skilled workforce and prepares individuals for advanced educational
opportunities.
Adult Basic Education -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,870,000 $ 2,870,000
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Louisiana’s comprehensive adult education program
is designed to 1) satisfy the basic literacy needs of adults; 2) improve and/or upgrade
information processing skills and computational skills leading to a high school equivalency
diploma or entry into postsecondary education; 3) satisfy the continuing education demands
of adults in the current labor market; 4) improve the self-efficacy of adults; and 5) empower
adults to achieve their goals. Through LCTCS, WorkReady U supports a diverse network of
local adult education providers comprised of colleges, local school systems, and community-
based organizations through the administration of grant funds, professional development
and technical assistance, collaboration with workforce partners, and leadership
development. Local adult education providers deliver courses and programs open to all
adults who demonstrate a need for basic skill remediation in reading, writing, math, and
English language proficiency. WorkReady U operates approximately 23 adult education
programs in partnership with the community and technical colleges and other community
entities across the states. These locations served over 40,000 students annually in various
learning programs: high school equivalency, literacy and numeracy education, English
acquisition, and civics education.
Workforce Training Rapid Response -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,000,000 $ 10,000,000
Role, Scope, and Mission Statement: Customized programs that are designed to quickly
ramp up and mobilize training to respond to the fast-paced and changing nature of today’s
workplace. With rapid changes brought about by innovation, new occupations, and
increasing technological skills needed to enter the workforce, the Workforce Training Rapid
Response Program assists employers with unique training designed in a compressed nature
that leads to academic awards and/or industry-based credentials required for employment.
With a required business and industry match, the Louisiana Community and Technical
Colleges System ensures that programs are of high demand/ high wage nature by
implementing programs that are related to the Louisiana Workforce Commission’s Tier One,
Four and Five Star occupation rating.
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
19-656 SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Special Schools Programs -
Authorized Positions (77) (73)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (2) (2)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 6,712,252 $ 5,522,628
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,963,431 $ 2,273,367
Program Description: Provides special education and related services to children with
exceptionalities who are enrolled in state-operated programs and provides appropriate
educational services to eligible children enrolled in state-operated mental health facilities.
Louisiana School for the Deaf and Visually Impaired -
Authorized Positions (260) (254)
Page 157 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Authorized Other Charges Positions (1) (1)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 6,694,704 $ 6,856,088
Discretionary Expenditures $ 21,937,195 $ 24,281,602
Program Description: Provides support services for Instructional and Residential
programs; fosters a learning community that is student-centered and dedicated to excellence
by providing child-specific instruction, residential, and outreach services to all children;
and provides educational services to blind and/or visually impaired children 3-21 years of
age and to hearing impaired children 0-21 years of age through a comprehensive quality
educational program that prepares students for post-secondary training and/or the
workforce, and a pleasant, safe, and caring environment in which students can live and
learn.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 2,500 $ 2,500
Account Description: Provides a student activity center funded with Fees and Self-
generated Revenues.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 37,310,082 $ 38,936,185
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,948,382 $ 7,946,833
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 5,303,714 $ 4,278,964
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 154,860 $ 152,919
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 13,406,956 $ 12,378,716
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 19,149,815 $ 20,933,091
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 4,585,166 $ 5,456,233
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 168,145 $ 168,145
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 23,903,126 $ 26,557,469
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 26,811,656 $ 26,311,352
Operating Expenses $ 2,866,875 $ 2,764,190
Professional Services $ 1,618,671 $ 1,073,671
Other Charges $ 5,759,835 $ 5,881,450
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 253,045 $ 2,905,522
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 37,310,082 $ 38,936,185
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Special Schools Program for the River
Oaks Hospital in New Orleans and Brentwood
Hospital in Shreveport $ 290,000
Page 158 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Louisiana School for
the Deaf and Visually Impaired Program to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 3,103
19-657 JIMMY D. LONG, SR. LOUISIANA SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCE, AND
THE ARTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Virtual School -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (15) (15)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Program Description: Provides instructional services to public high schools throughout
the state of Louisiana where such instruction would not otherwise be available. The school
operates through web-based instructions; students access class information through the
internet. The program provides instruction in math, science, foreign languages, the
humanities, and the arts.
Living and Learning Community -
Authorized Positions (91) (91)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (13) (13)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,481,848 $ 1,349,012
Discretionary Expenditures $ 9,979,875 $ 11,310,320
Program Description: Provides students from every Louisiana parish the opportunity to
benefit from an environment of academic and personal excellence through a rigorous and
challenging educational experience in a safe environment.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 11,661,723 $ 12,859,332
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,377,373 $ 1,230,444
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 22,952 $ 37,377
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 81,523 $ 81,191
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,481,848 $ 1,349,012
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 6,291,745 $ 7,636,615
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 3,237,671 $ 3,223,246
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 650,459 $ 650,459
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 10,179,875 $ 11,510,320
Page 159 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 8,859,461 $ 8,638,443
Operating Expenses $ 1,671,857 $ 2,233,557
Professional Services $ 60,000 $ 60,000
Other Charges $ 1,070,405 $ 1,084,158
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 843,174
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 11,661,723 $ 12,859,332
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Living and Learning
Community Program to align with the most
recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast $ 5,716
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Living and Learning Community
Program for operating expenses $ 140,500
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Living and Learning Community
Program for personnel services associated with
the salary schedule adopted by the board $ 240,423
19-658 THRIVE ACADEMY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Instruction -
Authorized Positions (49) (50)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 826,455 $ 803,642
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,562,101 $ 10,622,682
Program Description: Provides an opportunity for underserved students in a residential
setting to meet physical, emotional, and educational needs of students, and provides them
with the tools to advocate for themselves and to make a lasting impact on their community.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 11,388,556 $ 11,426,324
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 574,508 $ 559,142
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 173,435 $ 165,454
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 78,512 $ 79,046
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 826,455 $ 803,642
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,860,829 $ 8,207,535
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,696,272 $ 2,410,147
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 5,000 $ 5,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 10,562,101 $ 10,622,682
Page 160 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 5,950,740 $ 6,179,572
Operating Expenses $ 5,139,266 $ 4,905,819
Professional Services $ 140,555 $ 160,555
Other Charges $ 157,995 $ 180,378
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 11,388,556 $ 11,426,324
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Instruction Program
to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 3,606
19-659 ÉCOLE POINTE-AU-CHIEN
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Instruction -
Authorized Positions (16) (21)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 190,427 $ 199,580
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,725,783 $ 2,419,182
Program Description: Provides a French immersion education program for the students
of Terrebonne Parish between grades pre-kindergarten through fourth.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,916,210 $ 2,618,762
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 178,324 $ 198,434
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,327 $ 1,146
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 10,776 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 190,427 $ 199,580
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,182,846 $ 1,678,548
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 378,713 $ 740,634
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 164,224 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,725,783 $ 2,419,182
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,217,469 $ 1,560,061
Operating Expenses $ 123,877 $ 280,857
Professional Services $ 25,600 $ 25,600
Other Charges $ 549,264 $ 752,244
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,916,210 $ 2,618,762
Page 161 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
19-662 LOUISIANA EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION AUTHORITY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Broadcasting -
Authorized Positions (64) (63)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,587,166 $ 1,528,344
Discretionary Expenditures $ 11,333,355 $ 13,871,781
Program Description: Provides informative and educational programming for use in
homes and classrooms. Louisiana Educational Television Authority (LETA) strives to
connect the citizens of Louisiana by creating content that showcases Louisiana’s unique
history, people, places, and events; supports lifelong learning; and provides critical
information during emergencies. LETA strives to utilize emerging media technologies for
the benefit of the citizens of Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 12,920,521 $ 15,400,125
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,236,196 $ 1,188,261
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 31,105 $ 29,878
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 244,865 $ 235,205
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 75,000 $ 75,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,587,166 $ 1,528,344
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,547,759 $ 10,865,723
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 284,812 $ 286,039
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,099,336 $ 2,006,581
Statutory Dedications:
Imagination Library of Louisiana Fund $ 1,401,448 $ 713,438
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 11,333,355 $ 13,871,781
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 7,050,727 $ 7,066,007
Operating Expenses $ 2,024,926 $ 2,024,926
Professional Services $ 43,375 $ 43,375
Other Charges $ 2,302,675 $ 1,259,719
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 1,498,818 $ 5,006,098
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 12,920,521 $ 15,400,125
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Imagination
Library of Louisiana Fund to the Broadcasting
Program in the event that House Bill No. 313
of the 2026 Regular Session of the Louisiana
Legislature becomes law $ 900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Broadcasting Program for WLAE
television station for operations $ 300,000
Page 162 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Broadcasting Program for WYES
television station for operations $ 300,000
19-666 BOARD OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (6) (6)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 242,323 $ 266,164
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,000,457 $ 1,089,797
Program Description: The Board of Elementary and Secondary Education (BESE) provides
oversight for public elementary and secondary schools, the Board’s special schools, and
exercises budgetary responsibility over schools and programs under its jurisdiction.
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund -
Authorized Positions (5) (5)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 21,500,000 $ 21,500,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 56,895
Program Description: The Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund Program provides
an annual allocation of the proceeds from the Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund
Statutory Dedication (8g) for Local Educational Agencies (LEAs) and schools for eligible
K-12 expenditures.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 22,742,780 $ 22,912,856
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 242,323 $ 266,164
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Quality Education
Support Fund $ 21,500,000 $ 21,556,895
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 21,742,323 $ 21,823,059
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 940,457 $ 998,797
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 60,000 $ 91,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,000,457 $ 1,089,797
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,497,910 $ 1,576,306
Operating Expenses $ 134,522 $ 155,091
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 21,110,348 $ 21,181,459
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 22,742,780 $ 22,912,856
Page 163 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Quality Education Support Fund to the
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund
Program for the Bridging Success Initiative $ 2,975,036
The elementary and secondary educational purposes identified below are funded within the
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund Statutory Dedication amount appropriated above.
The purposes are identified separately here to establish the specific amount appropriated for
each purpose.
Louisiana Quality Education Support Fund
Block Grant Allocation $ 10,375,000 $ 10,375,000
Statewide Allocation $ 10,375,000 $ 10,375,000
Special Project $ 0 $ 2,975,036
Management and Oversight $ 455,000 $ 511,895
Review, Evaluation, and Assessment of Proposals $ 295,000 $ 295,000
TOTAL $ 21,500,000 $ 24,531,931
19-673 NEW ORLEANS CENTER FOR THE CREATIVE ARTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
NOCCA Instruction -
Authorized Positions (79) (78)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,082,976 $ 1,003,708
Discretionary Expenditures $ 9,816,999 $ 10,186,711
Program Description: Provides an instructional program of professional arts training for
high school level students.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 10,899,975 $ 11,190,419
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 871,106 $ 794,335
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 131,276 $ 129,199
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 80,594 $ 80,174
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 1,082,976 $ 1,003,708
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,291,968 $ 7,678,159
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,525,031 $ 2,508,552
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 9,816,999 $ 10,186,711
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 7,748,173 $ 7,827,117
Operating Expenses $ 2,167,552 $ 2,072,558
Professional Services $ 124,560 $ 164,560
Other Charges $ 742,760 $ 756,184
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 116,930 $ 370,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 10,899,975 $ 11,190,419
Page 164 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the NOCCA Instruction
Program to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 5,420
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURE FORECAST
In accordance with Act 401 of the 2017 Regular Legislative Session, below is the listing of
the incentive expenditure programs based on the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference. This department administers the following incentive expenditure program:
INCENTIVE EXPENDITURES: AUTHORITY FORECAST
Rebates for Donations to School Tuition
Organizations R.S. 47:6301 $ 26,988,000
19-678 STATE ACTIVITIES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative Support -
Authorized Positions (95) (95)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,678,278 $ 7,809,825
Discretionary Expenditures $ 18,803,013 $ 20,005,160
Program Description: Performs the functions of the state relating to accounting and
budget control, procurement and contract management, management and program analysis,
and grants management, all in accordance with applicable law.
District Support -
Authorized Positions (406) (406)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,174,294 $ 7,162,335
Discretionary Expenditures $ 164,026,879 $ 168,215,153
Program Description: Supports local education agencies in identifying opportunities and
resources for improved instructional leadership, effective policy and practice, and
comprehensive intervention in their lowest-performing schools. Serves as the office having
primary responsibility for communications with and support for all local superintendents,
charter school leaders, and school administrative staff throughout the state.
Auxiliary Account -
Authorized Positions (10) (10)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 185,929 $ 175,603
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,514,609 $ 1,574,519
Program Description: Consolidates the self-generated funding collected by the Curriculum
Resources and Teacher Certification Divisions to financially support those functions.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 199,383,002 $ 204,942,595
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 8,218,965 $ 8,498,528
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 192,631 $ 183,759
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 223,461 $ 219,364
Page 165 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund - Environmental
Education Account $ 5,969 $ 6,357
Federal Funds $ 6,397,475 $ 6,239,755
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 15,038,501 $ 15,147,763
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 55,067,032 $ 57,015,368
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 12,489,572 $ 12,498,444
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 6,764,036 $ 8,076,276
Statutory Dedications:
Conservation Fund - Environmental
Education Account $ 56,541 $ 56,153
Reading Enrichment and Academic
Deliverables (READ) Fund $ 1,000,000 $ 0
Dyslexia Fund $ 1,000,000 $ 0
Federal Funds $ 107,967,320 $ 112,148,591
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 184,344,501 $ 189,794,832
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 63,849,296 $ 66,120,300
Operating Expenses $ 12,616,201 $ 12,661,104
Professional Services $ 47,453,124 $ 46,786,048
Other Charges $ 75,464,381 $ 80,043,766
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 199,383,002 $ 205,611,218
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for a learning
management system pilot program for public
secondary and postsecondary education systems $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Reading Enrichment
and Academic Deliverables Fund to the District
Support Program in the event that House Bill
No. 313 of the 2026 Regular Session of the
Louisiana Legislature becomes law $ 3,500,000
Payable out of Federal Funds to the District
Support Program to align with projected
expenditures for existing federal formula grants $ 12,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Dyslexia Fund
to the District Support Program for the Dyslexia
Core Assessment Program $ 900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program to hire Chief
Operating Officers for schools that have not
met the expenditure requirement contained in
the Minimum Foundation Program formula $ 500,000
Page 166 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for Magic
School AI Pilot Program to support the
Franklin Parish, Catahoula Parish and Caldwell
Parish School Systems $ 35,000
Payable out of Federal Funds to the District
Support Program for various grants $ 6,912,419
Payable out of State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for the
MindPlay dyslexia pilot program $ 3,000,000
Payable out of State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Support Program for the
Zearn online math tutoring program $ 3,000,000
19-681 SUBGRANTEE ASSISTANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Non Federal Support -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 20,132,340 $ 17,674,579
Discretionary Expenditures $ 262,171,058 $ 262,506,246
Program Description: Provides financial assistance to local education agencies and other
providers that serve children, students with disabilities, and children from disadvantaged
backgrounds or high-poverty areas through programs designed to improve student academic
achievement.
Federal Support -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,737,402,763 $ 1,738,032,763
Program Description: Distributes federal flow-through funds to local education agencies
and other providers that serve children, students with disabilities, and children from
disadvantaged backgrounds or high-poverty areas through programs designed to improve
student academic achievement.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 2,019,706,161 $ 2,018,213,588
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,020,231 $ 1,020,231
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Education Excellence Fund $ 19,112,109 $ 16,654,348
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 20,132,340 $ 17,674,579
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 217,506,571 $ 218,983,269
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 14,497,746 $ 12,795,145
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 9,377,789 $ 10,007,789
Page 167 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Early Childhood Education Fund $ 29,766,741 $ 30,327,832
Athletic Trainer Professional
Development Fund $ 400,000 $ 400,000
Federal Funds $ 1,728,024,974 $ 1,728,024,974
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,999,573,821 $ 2,000,539,009
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 2,019,706,161 $ 2,061,911,802
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 2,019,706,161 $ 2,061,911,802
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Non Federal Support Program for the School
Choice Program for Certain Students with
Exceptionalities $ 560,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Non Federal Support Program to
implement Farm Ed programming in schools
across Louisiana $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Education
Excellence Fund to the Non Federal Support
Program to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast $ 17,365,076
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Non Federal Support Program for
classroom library support $ 2,000,000
19-682 RECOVERY SCHOOL DISTRICT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Recovery School District - Instruction -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 159,098 $ 129,587
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,993,861 $ 7,883,498
Program Description: The Recovery School District (RSD) – Instruction Program is an
educational service agency administered by the Louisiana Department of Education with the
approval of the Board of Elementary and Secondary Education (BESE). The RSD provides
an appropriate education for children attending public elementary or secondary schools
operated under the jurisdiction and direction of any city, parish or other local public school
board or any other public entity, which has been transferred to the RSD jurisdiction
pursuant to R.S. 17:10.5.
Recovery School District - Construction -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 3,320,056 $ 3,320,056
Page 168 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: The Recovery School District (RSD) - Construction Program
provides for the multi-year Orleans Parish Reconstruction Master Plan for the renovation
or building of public school facilities.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 11,473,015 $ 11,333,141
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 94,362 $ 73,479
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 64,736 $ 56,108
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 159,098 $ 129,587
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 91,321 $ 96,535
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 7,837,172 $ 7,712,967
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 3,385,424 $ 3,394,052
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 11,313,917 $ 11,203,554
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 1,138,546 $ 993,458
Operating Expenses $ 847,528 $ 847,528
Professional Services $ 3,174,828 $ 3,174,828
Other Charges $ 6,062,113 $ 6,067,327
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 250,000 $ 250,000
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 11,473,015 $ 11,333,141
19-695 MINIMUM FOUNDATION PROGRAM
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Minimum Foundation Program -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,265,688,943 $ 4,066,583,148
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides funding for the cost of a minimum foundation program of
education in all public elementary and secondary schools as well as equitably allocates the
funds to parish and city school systems.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 4,265,688,943 $ 4,066,583,148
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,947,946,759 $ 3,775,474,334
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Support Education in Louisiana
First (the SELF Fund) Fund $ 106,618,662 $ 104,800,814
Lottery Proceeds Fund not to be expended
prior to January 1, 2027 $ 185,800,000 $ 186,308,000
Overcollections Fund $ 25,323,522 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 4,265,688,943 $ 4,066,583,148
Page 169 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
In accordance with Article VIII Section 13.B the governor may reduce the Minimum
Foundation Program appropriations contained in this act provided that any such reduction
is consented to in writing by two-thirds of the elected members of each house of the
legislature.
To ensure and guarantee the state fund match requirements as established by the National
School Lunch Program, public school lunch programs in the aggregate shall receive from
state appropriated funds a minimum of $5,089,767. State fund distribution amounts made
by local education agencies to the school lunch programs shall be made monthly.
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $4, 265,688,943 $ 4,066,583,148
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $4, 265,688,943 $ 4,066,583,148
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($42,760,590).
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Minimum Foundation Program to align
with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 5,707,597
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana Lottery Proceeds Fund by
($5,707,597) to align with the most recent Revenue Estimating Conference (REC) forecast.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Support
Education in Louisiana First Fund to the
Minimum Foundation Program to align with
the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 3,645,206
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) by ($3,645,206) to align with the most recent Revenue
Estimating Conference (REC) forecast.
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Minimum Foundation Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund (Direct) associated with High Dosage Tutoring by ($6,000,000).
19-697 NONPUBLIC EDUCATIONAL ASSISTANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Required Services -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 10,816,924 $ 10,816,924
Page 170 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Reimburses nonpublic schools for costs incurred by each such
school during the preceding school year for providing school services, maintaining records,
and completing and filing reports, and providing required education-related data.
School Lunch Salary Supplement -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,002,614 $ 7,002,614
Program Description: Provides salary supplements for lunchroom employees at eligible
nonpublic schools.
Textbook Administration -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 129,586 $ 129,586
Program Description: Provides State funds for the administrative costs incurred by public
school systems that order and disburse school library books, textbooks, and other materials
of instruction to nonpublic school students.
Textbooks -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 2,745,655 $ 2,645,655
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides State funds for the purchase of books and other materials
of instruction for eligible nonpublic schools.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 20,694,779 $ 20,594,779
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 2,745,655 $ 2,645,655
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 2,745,655 $ 2,645,655
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 17,949,124 $ 17,949,124
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 17,949,124 $ 17,949,124
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 20,694,779 $ 20,594,779
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 20,694,779 $ 20,594,779
Page 171 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER
HEALTH CARE SERVICES DIVISION
19-610 LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER
HEALTH CARE SERVICES DIVISION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Lallie Kemp Regional Medical Center -
Authorized Positions (0) (0)
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 22,329,185 $ 21,318,881
Discretionary Expenditures $ 51,257,251 $ 53,388,462
Program Description: Acute care allied health professionals teaching hospital located in
Independence providing inpatient and outpatient acute care hospital services, including
emergency room and scheduled clinic services, direct patient care physician services,
medical support (ancillary) services, and general support services. This facility is certified
triennially (for a three-year period) by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare
Organizations (JCAHO).
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 73,586,436 $ 74,707,343
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 17,552,491 $ 16,824,122
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 3,917,985 $ 3,441,906
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 440,829 $ 687,853
Federal Funds $ 417,880 $ 365,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY): $ 22,329,185 $ 21,318,881
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,514,366 $ 8,368,154
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 13,087,969 $ 10,035,989
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 25,630,172 $ 29,797,301
Federal Funds $ 5,024,744 $ 5,187,018
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 51,257,251 $ 53,388,462
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 31,872,067 $ 33,003,822
Operating Expenses $ 14,377,720 $ 14,377,720
Professional Services $ 2,973,309 $ 2,973,309
Other Charges $ 23,931,592 $ 23,920,744
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 431,748 $ 431,748
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 73,586,436 $ 74,707,343
Page 172 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 20
OTHER REQUIREMENTS
20-451 LOCAL HOUSING OF STATE ADULT OFFENDERS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Local Housing of Adult Offenders
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 158,407,349 $ 156,988,660
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides a safe and secure environment for adult offenders who
have been committed to state custody and are awaiting transfer to the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections (DPS&C), Corrections Services (CS). Due to space limitations in
state correctional institutions, the DPS&C-CS continues its partnership with the Louisiana
Sheriffs’ Association and other local governing authorities by utilizing parish and local jails
for housing offenders.
Transitional Work Program
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 12,876,673 $ 15,056,818
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides housing, recreation, and other treatment activities for
transitional work program participants housed through contracts with private providers and
cooperative endeavor agreements with local sheriffs.
Local Reentry Services
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,849,992 $ 4,849,992
Program Description: Provides reentry services for state offenders housed in local
correctional facilities through contracts with local sheriffs and private providers.
Criminal Justice Reinvestment Initiative
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 29,054,815 $ 29,054,815
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides funding to incentivize the expansion of recidivism
reduction programming and treatment services by investing in reentry services, community
supervision, education and vocational programing, transitional work programs, and
contracting with parish jails and local facilities.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 205,188,829 $ 205,950,285
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 200,338,837 $ 201,100,293
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 200,338,837 $ 201,100,293
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,849,992 $ 4,849,992
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 4,849,992 $ 4,849,992
Page 173 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 205,188,829 $ 205,950,285
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 205,188,829 $ 205,950,285
20-452 LOCAL HOUSING OF STATE JUVENILE OFFENDERS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Local Housing of Juvenile Offenders
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
Program Description: Provides parish and local jail space for housing juvenile offenders
in state custody who are awaiting transfer to Corrections Services.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 8,069,565 $ 8,069,401
20-901 SALES TAX DEDICATIONS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Sales Tax Dedications -
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 74,631,032 $ 61,052,125
Program Description: Percentage of the hotel/motel tax collected in various parishes or
cities which is used for economic development, tourism and economic development,
construction, capital improvements and maintenance, and other local endeavors.
Acadia Parish $ 97,244 $ 97,244
Allen Parish $ 215,871 $ 215,871
Ascension Parish $ 1,250,000 $ 1,250,000
Avoyelles Parish $ 120,053 $ 120,053
Baker $ 39,499 $ 39,499
Beauregard Parish $ 118,482 $ 105,278
Page 174 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Bienville Parish $ 27,527 $ 27,527
Bossier Parish $ 1,874,272 $ 1,874,272
Bossier/Caddo Parishes - Shreveport-Bossier
Convention and Tourist Bureau $ 557,032 $ 557,032
Caddo Parish - Shreveport Riverfront and
Convention Center $ 3,242,386 $ 1,822,408
Calcasieu Parish - City of Lake Charles $ 3,158,003 $ 3,158,003
Calcasieu Parish - West Calcasieu
Community Center $ 1,292,593 $ 1,292,593
Caldwell Parish - Industrial Development Board
of the Parish of Caldwell, Inc. $ 169 $ 169
Cameron Parish Police Jury $ 19,597 $ 19,597
City of Pineville - Economic Development $ 222,535 $ 222,535
Claiborne Parish - Town of Homer $ 18,782 $ 18,782
Claiborne Parish Police Jury $ 517 $ 517
Concordia Parish $ 87,738 $ 87,738
Desoto Parish Tourism Commission $ 284,432 $ 148,315
East Baton Rouge Parish $ 1,387,936 $ 1,387,936
East Baton Rouge Parish - Community
Improvement $ 2,575,872 $ 2,575,872
East Baton Rouge Parish Riverside Centroplex $ 1,249,308 $ 1,249,308
East Carroll Parish $ 14,316 $ 7,158
East Feliciana Parish $ 2,693 $ 2,693
Ernest N. Morial Convention Center, Phase IV
Expansion Project Fund $ 2,000,000 $ 2,000,000
Evangeline Parish $ 43,071 $ 43,071
Franklin Parish - Franklin Parish Tourism
Commission $ 57,000 $ 42,000
Grand Isle Tourism Commission
Enterprise Account $ 28,295 $ 28,295
Grant Parish Police Jury $ 2,007 $ 2,007
Iberia Parish - Iberia Parish Tourist Commission $ 528,751 $ 424,794
Iberville Parish $ 116,858 $ 116,858
Jackson Parish - Jackson Parish Tourism
Commission $ 27,775 $ 27,775
Jefferson Davis Parish - Jefferson Davis Parish
Tourist Commission $ 310,262 $ 155,131
Jefferson Parish $ 3,794,493 $ 3,096,138
Jefferson Parish - City of Gretna $ 118,389 $ 118,389
Lafayette Parish $ 5,540,101 $ 3,140,101
Lafourche ARC $ 344,734 $ 344,734
Lafourche Parish - Lafourche Parish Tourist
Commission $ 349,984 $ 349,984
LaSalle Parish - LaSalle Economic Development
District/Jena Cultural Center $ 21,791 $ 21,791
Lincoln Parish - Municipalities of Choudrant,
Dubach, Simsboro, Grambling, Ruston,
and Vienna $ 258,492 $ 258,492
Lincoln Parish - Ruston-Lincoln Convention
Visitors Bureau $ 524,858 $ 262,429
Livingston Parish - Livingston Parish Tourist
Commission and Livingston Economic
Development Council $ 332,516 $ 332,516
Madison Parish $ 34,326 $ 34,326
Morehouse Parish $ 49,643 $ 40,972
Morehouse Parish - City of Bastrop $ 40,357 $ 40,357
Natchitoches Parish - Natchitoches
Historic District Development Commission $ 398,956 $ 319,165
Natchitoches Parish - Natchitoches Parish Tourist
Commission $ 130,000 $ 130,000
Page 175 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
New Orleans Area Tourism and Economic
Development $ 466 $ 466
Orleans Parish – City of New Orleans Short Term
Rental Administration $ 8,600,000 $ 4,300,000
Orleans Parish - N.O. Metro Convention and
Visitors Bureau $ 12,635,069 $ 12,635,069
Ouachita Parish - Monroe-West Monroe
Convention and Visitors Bureau $ 4,969,351 $ 1,938,998
Plaquemines Parish $ 228,102 $ 228,102
Pointe Coupee Parish $ 40,281 $ 40,281
Rapides Parish – Alexandria Economic
Development $ 370,891 $ 370,891
Rapides Parish - Alexandria/Pineville Area
Convention and Visitors Bureau $ 242,310 $ 242,310
Rapides Parish - Alexandria/Pineville
Exhibition Hall $ 250,417 $ 250,417
Rapides Parish - Coliseum $ 74,178 $ 74,178
Red River Parish $ 34,733 $ 34,733
Richland Parish $ 129,215 $ 116,715
River Parishes (St. John the Baptist, St. James,
and St. Charles Parishes) $ 220,216 $ 201,547
Sabine Parish - Sabine Parish Tourist and
Recreation Commission $ 599,832 $ 172,203
St. Bernard Parish $ 116,399 $ 116,399
St. Charles Parish Council $ 1,256,583 $ 250,000
St. James Parish $ 30,756 $ 30,756
St. John the Baptist Parish - St. John the Baptist
Conv. Facility $ 329,036 $ 329,036
St. Landry Parish $ 767,159 $ 373,159
St. Martin Parish - St. Martin Parish Tourist
Commission $ 472,179 $ 300,000
St. Mary Parish - St. Mary Parish Tourist
Commission $ 1,424,892 $ 580,000
St. Tammany Parish - St. Tammany Parish
Tourist and Convention Commission/
St. Tammany Parish Development District $ 3,408,408 $ 2,762,086
Tangipahoa Parish $ 235,000 $ 1,305,000
Tangipahoa Parish - Tangipahoa Parish Tourist
Commission $ 800,000 $ 2,590,000
Tensas Parish $ 1,941 $ 1,941
Terrebonne Parish - Houma Area Convention
and Visitors Bureau $ 835,417 $ 716,178
Terrebonne Parish - Houma Area Convention
and Visitors Bureau/Houma Area Downtown
Development Corporation $ 750,000 $ 750,000
Union Parish – Union Parish Tourist Commission $ 54,464 $ 27,232
Vermilion Parish $ 269,341 $ 250,550
Vernon Parish $ 543,333 $ 428,272
Washington Parish - Economic Development
and Tourism $ 14,486 $ 14,486
Washington Parish - Infrastructure and Park
Projects $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Washington Parish - Washington Parish Tourist
Commission $ 43,025 $ 43,025
Webster Parish - Webster Parish Convention &
Visitors Commission $ 170,769 $ 170,769
West Baton Rouge Parish $ 1,495,436 $ 1,495,436
West Carroll Parish $ 17,076 $ 17,076
West Feliciana Parish - St. Francisville $ 178,424 $ 178,424
Page 176 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Winn Parish - Greater Winn Parish Development
Corporation for the Louisiana Political
Museum & Hall of Fame $ 62,331 $ 56,665
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 74,631,032 $ 61,052,125
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Acadia Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 97,244 $ 97,244
(R.S. 47:302.22)
Alexandria/Pineville Area Tourism Fund $ 242,310 $ 242,310
(R.S. 47:302.30, 322.32)
Alexandria/Pineville Exhibition Hall Fund $ 250,417 $ 250,417
(R.S. 33:4574.7(K))
Allen Parish Capital Improvements Fund $ 215,871 $ 215,871
(R.S. 47:302.36, 322.7, 332.28)
Ascension Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 1,250,000 $ 1,250,000
(R.S. 47:302.21)
Avoyelles Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 120,053 $ 120,053
(R.S. 47:302.6, 322.29, 332.21)
Baker Economic Development Fund $ 39,499 $ 39,499
(R.S. 47:302.50, 322.42, 332.48)
Bastrop Municipal Center Fund $ 40,357 $ 40,357
(R.S. 47:322.17, 332.34)
Beauregard Parish Community
Improvement Fund $ 118,482 $ 105,278
(R.S. 47:302.24, 322.8, 332.12)
Bienville Parish Tourism and Economic
Development Fund $ 27,527 $ 27,527
(R.S. 47:302.51, 322.43, 332.49)
Bossier City Riverfront and Civic
Center Fund $ 1,874,272 $ 1,874,272
(R.S. 47:332.7)
Caldwell Parish Economic Development
Fund $ 169 $ 169
(R.S. 47:322.36)
Cameron Parish Tourism Development
Fund $ 19,597 $ 19,597
(R.S. 47:302.25, 322.12, 332.31)
Claiborne Parish Tourism and Economic
Development Fund $ 517 $ 517
(R.S. 47:302.52)
Concordia Parish Economic Development
Fund $ 87,738 $ 87,738
(R.S. 47:302.53, 322.45, 332.51)
DeSoto Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 284,432 $ 148,315
(R.S. 47:302.39)
East Baton Rouge Parish Community
Improvement Fund $ 2,575,872 $ 2,575,872
(R.S. 47:302.29)
East Baton Rouge Parish Enhancement
Fund $ 1,387,936 $ 1,387,936
(R.S. 47:322.9)
Page 177 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
East Baton Rouge Parish Riverside
Centroplex Fund $ 1,249,308 $ 1,249,308
(R.S. 47:332.2)
East Carroll Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 14,316 $ 7,158
(R.S. 47:302.32, 322.3, 332.26)
East Feliciana Tourist Commission Fund $ 2,693 $ 2,693
(R.S. 47:302.47, 322.27, 332.42)
Ernest N. Morial Convention Center
Phase IV Expansion Project Fund $ 2,000,000 $ 2,000,000
(R.S. 47:322.38)
Evangeline Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 43,071 $ 43,071
(R.S. 47:302.49, 322.41, 332.47)
Franklin Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 57,000 $ 42,000
(R.S. 47:302.34)
Grand Isle Tourist Commission
Enterprise Account $ 28,295 $ 28,295
(R.S. 47:322.34, 332.1)
Grant Parish Economic Development
Fund $ 2,007 $ 2,007
(R.S. 47:302.55)
Houma/Terrebonne Tourist Fund $ 835,417 $ 716,178
(R.S. 47:302.20)
Iberia Parish Tourist Commission Fund $ 528,751 $ 424,794
(R.S. 47:302.13)
Iberville Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 116,858 $ 116,858
(R.S. 47:332.18)
Jackson Parish Economic Development
and Tourism Fund $ 27,775 $ 27,775
(R.S. 47: 302.35)
Jefferson Parish Convention Center Fund -
Gretna Tourist Commission
Enterprise Account $ 118,389 $ 118,389
(R.S. 47:322.34, 332.1)
Jefferson Davis Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 310,262 $ 155,131
(R.S. 47:302.38, 322.14, 332.32)
Jefferson Parish Convention Center Fund $ 3,794,493 $ 3,096,138
(R.S. 47:322.34, 332.1)
Lafayette Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 5,540,101 $ 3,140,101
(R.S. 47:302.18, 322.28, 332.9)
Lafourche Parish Association for
Retarded Citizens (ARC)
Training and Development Fund $ 344,734 $ 344,734
(R.S. 47:322.46, 332.52)
Lafourche Parish Enterprise Fund $ 349,984 $ 349,984
(R.S. 47:302.19)
Lake Charles Civic Center Fund $ 3,158,003 $ 3,158,003
(R.S. 47:322.11, 332.30)
LaSalle Economic Development
District Fund $ 21,791 $ 21,791
(R.S. 47: 302.48, 322.35, 332.46)
Lincoln Parish Municipalities Fund $ 258,492 $ 258,492
(R.S. 47:322.33, 332.43)
Lincoln Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 524,858 $ 262,429
(R.S. 47:302.8)
Livingston Parish Tourism and
Economic Development Fund $ 332,516 $ 332,516
(R.S. 47:302.41, 322.21, 332.36)
Page 178 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Madison Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 34,326 $ 34,326
(R.S. 47:302.4, 322.18, 332.44)
Morehouse Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 49,643 $ 40,972
(R.S. 47:302.9)
New Orleans Metropolitan Convention
and Visitors Bureau Fund $ 12,635,069 $ 12,635,069
(R.S. 47:332.10)
Natchitoches Historic District
Development Fund $ 398,956 $ 319,165
(R.S. 47:302.10, 322.13, 332.5)
Natchitoches Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 130,000 $ 130,000
(R.S. 47:302.10)
New Orleans Area Economic
Development Fund $ 466 $ 466
(R.S. 47:322.38)
New Orleans Quality of Life Fund $ 8,600,000 $ 4,300,000
(R.S. 47:302.56)
Ouachita Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 4,969,351 $ 1,938,998
(R.S. 47:302.7, 322.1, 332.16)
Pineville Economic Development Fund $ 222,535 $ 222,535
(R.S. 47:302.30)
Plaquemines Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 228,102 $ 228,102
(R.S. 47:302.40, 322.20, 332.35)
Pointe Coupee Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 40,281 $ 40,281
(R.S. 47:302.28, 332.17)
Rapides Parish Coliseum Fund $ 74,178 $ 74,178
(R.S. 47:322.32)
Rapides Parish Economic Development
Fund $ 370,891 $ 370,891
(R.S. 47:302.30, 322.32)
Red River Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 34,733 $ 34,733
(R.S. 47:302.45, 322.40, 332.45)
Richland Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 129,215 $ 116,715
(R.S. 47:302.4, 322.18, 332.44)
River Parishes Convention, Tourist,
and Visitors Commission Fund $ 220,216 $ 201,547
(R.S. 47:322.15)
Sabine Parish Tourism Improvement Fund $ 599,832 $ 172,203
(R.S. 47:302.37, 322.10, 332.29)
Shreveport Riverfront and Convention
Center and Independence
Stadium Fund $ 3,242,386 $ 1,822,408
(R.S. 47:302.2, 332.6)
Shreveport-Bossier City Visitor
Enterprise Fund $ 557,032 $ 557,032
(R.S. 47:322.30)
St. Bernard Parish Enterprise Fund $ 116,399 $ 116,399
(R.S. 47:322.39, 332.22)
St. Charles Parish Enterprise Fund $ 1,256,583 $ 250,000
(R.S. 47:302.11, 332.24)
St. Francisville Economic Development
Fund $ 178,424 $ 178,424
(R.S. 47:302.46, 322.26, 332.41)
St. James Parish Enterprise Fund $ 30,756 $ 30,756
(R.S. 47:332.23)
Page 179 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
St. John the Baptist Convention Facility
Fund $ 329,036 $ 329,036
(R.S. 47:332.4)
St. Landry Parish Historical Development
Fund #1 $ 767,159 $ 373,159
(R.S. 47:332.20)
St. Martin Parish Enterprise Fund $ 472,179 $ 300,000
(R.S. 47:302.27)
St. Mary Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 1,424,892 $ 580,000
(R.S. 47:302.44, 322.25, 332.40)
St. Tammany Parish Fund $ 3,408,408 $ 2,762,086
(R.S. 47:302.26, 322.37, 332.13)
Tangipahoa Parish Economic
Development Fund $ 235,000 $ 1,305,000
(R.S. 47:322.5)
Tangipahoa Parish Tourist Commission
Fund $ 800,000 $ 2,590,000
(R.S. 47:302.17, 332.14)
Tensas Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 1,941 $ 1,941
(R.S. 47:302.33, 322.4, 332.27)
Terrebonne Parish Visitor Enterprise
Fund $ 750,000 $ 750,000
(R.S. 47:322.24, 332.39)
Town of Homer Economic Development
Fund $ 18,782 $ 18,782
(R.S. 47:302.42, 322.22, 332.37)
Union Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 54,464 $ 27,232
(R.S. 47:302.43, 322.23, 332.38)
Vermilion Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund $ 269,341 $ 250,550
(R.S. 47:302.23, 322.31, 332.11)
Vernon Parish Legislative Community
Improvement Fund $ 543,333 $ 428,272
(R.S. 47:302.5, 322.19, 332.3)
Washington Parish Economic
Development and Tourism Fund $ 14,486 $ 14,486
(R.S. 47:322.6)
Washington Parish Infrastructure and
Park Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
(R.S. 47:332.8(C))
Washington Parish Tourist Commission
Fund $ 43,025 $ 43,025
(R.S. 47:332.8)
Webster Parish Convention and Visitors
Commission Fund $ 170,769 $ 170,769
(R.S. 47:302.15)
West Baton Rouge Parish Visitor
Enterprise Fund $ 1,495,436 $ 1,495,436
(R.S. 47:332.19)
West Calcasieu Community Center Fund $ 1,292,593 $ 1,292,593
(R.S. 47:302.12, 322.11, 332.30)
West Carroll Parish Visitor
Enterprise Fund $ 17,076 $ 17,076
(R.S. 47:302.31, 322.2, 332.25)
Winn Parish Tourism Fund $ 62,331 $ 56,665
(R.S. 47:302.16, 322.16, 332.33)
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 74,631,032 $ 61,052,125
Page 180 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 74,631,032 $ 58,227,072
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 74,631,032 $ 58,227,072
Provided, however, that from the funds appropriated herein out of the Richland Parish
Visitor Enterprise Fund, $25,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the town of Delhi of
which amount $5,000 shall be allocated to the Delhi Municipal Golf Course and the
remainder shall be allocated for the Cave Theater; $10,000 shall be allocated and distributed
to the town of Mangham for downtown development; and $25,000 shall be allocated and
distributed to the town of Rayville for downtown development. In the event that total
revenues deposited in this fund are insufficient to fully fund such allocations, each entity
shall receive the same pro rata share of the monies available which its allocation represents
to the total.
Provided, however, that in the event that the monies in the Jefferson Parish Convention
Center Fund exceed $1,200,000 for FY 2026-2027, at least $1,200,000 shall be allocated for
the purposes provided for in R.S. 47:322.34 and 332.1.
Provided further, out of the remaining monies appropriated herein out of the Jefferson Parish
Convention Center Fund, $350,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the Jefferson
Performing Arts Society - East Bank, $250,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the
Jefferson Performing Arts Society - city of Westwego, $100,000 shall be allocated and
distributed to the city of Westwego for the Westwego Farmers and Fisherman's Market,
$50,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the city of Westwego for improvements to Sala
Avenue, $25,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the city of Westwego for the Creative
Arts Center, $50,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the city of Westwego for
Westwego Fest, $250,000 shall be allocated and distributed to Jefferson Parish for FORE
Kids Foundation for Zurich Classic, $150,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the city
of Westwego for the WHARF project, $250,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the city
of Gretna for the Marketing Program for Gretna Festin', $250,000 shall be allocated and
distributed to the city of Gretna - Gretna Festin', $25,000 shall be allocated and distributed
to Jefferson Parish for improvements to Parc Des Familles, $150,000 shall be allocated and
distributed to the Jefferson Parish Council for the New Growth Economic Development
Association, $275,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the Jefferson Parish Council for
Hope Haven Festival Park Improvements and festivals, $25,000 shall be allocated and
distributed to the Jefferson Parish Council for the Louisiana Crawfish Boiling
Championships, and $30,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the town of Jean Lafitte
for the Lafitte Fisheries Market. If the remaining monies in the fund are insufficient to fully
fund the allocations provided for in this paragraph after fulfilling any other requirement of
this Act, then the allocations provided for in this paragraph shall each receive a pro rata
share of the monies available. Any funds remaining after the above obligations are met shall
be allocated and distributed to the Alario Center for maintenance and improvements.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and Independence
Stadium Fund to the Caddo Parish Commission for
sports, tourism, and activities at Independence
Stadium $ 60,000
Page 181 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and Independence
Stadium Fund to Rho Omega and Friends, Inc. for
the Let the Good Times Roll Festival and youth
programs $ 120,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and Independence
Stadium Fund to the Shreveport Downtown
Development Authority for riverfront activities
and small business development programs $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and Independence
Stadium Fund to the Caddo Parish Sheriff's Office
for special downtown patrol and operations $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and Independence
Stadium Fund to the Caddo Parish Commission
for Foundation Counseling, Coaching &
Consultations, LLC. for a pretrial pilot program
with the Caddo Parish Sheriff's Office $ 80,000
Payable out of State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the New Orleans
Quality of Life Fund to the city of New
Orleans for the city of New Orleans Short
Term Rental Administration $ 4,300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund to the
Fit for Life Health and Wellness expo $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund
to the Oil and Gas Museum $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund
to the State Fair of Louisiana $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund
to the Pamoja Art Society $ 10,000
Page 182 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund to the Eddie E.
Hughes Foundation for the Shreveport Stuffed
Shrimp Festival $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for Oil Gusher
Days in Oil City $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Poke
Salad Festival in Blanchard $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Sunflower
Festival in Gilliam $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Shreveport
Water Works Museum $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the
Shreveport-Bossier African American Chamber
of Commerce $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Lafayette
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the Lafayette
Parish Convention and Visitors Commission $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Lafayette
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to Lafayette
Central Park $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Charles
Enterprise Fund to the St. Charles Parish
Government for engineering, design, and
construction for improvements to Louisiana
Highway 18 between Edward Dufresne
Parkway and Louisiana Highway 52 $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Landry
Parish Historical Development Fund No. 1 to
the St. Landry Parish Tourist Commission $ 110,000
Page 183 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Martin
Parish Enterprise Fund to the St. Martin
Parish Government for tourism and
economic development purposes $ 174,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to St. Mary
Parish Government for park upgrades $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Morgan City for city archives $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Morgan City for the Morgan City Main Street
program $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Franklin for the beautification design committee $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the St. Mary
Chamber of Commerce $ 45,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city
of Morgan City for the Shrimp and
Petroleum Festival $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the town
of Berwick for the Berwick Lighthouse Festival $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city
of Patterson for economic development $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city
of Franklin $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city
of Franklin for festivals $ 25,000
Page 184 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the St. Mary
Parish Government for the Atchafalaya golf
course $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Franklin for Caffery Park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Patterson $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Berwick $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the
St. Mary Parish Government for Kemper
Williams Park upgrades $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the city of
Baldwin $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the St. Mary
Excel $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Mary
Parish Visitor Enterprise Fund to the Cajun
Coast Visitors and Convention Bureau $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund to the Louisiana
State Exhibit Museum $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Sabine Parish
Tourism Improvement Fund to the Sabine
Parish Tourist and Recreation Commission for
tourism enhancement efforts $ 64,978
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Black
Bayou Festival in Hosston $ 10,000
Page 185 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the New Arts
Cultural Society, Inc. $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Robinson
Film Center $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Shreveport
Riverfront and Convention Center and
Independence Stadium Fund for the Arc Caddo-
Bossier $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Tammany
Fund to the St. Tammany Parish Development
District $ 323,161
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the St. Tammany
Parish Fund to the St. Tammany Parish Tourist
and Convention Commission $ 323,161
Provided, however, that from the funds appropriated herein out of the Iberia Parish Tourist
Commission Fund, the monies in the fund shall be allocated and distributed as follows:
$10,000 shall be allocated and distributed to the Jeanerette Museum; $15,000 shall be
allocated and distributed to the Bayou Teche Museum. The remaining monies in the fund
shall be allocated and distributed as follows: forty-five percent (45%) to the Iberia Parish
Convention & Visitors Bureau, twenty-one percent (21%) to the Acadiana Fairgrounds
Commission, eleven percent (11%) to the Iberia Economic Development Authority, ten
percent (10%) to the city of New Iberia for Pepperplex improvements, two percent (2%) to
the city of New Iberia for the Hopkins Street Economic Development District, four percent
(4%) to the Iberia Parish Convention & Visitors Bureau for the Louisiana Sugar Cane
Festival, four percent (4%) to the Iberia Parish Convention & Visitors Bureau for the Greater
Iberia Chamber of Commerce, and three percent (3%) to the Iberia Parish Convention &
Visitors Bureau for the Delcambre Shrimp Festival.
20-903 PARISH TRANSPORTATION
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Parish Road Program (per R.S. 48:751-756(A)(1))
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 34,000,000 $ 34,000,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Parish Road Program (per R.S. 48:751-756(A)(3))
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,445,000 $ 4,445,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Mass Transit Program (per R.S. 48:756(B)-(E))
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 4,955,000 $ 4,955,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Off-system Roads and Bridges Match Program
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 3,000,000 $ 3,000,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Page 186 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides funding to all parishes for roads systems maintenance,
mass transit, and to serve as a match for off-system roads and bridges. Funds distributed
on population-based formula as well as on mileage-based formula.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 46,400,000 $ 46,400,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedication:
Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 46,400,000 $ 46,400,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 46,400,000 $ 46,400,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 46,400,000 $ 46,400,000
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 46,400,000 $ 46,400,000
Provided that the Department of Transportation and Development shall administer the Off-
system Roads and Bridges Match Program.
Provided, however, that out of the funds allocated under the Parish Road Program (R.S.
48:751-756(A)(1)) to Jefferson Parish, the funds shall be allocated directly to the following
municipalities in the amounts listed:
Kenner $ 206,400
Gretna $ 168,000
Westwego $ 168,000
Harahan $ 168,000
Jean Lafitte $ 168,000
Grand Isle $ 168,000
20-905 INTERIM EMERGENCY BOARD
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 36,808 $ 36,808
Program Description: Provides funding for emergency events or occurrences not
reasonably anticipated by the legislature by determining whether such an emergency exists,
obtaining the written consent of two-thirds of the elected members of each house of the
legislature, and appropriating from the general fund or borrowing on the full faith and
credit of the state to meet the emergency, all within constitutional and statutory limitations.
Further provides for administrative costs.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 36,808 $ 36,808
Page 187 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 36,808 $ 36,808
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 36,808 $ 36,808
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 3,500 $ 3,500
Operating Expenses $ 3,000 $ 3,000
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 30,308 $ 30,308
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 36,808 $ 36,808
20-906 DISTRICT ATTORNEYS AND ASSISTANT DISTRICT ATTORNEYS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
District Attorneys and Assistant
District Attorneys
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 40,694,868 $ 40,821,973
Discretionary Expenditures $ 107,653 $ 0
Program Description: Provides state funding for 42 District Attorneys, 624 Assistant
District Attorneys, and 65 victims assistance coordinators statewide. State statute provides
an annual salary of $55,000 per district attorney, $50,000 per assistant district attorney and
$30,000 per victims assistance coordinator.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 40,802,521 $ 40,821,973
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 35,244,868 $ 35,371,973
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Pari-Mutuel Live Racing Facility
Gaming Control Fund $ 50,000 $ 50,000
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 5,400,000 $ 5,400,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 40,694,868 $ 40,821,973
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 107,653 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 107,653 $ 0
Page 188 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 40,802,521 $ 40,821,973
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 40,802,521 $ 40,821,973
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the District Attorneys and Assistant
District Attorneys Program for personnel costs
for an additional sixty warrants $ 3,000,000
20-923 CORRECTIONS DEBT SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Corrections Debt Service
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides principal and interest payments for the Louisiana
Correctional Facilities Corporation Lease Revenue Bonds which were sold for the
construction, purchase, or improvement of correctional facilities.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 7,595,661 $ 7,734,150
20-924 VIDEO DRAW POKER - LOCAL GOVERNMENT AID
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
State Aid
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
Page 189 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides distribution of approximately 25% of funds in Video Draw
Poker Device Fund (less District Attorneys and Asst. District Attorneys dedications of
$5,400,000) to local parishes or municipalities in which devices are operated based on
portion of fees/fines/penalties contributed to total. Funds used for enforcement of statute and
public safety.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Video Draw Poker Device Fund $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 53,741,660 $ 50,663,278
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Video Draw
Poker Device Fund to the State Aid Program to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 2,375,847
20-925 UNCLAIMED PROPERTY LEVERAGE FUND - DEBT SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Debt Service
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides for the payment of debt service and all related costs and
expenses associated therewith on unclaimed property bonds issued by the commission.
Monies from the I-49 North Account and the I-49 South Account shall be used exclusively
to match federal funds to be used by the Department of Transportation and Development for
the costs for and associated with the construction of Interstate 49.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Unclaimed Property Leverage Fund $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
Page 190 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 15,000,000 $ 15,000,000
20-926 SPORTS WAGERING LOCAL ALLOCATION FUND
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Sports Wagering Local Allocation Fund
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 7,000,000 $ 9,650,000
Program Description: Provides a monthly proportionate distribution to each parish
governing authority where the taxes occurred. The distribution is proportionate to the
population percentage in each parish that allows sports wagering.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 7,000,000 $ 9,650,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Sports Wagering Local Allocation Fund $ 7,000,000 $ 9,650,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 7,000,000 $ 9,650,000
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 7,000,000 $ 12,165,750
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 7,000,000 $ 12,165,750
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Sports
Wagering Local Allocation Fund to the Sports
Wagering Local Allocation Fund Program to
align with the most recent Revenue Estimating
Conference (REC) forecast $ 300,000
Page 191 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
20-927 LOCAL REVENUE FUND
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Local Revenue Fund
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
Program Description: Provides solely for distribution to ad valorem tax recipient bodies
within a parish to offset losses attributable to business inventory exemptions to the ad
valorem tax granted by a parish.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Local Revenue Fund $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 42,800,000 $ 50,361,562
The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized and directed to adjust the means
of finance for the Local Revenue Fund Program by reducing the appropriation out of the
State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Local Revenue Fund by
($5,153,394).
20-930 HIGHER EDUCATION - DEBT SERVICE AND MAINTENANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Debt Service and Maintenance
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Payments for indebtedness, equipment leases and maintenance
reserves for Louisiana public postsecondary education.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
Page 192 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 43,859,167 $ 43,858,402
Any funds remaining after the completion of any project outlined in R.S. 17:3394.3 may be
made available and used for other projects provided within R.S. 17:3394.3 that are for the
benefit of the same institution. Prior to the final allocation of such funds, any changes shall
first be reported to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
20-931 LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT – DEBT SERVICE AND
STATE COMMITMENTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Debt Service and State Commitments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 260,030,938 $ 168,981,779
Program Description: Louisiana Economic Development Debt Service and State
Commitments provides for the scheduled annual payments due for bonds and state project
commitments.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 260,030,938 $ 168,981,779
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 23,440,122 $ 56,417,940
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Economic Development Fund $ 64,693,675 $ 25,311,984
Louisiana Mega-Project
Development Fund $ 0 $ 400,000
Rapid Response Fund $ 146,079,741 $ 11,851,855
Major Events Incentive Fund $ 16,400,000 $ 0
Louisiana Economic Development
Initiatives Fund $ 9,417,400 $ 0
High Impact Jobs Fund $ 0 $ 75,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 260,030,938 $ 168,981,779
Page 193 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 260,030,938 $ 168,981,779
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 260,030,938 $ 168,981,779
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Site Investment and
Infrastructure Improvement Fund to the Debt Service
and State Commitments Program for site investment
and infrastructure improvements $ 21,585,169
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Debt
Service and State Commitments Program for
the State Fair of Louisiana for security
infrastructure improvement $ 750,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Major
Events Incentive Fund to the Debt Service
and State Commitments Program for
various major events $ 8,525,000
Provided, however, that of the funds appropriated herein from the Major Events Incentive
Fund, eligible recipient entities include, but are not limited to, the following: 2028 National
Collegiate Football Championship; the Defenders of Liberty Air Show; the Southwest
District Livestock Show and Rodeo; and Tales of the Cocktail.
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to
the Debt Service and State Commitments
Program for economic initiatives for Tulane
University and Charity Hospital $ 10,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to
the Debt Service and State Commitments
Program for economic initiatives associated
with the wood pellet industry $ 5,000,000
20-932 TWO PERCENT FIRE INSURANCE FUND
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
State Aid
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
Page 194 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Program Description: Provides funding to local governments to aid in fire protection. A
2% fee is assessed on fire insurance premiums and remitted to local entities on a per capita
basis.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Two Percent Fire Insurance Fund $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 31,753,450 $ 29,847,251
20-933 GOVERNOR'S CONFERENCES AND INTERSTATE COMPACTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Governor's Conferences and Interstate Compacts
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 594,063 $ 594,063
Program Description: Pays annual membership dues with national organizations of which
the state is a participating member. The state through this program pays dues to the
following associations: National Association of State Budget Officers, National Governors'
Association, Education Commission of the States, Delta Regional Authority, and the
International Organization De La Francophonie.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 594,063 $ 594,063
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 594,063 $ 594,063
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 594,063 $ 594,063
Page 195 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 594,063 $ 594,063
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 0 $ 0
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 594,063 $ 594,063
20-939 PREPAID WIRELESS 911 SERVICE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Prepaid Wireless 911 Service
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides for the remittance of fees imposed upon the consumer who
purchases a prepaid wireless telecommunication service to local 911 communication
districts.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from
prior and current year collections $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY): $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 14,000,000 $ 14,000,000
20-940 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES - PARISHES AND
MUNICIPALITIES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Emergency Medical Services
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 150,000 $ 150,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides funding for emergency medical services and public safety
needs to parishes and municipalities; $4.50 of the driver's license reinstatement fee is
distributed to parish or municipality of origin.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 150,000 $ 150,000
Page 196 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund by:
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 150,000 $ 150,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 150,000 $ 150,000
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 150,000 $ 150,000
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 150,000 $ 150,000
20-941 AGRICULTURE AND FORESTRY – PASS THROUGH FUNDS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Agriculture and Forestry – Pass Through Funds
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 32,512,858 $ 28,955,334
Program Description: Pass through funds for the 44 Soil and Water Conservation Districts
in Louisiana, The Emergency Food Assistance Program, Specialty Crop Block Grant,
Volunteer Fire Assistance, Urban and Community Forestry, State Fire Assistance
Mitigation, Forest Health Monitoring, Forest Stewardship Program, Legacy Program,
Louisiana Horse Racing Industry Promotion, Forest Productivity Program, Agricultural
Commodity Commission Self-Insurance Fund, and the Grain and Cotton Indemnity Fund.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 32,512,858 $ 28,955,334
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 5,679,891 $ 2,679,789
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 580,000 $ 1,069,398
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 248,774 $ 248,774
Statutory Dedications:
Louisiana Agricultural Finance
Authority Fund $ 200,000 $ 200,000
Agricultural Commodity Commission
Self-Insurance Fund $ 266,001 $ 266,001
Forestry Productivity Fund $ 4,000,000 $ 2,953,180
Grain and Cotton Indemnity Fund $ 753,522 $ 753,522
Louisiana Equine Promotion and $ 500,000 $ 500,000
Research Fund
Federal Funds $ 20,284,670 $ 20,284,670
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 32,512,858 $ 28,955,334
Page 197 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 32,512,858 $ 28,955,334
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 32,512,858 $ 28,955,334
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be administered by the
commissioner of agriculture and forestry.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Agriculture and Forestry - Pass Through
Funds Program for Louisiana Agricultural
Finance Authority for two additional grain bins
for the South Louisiana Rail Facility rice mill $ 2,000,000
20-945 STATE AID TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITIES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Miscellaneous Aid
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 285,618,968 $ 24,400,093
Program Description: This program provides special state direct aid to specific local
entities for various initiatives.
26th Judicial District Court Truancy Programs $ 584,838 $ 282,798
Affiliated Blind of Louisiana Training Center $ 500,000 $ 500,000
Algiers Economic Development Foundation $ 100,569 $ 100,569
Beautification Project for New Orleans
Neighborhoods $ 307,370 $ 100,000
Calcasieu Parish School Board $ 813,900 $ 695,460
Criminal Justice and First Responders
Fund $ 3,262,860 $ 0
Fiscal Administrator Revolving Loans $ 455,646 $ 455,646
FORE Kids Foundation $ 100,000 $ 100,000
Friends of NORD $ 128,890 $ 100,000
Gentilly Development District $ 205,021 $ 100,014
Greater New Orleans Sports Foundation $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
LA Cancer Research Center of LSU HSCNO
and Tulane HSC $ 7,891,635 $ 11,503,984
Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure
Fund $ 500,000 $ 0
Law Enforcement Recruitment
Incentive Fund Program $ 635,000 $ 0
Lighthouse for the Blind in New Orleans $ 655,675 $ 500,000
Louisiana Association for the Blind $ 679,650 $ 500,000
Louisiana Bar Foundation $ 4,220,853 $ 4,220,853
Louisiana Center for the Blind at Ruston $ 500,000 $ 500,000
New Orleans City Park Improvement
Association $ 1,830,459 $ 1,857,500
Regional Maintenance and Improvement
Fund Program $ 7,225,548 $ 1,358,670
Southwest LA Hurricane Recovery
Fund Program $ 112,036 $ 0
Modernization and Security Fund $ 2,208,006 $ 0
Louisiana Rescue Plan Fund $ 2,900,000 $ 0
Page 198 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
St. Landry School Board $ 584,578 $ 524,599
State Aid to Local Governmental Entities $ 210,216,434 $ 0

TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 285,618,968 $ 24,400,093
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 252,437,287 $ 7,050,741
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Algiers Economic Development
Foundation Fund $ 100,569 $ 100,569
Beautification Project for New Orleans
Neighborhoods Fund $ 307,370 $ 100,000
Beautification and Improvement of the
New Orleans City Park Fund $ 1,830,459 $ 1,857,500
Bossier Parish Truancy Program Fund $ 584,838 $ 282,798
Calcasieu Parish Fund $ 813,900 $ 695,460
Fiscal Administrator Revolving Loan Fund $ 455,646 $ 455,646
Friends of NORD Fund $ 128,890 $ 100,000
Gentilly Development District Fund $ 205,021 $ 100,014
Greater New Orleans Sports Foundation
Fund $ 1,000,000 $ 1,000,000
Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure
Fund $ 500,000 $ 0
Criminal Justice and First Responders
Fund $ 3,262,860 $ 0
Regional Maintenance and
Improvement Fund $ 7,225,548 $ 1,358,670
Rehabilitation for the Blind and Visually
Impaired Fund $ 2,335,325 $ 2,000,000
Sports Facility Assistance Fund $ 100,000 $ 100,000
St. Landry Parish Excellence Fund $ 584,578 $ 524,599
Southwest Louisiana Hurricane
Recovery Fund $ 112,036 $ 0
Law Enforcement Recruitment
Incentive Fund $ 635,000 $ 0
Louisiana Rescue Plan Fund $ 2,900,000 $ 0
Modernization and Security Fund $ 2,208,006 $ 0
Tobacco Tax Health Care Fund $ 7,891,635 $ 8,674,096
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 285,618,968 $ 24,400,093
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 285,618,968 $ 24,400,093
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 285,618,968 $ 24,400,093
Page 199 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Plaquemine for building acquisition
and improvements for downtown development $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Regional
Maintenance and Improvement Fund to the
Miscellaneous Aid Program to align with the
most recent Revenue Estimating Conference
(REC) forecast $ 141,330
Payable out of the State General Fund
by Statutory Dedications out of the Regional
Maintenance and Improvement Fund to
Jefferson Parish for a pedestrian bridge on
LA Highway 541 in Westwego $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Lighthouse Louisiana for the purchase of a
new paper towel manufacturing machine and
warehouse installation modifications $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Magnolia Community Services for
renovations and upgrades to Whitehall $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Brandon Kirk Sims Foundation, Inc. for
food and tutoring programs $ 100,368
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of Bastrop $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the city of New Orleans for Behrman
Stadium $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Joe Burrow Foundation $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Lakeshore Indians Booster Club for the
Lakeshore Playground $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Opportunities Industrialization Center of
Ouachita $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the PLEASE Foundation $ 262,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Brusly $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Port Barre $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Rosedale $ 50,000
Page 200 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Lafayette City-Parish Consolidated
Government for equipment for the office of
the marshal $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Lafayette for equipment for the police
department $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Lafayette Parish Sheriff's Office for
equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Vermilion Parish Sheriff's Office for a mobile
command center $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Acadia Parish Sheriff's Office for crime
cameras $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Morgan City for equipment for the police
department $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Baldwin for the police department for
renovations $ 120,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Morgan City for fire truck repairs and
equipment for the fire department $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Assumption Parish Police Jury for equipment
for the Bayou L'Ourse volunteer fire department $ 163,665
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Berwick for equipment for the fire department $ 108,000
Page 201 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Berwick for vehicle dash cameras for the
police department $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Morgan City for the Marshal's Office for
vehicles and equipment $ 65,896
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Jeanerette for equipment for the police
department $ 266,100
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Assumption Parish Sheriff's Office for an
armored rescue vehicle $ 397,586
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the East
Baton Rouge Parish Sheriff's Office
for first responder activities $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
city of Zachary Police Department
for first responder activities $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Baker Police Department
for first responder activities $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Baton Rouge Constable's Office
for first responder activities $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Zachary Fire Department
for first responder activities $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Baker Fire Department
for first responder activities $ 40,000
Page 202 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the East
Baton Rouge Parish Fire Department
for first responder activities $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the St.
George Fire Protection District for equipment $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Tangipahoa Parish Sheriff's Office $ 1,900,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Ponchatoula Police Department $ 210,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Hammond Police Department $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Albany Police Department $ 115,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
village of Tickfaw for the Police Department $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Independence for the Police Department $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Jefferson Parish Sheriff's Office for X-ray
panels $ 74,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Jefferson Parish Sheriff's Office for equipment $ 146,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Concordia Parish Sheriff's Office for costs
associated with a cyber crime lab $ 150,000
Page 203 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for the
replacement of Energy Recovery Ventilators $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for the
relocation and installation expenses relating to
the Belle Chase radio tower $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for
equipment $ 231,709
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Morehouse Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
DeSoto Parish Sheriff's Office for a substation $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Bastrop for the City Marshal's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Richland Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Loyola University Police Department for
equipment and supplies for ADA compliance $ 212,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Madison Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Loyola University Police Department for an
E-Bike patrol program, vehicles, and related
fleet accountability systems $ 169,000
Page 204 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Loyola University Police Department for
expenses related to strategic enhancements $ 78,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the East
Carroll Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Ouachita Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Kenner Police Department $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Tensas Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Concordia Parish Sheriff's Office $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
town of Ferriday Police Department $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for
investigations equipment $ 156,709
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Gretna Police Department for furniture,
equipment, and vehicles $ 489,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Westwego Police Department for supplies
and equipment $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Westwego Fire Department for equipment $ 75,000
Page 205 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Iowa Police Department for radios $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Iowa Fire Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Ascension Parish Government for the Geismar
Volunteer Fire Department for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Ascension Parish Government for the 5th Ward
Volunteer Fire Department for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Iberville Parish Sheriff's Office for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Assumption Parish Sheriff's Office for
equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Madisonville for the Police Department $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
St. George for equipment for the police
department $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Central Police Department for equipment $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town of
Springfield Police Department for equipment $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemine Fire Department $ 50,000
Page 206 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Bayou
Blue Fire Department in Iberville Parish $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Grosse Tete Fire Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Rosedale Fire Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Pointe Coupee Parish Government for the
Pointe Coupee Fire Protection Districts $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Pointe Coupee Parish Sheriff's Office $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
St. Landry Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Iberville Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
East Feliciana Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
West Feliciana Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
West Baton Rouge Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Addis Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Brusly Police Department $ 25,000
Page 207 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Rosedale Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Grosse Tete Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Livonia Police Department $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemine Police Department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Port Barre Police Department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Krotz Springs Police Department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Arnaudville Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Leonville Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Clinton Police Department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
New Roads Police Department $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the St.
James Parish Sheriff's Office for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the St.
Helena Sheriff's Office for improvements and
equipment $ 500,000
Page 208 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town of
Killian Police Department for equipment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Covington Fire Department for facility
upgrades $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Mandeville Police Department for
equipment upgrades $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Lockport Volunteer Fire Company $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Bayou Blue Fire Protection District $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Bayou
Cane Fire Protection District $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Lincoln Parish Police Jury for the
acquisition of air packs for the fire district $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the West
Carroll Parish Sheriff's Office for the
acquisition of patrol vehicles $ 215,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Richwood Police Department $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the village
of Pioneer Police Department for the acquisition
of a police vehicle $ 75,000
Page 209 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city
of Baton Rouge for the Baton Rouge City
Constable's Office for a transport van and
mobile command $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
St. Bernard Parish Sheriff's Office $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the St.
Martin Parish Sheriff's Office for camera and
security network upgrades $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Iberia
Parish Sheriff's Office for the purchase of a
SWAT vehicle $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Iberia
Parish Sheriff's Office for the purchase of
command post trailer for crisis management $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office for
police equipment and training $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Harahan Police Department for generator and
technology equipment, installation, upfits,
upgrades, services, and warranties $ 86,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Harahan Police Department for police
equipment and camera system, including upfits,
upgrades, accessories, services, and warranties $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Gretna Police Department for police
equipment and training $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Orleans Parish Sheriff's Office $ 500,000
Page 210 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Vernon Parish Sheriff's Office for jail
repairs $ 95,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
DeRidder for the police department
communications equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Orleans Parish Sheriff's Office $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Ouachita Parish Sheriff's Office for a command
and communications trailer $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Grant
Parish Sheriff's Office for administrative office
drainage improvements $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Plaquemines Parish Sheriff's Office $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Echo-Poland Fire Department for the
installation of a fire protection well $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Shreveport for the City Marshal's Office for
ballistic vests, body cameras, and portable radios $ 265,879
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Denham Springs Police Department for
equipment $ 123,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the city of
Denham Springs City Marshal for the purchase
of a vehicle $ 73,251
Page 211 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Livingston Parish Sheriff's Office for
equipment $ 184,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Livingston Parish Fire Protection District No.
5 for extraction equipment $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Livingston Parish Office of Homeland
Security for radios $ 230,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Caddo Parish Sheriff's Office for the operation
and programming of a domestic violence center $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Claiborne Parish Sheriff's Office for an
inmate education classroom $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
city of Rayne for water tower repairs $ 1,200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal Justice
and First Responder Fund to the Morehouse
Parish Sheriff's Office for jail security upgrades $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to
Lafayette Economic Development Authority
for one-time operational costs and costs
associated with a business development center $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to the
Lafayette City-Parish Consolidated Government
for economic development located
at Heymann Park $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Zachary Taylor Parkway Commission for
activities and lighting $ 100,000
Page 212 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the village
of Dubberly for Police Department security and
technology upgrades $ 3,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the town
of Many Police Department for town pavilion
improvements $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the Sabine
Parish Sheriff's Office for a training center $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Modernization
and Security Fund to the Eleventh Judicial
District for workflow technology modernization $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Lafayette City-Parish Consolidated
Government for the Milton traffic crosswalk $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Transportation Infrastructure Fund to the
Lafayette City-Parish Consolidated
Government for the Milton Community
Center crime cameras $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
Buccaneer Baseball, Inc. $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
Community Outreach Services, LLC $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
Giving Hope Food Pantry and Resource Center
of Jefferson Parish $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
St. Mary Water and Sewer No. 4 $ 100,000
Page 213 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
the city of Shreveport for the Hyssop Care
Foundation, Inc. $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
the Ellis Marsalis Center for Music in New
Orleans $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
the village of Grand Cane for new roof and
repairs at village hall $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to ARC of St. Mary Center of Hope $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Ascension Parish Government for roadway
improvements and roundabout construction at
Hwy 929 and 930, Amite Diversion Canal cuts,
and courthouse security enhancements $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Baton Rouge Green, Inc. $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Bossier Parish Police Jury for improvements
to Kingston Park $ 545,200
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Buc Soccer Booster Club, Inc. $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Bywater Neighborhood Association $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Children's Advocacy Center - Hope House
for facility upgrades $ 200,000
Page 214 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Communities in Schools of the Gulf
South, Inc. for delivery of social work services
in local schools $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to Eagle
Athletic Facilities, L3C for athletic field
and landscape improvements to the Hope Haven
shared bathroom facilities for the Hope Haven
Fitness Trail $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to East Baton Rouge Council on Aging $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Faith and Fostering for the EQUIP Program $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Feeding Louisiana $ 3,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Folse Productions, Inc. for the HTV10
Louisiana and Beyond series $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Franciscan Missionaries of Our Lady
University $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Grandparents Raising Grandchildren $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Greater St. Martinville Economic
Development District for the master plan $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Holy Rosary Redevelopment for historic
site development and a head start building $ 1,500,000
Page 215 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Iberia Parish Government for repairs to
Slumpy Bayou Boat Ramp $ 55,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 2 for
improvements to park facilities located in
Avondale $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 2 for
restoration and renovation of historic properties
at the Hope Haven Campus $ 1,050,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
educational and recreational programs $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
improvements to park facilities located in
Waggman $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
Kennedy Heights Park improvements in
Avondale $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
the Woodmere Senior Center $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Council District 3 for
the Woodmere Playground upgrades $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish Parks and Recreation
District for park improvements at Little
Farms Playground $ 240,000
Page 216 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Jefferson Parish School Board for
improvements to schools in School Board
District No. 5 $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Livingston Parish Government for a boat
launch in Amite $ 700,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Livingston Parish Gravity Drainage District
No. 1 $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Livingston Parish School Board for
conference room renovation at Doyle High
School $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Livingston Parish School Board for an
athletic complex at Doyle High School $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Livingston Parish School Board for limestone
for French Settlement High School girls'
softball parking lot $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Livingston Parish School Board for security
enhancements at Doyle High School $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Made in America, Inc. for a small business
incubator program $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Martin Luther King Community
Development Corporation $ 93,100
Page 217 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Martin Luther King Neighborhood
Association $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Mary Bird Perkins Cancer Center $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to New Heights Therapeutic Riding Center for
facility upgrades and scholarships $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to New Orleans & Company $ 700,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Northshore Harbor Center for repairs,
inventory, and capital investment $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Ouachita Parish School Board for parking
lot repairs at Sterlington High School $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Our Daily Bread Food Bank of Hammond $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Plaquemines Parish Government for
improvements to Jesuit Bend Park $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Red River Parish for the Courthouse Annex/
Emergency Operations Center $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Red River Revel, Inc. $ 50,000
Page 218 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Restore Grand Isle for the Save the
Oleander Hotel Project $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Shreveport Bossier Military Affairs Council
for Barksdale Air Force Base security gate $ 3,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Shreveport Bossier Military Affairs Council
for The Watch $ 2,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. Bernard Parish Economic Development
Foundation $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. James Parish Government for road and
drainage improvements in Bellevue Lakes
Subdivision, paving project for the St. James
Boat Club, and parishwide road rehabilitation
planning and construction $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. John the Baptist Parish Government for
the Comprehensive Water Improvement
Program $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. Louis Catholic High School in Lake
Charles $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. Nicholas Center for Children $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to St. Tammany Recreation District No. 5 for
a boat launch and recreation area $ 175,000
Page 219 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Tangipahoa Parish Government for a helipad
on the Tangipahoa River $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Acadiana Educational Endowment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Acadiana Educational Endowment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans for judicial security
upgrades at the Algiers Courthouse $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Development District for
recreational infrastructure for NORD and
InspireNOLA Championship Field $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Development District for
recreational infrastructure for City Council
District C $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Development District for blight
remediation $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Development District for the
Human Assistance and Needs Development
program $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Economic Development
Foundation $ 25,000
Page 220 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Algiers Economic Development
Foundation for the Algiers Career and
Educational Development Program $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the ARC of Assumption Parish $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the ARC of East Ascension $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the ARC of St. James Parish for completion
of ARC building $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for overlay
and road repairs for West Bryant Road $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Bayouland YMCA in Houma $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Beauregard Parish Police Jury for District
3B Dogwood Trail road repairs $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Bernice Historical Society for upgrades to
the Depot Park $ 15,700
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Biomedical Research Foundation of
Northwest Louisiana for the Center for
Molecular Imaging and Therapy (CMIT) for
acquisition and installation of a SPECT/CT
camera system and related software $ 1,000,000
Page 221 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Caddo Parish Commission for Retooling
Individuals to Pursue Excellence for at-risk
youth programs $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Calcasieu Parish Police Jury for the
Community Center & Playground District
No. One of Ward Six community center $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Calcasieu Parish School Board for
remodeling Henry Heights School $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Calcasieu Parish School Board for
track repairs at Dequincy High School $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Caldwell Parish Police Jury for road
maintenance and repair $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Capital Area Autism Network $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Catahoula Parish Police Jury for generator
repair of the Leland Water System $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Catahoula Parish Police Jury for overlay
and road repair $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Alexandria for maintenance and
improvements at Cheatham Park $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Baker $ 50,000
Page 222 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Baton Rouge $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Baton Rouge $ 1,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Bossier City for improvements at
Northgate Road and Patricia Drive Intersection $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Bossier City for striping
improvements $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Bossier City for summer youth
activities $ 36,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Bossier City for the citywide
pump track project $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund
to the city of Crowley for pumper trucks $ 650,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Crowley for sewer improvements $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Denham Springs for drainage
improvements $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the City of Donaldsonville for the River Road
African-American Museum $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Gretna for beautification projects $ 100,000
Page 223 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Hammond $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Harahan for a generator for city
hall $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Harahan for cover for ADA play
system at Memorial Park $ 180,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Harahan for street repairs $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Jeanerette $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Kenner for playground
improvements at AJ Muss Bertolino Park $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Kenner for playground
improvements, drainage and road repairs and
construction in Council District No. 1 $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Kenner for road repairs and
improvements to Roosevelt Boulevard $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Lake Charles for electrical
streetlights on Sallier Street $ 135,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Lake Charles for Prien Lake
pedestrian bridge $ 300,000
Page 224 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Lake Charles Ward Three
Marshal's Office $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Minden for the Marshall Street
water improvements $ 250,290
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Monroe for the Northeast
Louisiana Children's Museum, Inc. for
renovations, construction, and furnishing $ 1,500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Natchitoches for roof replacement
on the city court building $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Iberia for Teen Court $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans Department of Parks
and Recreation for the Joe Bartholomew Golf
Course $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans for Le Sanctuary,
Inc. for a summer literacy program $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans for Operation SPARK $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans for STEM NOLA $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Orleans Health Department
for health and wellness programming $ 150,000
Page 225 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of New Roads $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Patterson $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Pineville for street overlay and
repairs $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Plaquemine $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Plaquemine for the Plaquemine
Locks $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Port Allen for renovations to Sam
D'Agostino Historic Building $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Shreveport for Birth Well
Shreveport $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Shreveport for Community
Caregivers of Northwest Louisiana, Inc. $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Shreveport for infrastructure
improvements at North Shreveport Industrial
Park $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Slidell for the Slidell Museum $ 50,000
Page 226 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Slidell for the Veteran Memorial
Fund $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of St. Gabriel for a summer school
program $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of St. Martinville for road
improvements to Sieber Road $ 152,213
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Sulphur $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Thibodaux for repairs to the Stark
Municipal Complex $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Thibodaux for Stark Municipal
building upgrade $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Thibodaux for the Stark
Municipal Complex $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Thibodaux for upgrades to the
Stark Municipal Complex $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of West Monroe for road repairs $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of West Monroe for the acquisition
of a grapple truck and trailer $ 220,000
Page 227 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Westlake $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Zachary $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Zachary $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Claiborne Parish Police Jury for repairs to
the Claiborne Parish Courthouse $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Claiborne Parish Police Jury for the
rehabilitation of the exterior of the Claiborne
Parish Police Jury Office Complex $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Concordia Parish Police Jury for chillers
at the courthouse $ 330,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Concordia Parish Police Jury for drainage
and road repairs of Jack Cranfield Road $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Croatian American Society in Belle
Chasse $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Desire Community Development
Corporation $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the East Baton Rouge Parish Metropolitan
Council District 1 $ 100,000
Page 228 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the East Baton Rouge Parish Public Schools $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the East Feliciana Parish Police Jury $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Eastern New Orleans Neighborhood
Advisory Commission $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Ernest N. Morial New Orleans
Exhibition Hall Authority for the Ernest
N. Morial Convention Center $ 260,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Festivals Acadiens et Creoles $ 40,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Fortieth Judicial District Court Judicial
Expense Fund for technology and
communications upgrades $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Franklin Parish Police Jury for road
maintenance and repair $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the French Quarter Management District $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Gentilly Development District $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Glass Act Recycling Corporation for the
purchase of various recycling equipment and
materials $ 75,000
Page 229 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Greater St. Mary Community
Development Foundation for the Hope
Community Center $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Helen Hooks Rownd VFW Post 3652 $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Highland Club Property Owners'
Association, Inc. $ 12,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Iberia Parish Government for the
Grand Marais $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Iberia Parish Government for the
Jeanerette Canal boat launch $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Iberville Parish Council $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Knock Knock Children's Museum, Inc.
for the Waterways Learning Zone $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lafayette Economic Development
Authority $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lafourche ARC $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lafourche Basin Levee District for the
Vacherie River Cruise Terminal development $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Page 230 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lafourche Parish Government for
Recreation District No. 8 for community
playground improvements $ 65,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lake Charles Cemetery Association $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lake Charles Cemetery Association, Ltd. $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the LaSalle Parish Sheriff's Office for deferred
maintenance and upgrades $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lincoln Parish District Attorney's Office
to expand staffing capacity $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Lincoln Parish Police Jury for
improvements to the courthouse $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Livingston Parish School Board for a
student common area at Live Oak High School $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Alliance of Children's
Advocacy Centers $ 586,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Art and Science Museum, Inc. $ 450,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Breast and Cervical Health
Program $ 50,000
Page 231 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Chamber of Commerce
Foundation $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Leadership Institute $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Leadership Institute $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Veterans Museum Foundation $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Louisiana Youth Seminar, Inc. $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Magnolia Care Center Veterans Home $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Morehouse Parish Clerk of Court for
upgrades to the Clerk's Office $ 38,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the New Orleans Parish School Board for
the Leah Chase School for programming $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the New Orleans Recreation Development
Foundation for New Orleans East and Lower
9th Ward Parks $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Ouachita Parish Police Jury $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Parents/Professionals for Exceptional
Progress Foundation $ 100,000
Page 232 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
recreational infrastructure on the Eastbank of
Plaquemines Parish $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for
upgrades to Ironton Park $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Plaquemines Parish Government for the
Oakville Senior Center for community engagement $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Pointe Coupee Parish Council $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Rapides Parish Police Jury for continued
clean up of Bayou Rapides $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to The Regional Military Museum in Houma $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Sixteenth Judicial District Court for the
Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA) $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Southeast Louisiana Pregnancy Center for
Women and Children for security, electrical
repairs, and grounds work $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Bernard Parish Recreation Department
for Violet Park $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Charles Parish Government for Des
Allemands Bulkhead $ 200,000
Page 233 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Charles Parish Government for design,
engineering, installation and construction of
replacement of road lighting on U.S. Highway 61
Spillway Bridge $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Helena Economic Development
Foundation, Inc. $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Mary Fire District #11 $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Mary Levee District for emergency
operations plan $ 30,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Mary Parish Chamber of Commerce $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Mary Parish Government for drainage $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Tammany Early Childhood Ready
Start Network for seats $ 235,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Tammany Economic Development
Corporation for recruitment, marketing,
subscription and research services and
sponsorship and registration $ 175,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Tammany Tourist and Convention
Commission for signage installation and
beautification projects $ 325,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Addis $ 25,000
Page 234 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Arnaudville $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Berwick $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Clayton $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Clinton $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Delhi $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Elton $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Ferriday $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Fordoche $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Franklinton for additions to the
Bogue Chitto landing $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Franklinton for tractor and
equipment $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Glenmora for ballpark bathroom
repairs and water tower repairs $ 40,000
Page 235 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Haynesville for equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Henderson for sidewalk
improvements along Hwy 352 and Amy Street $ 212,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Independence $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Jonesville for fencing upgrades
and repairs $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Jonesville for street lighting $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Krotz Springs $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Leonville $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Livonia $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Madisonville $ 125,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Many for fencing at the Youth
Development Complex $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Marion for town fencing
upgrades $ 35,000
Page 236 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Melville $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Mooringsport for the
Economic Development Fund $ 80,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Newellton $ 175,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Oak Grove for equipment $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Plain Dealing $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Rayville $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Richwood $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Slaughter $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of St. Joseph $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Vivian for the North Caddo
Community Coalition (NC3) $ 85,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Vivian for the Reader Chapel
Christian Methodist Episcopal Church $ 80,000
Page 237 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Vivian for the Vivian Athletic
Association for improvements $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Union Parish Clerk of Court for
courthouse repairs $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Union Parish Police Jury for the
acquisition of landfill equipment $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the United Way of Southeast Louisiana for
Tangipahoa Parish services $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Vernon Parish School Board for the
Pickering High School sewer treatment plant $ 300,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Ashland for rehabilitation of
roadways $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Athens for the acquisition of IT
equipment $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Collinston $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Delta $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Florien for a Town Hall project $ 200,000
Page 238 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Forest for downtown street
improvements $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Grosse Tete $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Hall Summit for a Municipal
Facility improvement project $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Hall Summit for upgrades to
village owned buildings $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Heflin for water department
infrastructure and technology install $ 40,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Loreauville for sidewalk
improvements along Hwy 86 and Main Street $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of McNary for water system
repairs $ 60,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Morganza $ 25,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Oak Ridge $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Palmetto $ 25,000
Page 239 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Pleasant Hill for community
center development $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Richmond $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Shongaloo for upgrades to the
civic center $ 25,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Sibley for the purchase of lift
station generators $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Spearsville for renovations and
the acquisition of IT equipment and furniture for
the town hall $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Waterproof for
multi-parish initiatives $ 1,052,500
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to The Water Institute for a Lake Pontchartain
Basin study $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the West Baton Rouge Parish Council $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the West Carroll Parish Clerk of Court for
Minute Court Program upgrades $ 22,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the West Carroll Parish Police Jury for
emergency road repairs $ 300,000
Page 240 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the West Carroll Parish Police Jury for the
acquisition of an OEP vehicle $ 70,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the YMCA of the Capital Area $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Young Men's Christian Association of the
Capital Area for swimming lessons $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the YWCA of Greater Baton Rouge $ 800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to town of Richmond $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to TruLink Healthcare Alliance, Inc. for
community based programs for veterans $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Visitation of Our Lady School in Marrero for
debt payments on the school gymnasium $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Volunteers for America of North Louisiana
for communities in schools $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Youth Services Bureau of St. Tammany for
facility upgrades $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Agape Community Services $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Early Partners Preschool $ 100,000
Page 241 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to JS Clark Leadership Academy $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Keep Louisiana Clean, LLC $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Acadiana Educational Endowment $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Broussard for the Historic
Broussard Drainage Initiative Project A-2 for
the Duke and Knight Streets outfall
improvements $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Lafayette for the South College
Drive at Bendel Road sidewalk project $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Opelousas $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Scott for general road
construction, maintenance and repairs $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Youngsville for general road
construction, maintenance and repairs $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Community Foundation of Acadiana for
the Holy Family School $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Oil Center Association $ 250,000
Page 242 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Southern University System
Foundation for the Honore Center for
undergraduate student achievement $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the St. Mary Parish Government for Chez
Hope $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Boyce for repairs to the water
tower $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Bunkie to install an HVAC
system in the gym $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Cheneyville for building
maintenance and a mini excavator $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Colfax for the purchase of a
vehicle and vegetation management equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Grambling for upgrades to city
hall $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Washington $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Cankton $ 150,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the village of Mound $ 10,000
Page 243 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to Easterseals
Louisiana, Inc. Chartwell Center
for children and adults with autism $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the city of
Thibodaux for Raymond Stafford
American Legion Post No. 513 for renovations $ 50,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the city
of Vidalia for Police Department
equipment upgrades $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Franklin Parish Sheriff's Office Training
Center $ 2,200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Louisiana Housing Corporation for homebuyer
training and wellness programming $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Louisiana Rural Water Association for a
Rate Study Specialist $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
town of Jonesville for Police Department
equipment upgrades $ 15,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
town of St. Francisville for turn out gear
for the Fire Department $ 35,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
town of Wisner for safety equipment for
the Police Department $ 5,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
village of Gilbert for Police Department $ 10,000
Page 244 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to Greater New Orleans, Inc. to develop a
comprehensive, community-driven strategic
plan related to an economic development project $ 75,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to City Year, Inc. $ 220,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Natchitoches Parish Government for a law
enforcement vehicle and equipment $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the town of Iota for wastewater treatment
projects and road improvements $ 2,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for the
animal shelter $ 350,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the Bright School for the Deaf $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Urania $ 6,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to Rapides Parish Police Jury District
C Ward 11 $ 200,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund
to the town of Jena Police Department for
equipment upgrades $ 20,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund
to the town of Olla Police Department for
equipment upgrades $ 8,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the town of Tullos $ 6,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Caldwell Parish School Board $ 500,000
Page 245 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund
to the city of Hammond for equipment for the
Hammond Northshore Regional Airport Tower $ 380,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
Louisiana Sports Hall of Fame Foundation $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice and First Responder Fund to the
Carencro Police Department $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Family Tutoring Alliance for tutoring
scholarships for students in public schools $ 500,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Jackson Parish School Board for Weston
High School for lighting and electrical
upgrades $ 178,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ouachita Parish Police Jury for operations,
equipment, supplies, and acquisitions $ 800,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
the Greater Baton Rouge Economic
Partnership to provide airline incentives
at the Baton Rouge airport $ 375,000
Payable out of State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Louisiana
Economic Development Initiatives Fund to the
Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Foundation in Shreveport for economic
development initiatives $ 25,000,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Evangeline Parish Police Jury for parish
wide roads $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Avoyelles Parish Police Jury for parish
wide roads $ 600,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Allen Parish Police Jury for parish
wide roads $ 300,000
Page 246 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Louisiana Guardianship Services, Inc. $ 10,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the village of Waterproof for operating
expenses $ 100,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to the
University of Louisiana System Foundation
for the Study Abroad - Global Engagement
program across campuses in the University
of Louisiana System $ 185,000
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Statutory Dedications out of the Strategic
Investments Across Louisiana Fund to
Metanoia, Inc. $ 250,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Delta Economic Research and
Sustainability District $ 400,000
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Ferriday Downtown Entertainment
District $ 250,000
20-950 JUDGMENTS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Judgments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 4,224,499 $ 0
Program Description: Special Acts for Appropriations by the Legislature.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 4,224,499 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 4,224,499 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 4,224,499 $ 0
Page 247 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 4,224,499 $ 0
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 4,224,499 $ 0
Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 49:112, the sum of $6,800,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of the State General Fund (Direct)
for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to be allocated to pay consent judgments and other final
judgments against the state, Board of Tax Appeals judgments and recommendations for
payment of a claim against the state, and reimbursements of attorney fees, all as provided
in this Section. A judgment or recommendation may only be paid from this appropriation
if it is final. All judgments and recommendations provided for in this Section shall be paid
as to principal, interest, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in each judgment or
recommendation, it being the intent herein, except with respect to the payment of interest,
that when the provisions of a judgment or recommendation conflict with the provisions of
this Act, the provisions of the judgment or recommendation shall be controlling. Any other
provision of this Act not in conflict with the provisions of a judgment or recommendation
shall control. Payment shall be made as to each judgment, Board of Tax Appeals judgment
or recommendation, or reimbursement for attorney fees only after presentation to the state
treasurer of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further, all judgments and
recommendations provided for in this Section shall be deemed to have been paid on the
effective date of this Act, and interest shall cease to run as of that date. Payment for each
of the following judgments and recommendations shall be in the amounts specified below
for each:
(1) The sum of $17,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Anna
Flowers & Brent Flowers versus State of Louisiana, through the Department of
Transportation &Development et als", signed on April 1, 2016, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Anna Flowers
and Brent Flowers, bearing number 63,977, on the docket of the Eleventh Judicial District,
parish of Sabine, state of Louisiana.
(2)(a) The sum of $450,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Bentz
C. Braud, IV, et ux versus The State of Louisiana through the Department of Transportation
and Development (DOTD)", signed on January 7, 2026, between the state of Louisiana,
through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Bentz C. Braud, IV,
bearing number 130384, Division E, on the docket of the Sixteenth Judicial District, parish
of St. Mary, state of Louisiana.
(b) The sum of up to $150,000.00 awarded to Bentz C. Braud, IV in the consent
judgment captioned "Bentz C. Braud, IV, et ux versus The State of Louisiana through the
Department of Transportation and Development (DOTD)", signed on January 7, 2026, for
future medical care and related benefits shall be payable from the Future Medical Care Fund
pursuant to R.S. 39:1533.2.
(3) The sum of $566,356.00, plus applicable interest, for payment of the amended
judgment captioned "Dr. Mahtab A. Lodhi and Dr. Peter Yaukey versus Board of
Supervisors of the University of Louisiana and Peter Fos", signed on April 25, 2023, bearing
Number 2015-11537, Division D, on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish of
Orleans, state of Louisiana, as amended by the trial court on May 1, 2023, and as amended
by the Court of Appeal for the Fourth Circuit on August 5, 2024.
(a) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$150,336.00, plus applicable interest, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in
favor of Dr. Peter Yaukey.
(b) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$416,020.00, plus applicable interest, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in
favor of Dr. Mahtab A. Lodhi.
(4) The sum of $50,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Gaetano J.
Montana. versus Eagle, Inc., et al", signed on October 1, 2025, between the state of
Page 248 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
Louisiana through the Board of Supervisors of the Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College through Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center, University Hospital, and Gaetano J. Montana, Jr., Angele Montana, and Yvette
Montana, individually and on behalf of decedent, Gaetano J. Montana, bearing Number
2023-06713, Division "D", on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish of Orleans, state
of Louisiana.
(5) The sum of $150,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Elva
Moorhead, et al. versus Eagle, Inc., et al", signed on October 1, 2025, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Louisiana Stadium and Exposition District and Elva M. Moorhead,
Nicol Moorhead, Jeromy Moorhead, and Clayton Moorhead, individually and on behalf of
decedent, Thomas Moorhead, bearing Number 2022-02716, Division "F", on the docket of
the Civil District Court, parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(6) The sum of $65,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Milton G.
Brady versus The McCarty Corporation, et al", signed on February 20, 2024, between the
state of Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural
and Mechanical College, and Carolyn Abbott Brady, Ashley Brady, Chad Brady, and Alaine
Brady Fayard, bearing Number C-697575, Section 26, on the docket of the Nineteenth
Judicial District, parish of East Baton Rouge, state of Louisiana.
(7) The sum of $50,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Charles E.
Parker versus Taylor-Seidenbach, Inc., et al", signed on October 2, 2025, between the state
of Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of the Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College through Louisiana State University Health Sciences
Center, University Hospital, and Charles E. Parker, bearing number 2021-09683, Division
A, on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(8) The sum of $10,833.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Sulochana
Dhungana Nepal, individually and on behalf of her deceased husband, Binod Nepal versus
Tiger Pointe Owner, LLC. Embassy Apartments, LLC, Progressive Security Insurance
Company and Kendall J. Juneau", signed on July 28, 2025, between the state of Louisiana,
through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Sulochana Dhungana
Nepal, individually and on behalf of her deceased husband, Binod Nepal, bearing number
699,332, Section 25 on the docket of the Nineteenth Judicial District, parish of East Baton
Rouge, state of Louisiana.
(9) The sum of $25,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Deborah L.
Reynolds versus Beauregard Parish Police Jury, Amguard Insurance Company, and State of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development", signed on February
5, 2026, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, and Deborah L. Reynolds, bearing Number C-2021-0779, Division B, on the
docket of the Thirty-Sixth Judicial District, parish of Beauregard, state of Louisiana.
(10) The sum of $40,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Alvin J.
Clouatre, Jr. versus Eagle, Inc., et al", signed on October 9, 2025, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural
and Mechanical College, on behalf of LSU Health Sciences Center - New Orleans (f/k/a
Charity Hospital at New Orleans), and Alvin J. Clouatre, Jr., bearing Number 2024-09982,
Division I-5, on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(11) The sum of $375,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Angela
Melerine, Wife of/and Eric Melerine, Jr. versus State of Louisiana DOTD, St. Bernard Parish
Government, The Contreras Sanctuary, LLC and Ancient Oaks Holdings, LLC", signed on
January 27, 2026, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation
and Development, and Angela Melerine, Wife of/and Eric Melerine, Jr., bearing number 19-
0745, Division E, on the docket of the Thirty-Fourth Judicial District, parish of St. Bernard,
state of Louisiana.
(a) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$337,500.00 is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in favor of Angela Melerine.
(b) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$37,500.00 is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in favor of Eric Melerine, Jr.
(12) The sum of $65,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Gina
Raymond versus AllState Insurance Company, Geico Casualty Insurance Company and
Preston J. Volpi", signed on February 4, 2026, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Gina Raymond, bearing number 819-
252, Division E, on the docket of the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District, parish of Jefferson,
Page 249 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
state of Louisiana.
(13) The sum of $10,000.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Shelia Ann
Brooks versus Abraham Mebrahtom, Yam Trucking, LLC, Alpine Transportation Insurance
Risk Retention Group, Inc., Dart Transit Company or AdvantageTransportation, Inc., DBA
Dart Advantage Logistics, Joshua Knox, Kendrix Darnell or Kendrick Rogers, Brown
Freightways, Inc., Fedex Ground Package System, Inc., Samuel Oludayo DBA Samco
Trucking, Protective Insurance Company, the State of Louisiana through the Louisiana
Department of Transportation and Development, City-Parish of Baton Rouge, and the Baton
Rouge Police Department", signed on November 19, 2025, between the state of Louisiana,
through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Shelia Ann Brooks,
bearing number C-719927, Section 26, on the docket of the Nineteenth Judicial District,
parish of East Baton Rouge, state of Louisiana.
(14) The sum of $198,298.75 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Anthony
Murray versus State of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development", signed on February 13, 2026, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Angie Richmond as legal successor of
Anthony Murray, bearing number 238,372, on the docket of the Ninth Judicial District,
parish of Rapides, state of Louisiana.
(15) The sum of $8,500.00 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Lisa
Chamberlain and Webster Chamberlain versus State of Louisiana, Department of
Transportation and Development and the Caddo Parish Commission", signed on March 8,
2018, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, and Lisa Chamberlain and Webster Chamberlain, bearing number 532,981-B,
on the docket of the First Judicial District, parish of Caddo, state of Louisiana.
(16) The sum of $1,610,493.43, plus applicable interest, for the payment of the judgment
captioned "Dawn Marie DePedro, et al versus State of Louisiana, through the Department
of Transportation and Development", signed on December 13, 2023 and affirmed by the
First Circuit Court of Appeal on July 3, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Dawn Marie DePedro, Kamden
DePedro, and Dawn Marie DePedro on behalf of her minor child, Alianna DePedro, bearing
number 127,022, Division B, on the docket of the Twenty-Third Judicial District, parish of
Ascension, state of Louisiana.
(a) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$1,013,506.35, plus applicable interest, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in
favor of Dawn Marie DePedro.
(b) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$298,493.54, plus applicable interest, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in
favor of Kamden DePedro.
(c) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$298,493.54, plus applicable interest, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment in
favor of Dawn Marie DePedro on behalf of her minor child Alianna DePedro.
(17) The sum of $21,640.64, plus applicable interest, for the payment of the judgment
captioned "Louisiana State University System Board of Supervisors through Louisiana State
University Veterinarian Teaching Hospital vs. Robert Johnson", signed on April 3, 2020 and
affirmed by the Third Circuit Court of Appeal on September 27, 2001, between Louisiana
State University Board of Supervisors and Robert Johnson, bearing number 2019-7200,
Division A, on the docket of the Twelfth Judicial District, parish of Avoyelles, state of
Louisiana.
(18) The sum of $496,153 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Tiffany
Raelyn Holt versus the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development", signed on June 9, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Tiffany Raelyn Holt, bearing Number
273,830-C on the docket of the Ninth Judicial District Court, parish of Rapides, state of
Louisiana.
(19) The sum of $125,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Gene Crim
and Frances Crim, husband and wife, and Kevin Crim versus the state of Louisiana, through
the Department of Transportation and Development, et. al.", signed on September 15, 2025,
between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development,
and Gene Crim, Frances Crim, and Kevin Crim, bearing Number 2023-99, on the docket
of the Fourth Judicial District Court, parish of Morehouse, state of Louisiana.
Page 250 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
(20) The sum of $28,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Jacquelyn
Phillips versus State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company in its capacity as liability
insurer of William Byron Brown and Helen J. Brown, State Farm Mutual Automobile
Insurance Company in its capacity as liability insurer of Louis A. McDaniel and Brenda Ann
Ward, Direct Insurance Company, William Byron Brown, Helen J. Brown, Louis A.
McDaniel, Brenda Ann Ward, and state of Louisiana, through the Department of
Transportation and Development", signed on September 15, 2025, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Jacquelyn
Phillips, bearing Number 2023-253, on the docket of the Fourth Judicial District Court,
parish of Morehouse, state of Louisiana.
(21) The sum of $75,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Ralph L.
Porter and Cindi Porter, husband and wife versus Garrison Property and Casualty Insurance
Company, USAA Casualty Insurance Company, Allstate Insurance Company, and
Christopher Dean Johnson", signed on July 28, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through
the Department of Transportation and Development, and Ralph L. Porter and Cindi Porter,
bearing Number 18-0542, on the docket of the Fourth Judicial District Court, parish of
Ouachita, state of Louisiana.
(22) The sum of $8,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "April McLeod
versus State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, et al", signed on August 11,
2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, and April McLeod, bearing Number 2024-193, on the docket of the Fourth
Judicial District Court, parish of Morehouse, state of Louisiana.
(23) The sum of $30,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Jamarcus
Burks and Raven Young versus Louisiana Farm Bureau Casualty Insurance Company, Clara
Surles, and State of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development",
signed on October 23, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of
Transportation and Development, and Jamarcus Burks and Raven Young, bearing Number
23661, on the docket of the Sixth Judicial District Court, parish of East Carroll, state of
Louisiana.
(a) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of $19,000
is hereby payable for the portion of the consent judgment in favor of Jamarcus Burks.
(b) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of $11,000
is hereby payable for the portion of the consent judgment in favor of Raven Young.
(24) The sum of $3,500 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Denzel
Winfield versus Branch Insurance Exchange, Robert White, and the state of Louisiana,
through the Department of Transportation and Development", signed on September 2, 2025,
between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development,
and Denzel Winfield, bearing Number 2024-197 on the docket of the Fourth Judicial District
Court, parish of Morehouse, state of Louisiana.
(25) The sum of $90,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Elayna
Jevonne O'Connor on behalf of her minor child, Skyler Timothy O'Connor versus Chelsea
Branch, Progressive Direct Insurance Company and state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development", signed on May 27, 2025, between the state
of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Skyler
O'Connor, bearing Number 637,437 Sec. "25" on the docket of the Nineteenth Judicial
District Court, parish of East Baton Rouge, state of Louisiana.
(26) The sum of $450,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "James L.
Vann versus Taylor-Seidenbach, Inc., et al", signed on February 27, 2026, between the state
of Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College on behalf of Louisiana State University Health
Sciences Center at New Orleans on behalf of Medical Center of Louisiana at New Orleans
including Charity Hospital and Minnie Vann individually and on behalf of the decedent,
James L. Vann, bearing Number 2023-6663 Div. "C-10" on the docket of the Civil District
Court for the Parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(27) The sum of $40,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Edgar P.
Chauffe, Jr. versus Eagle, Inc., et al", signed on April 16, 2026, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural
and Mechanical College, on behalf of Louisiana State University Health Sciences Center -
New Orleans (f/k/a Charity Hospital at New Orleans) and Edgar P. Chauffe, Jr., bearing
Number 2025-05121, Section 12, Division "D" on the docket of the Civil District Court for
Page 251 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
the Parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(28) The sum of $150,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Breiana
Braxton, et al versus the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development", signed on May 7, 2026, between Erica Boyer and the state of Louisiana
through the Department of Transportation and Development, and its agents and employees,
bearing Number 2022-02517, Division "F-14" on the docket of the Civil District Court for
the Parish of Orleans, state of Louisiana.
(29) The sum of $25,000 for payment of the consent judgment entitled Johnny Vasquez
et al. versus Farm Bureau Insurance Company et al., signed on November 24, 2021, between
the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and
Johnny Vasquez and Sayonora Ivette Vasquez, individually and on behalf of their minor
children, bearing Number C-20143510 K, on the docket of the Fifteenth Judicial District,
parish of Lafayette, state of Louisiana.
(30) The sum of $40,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Karla Whitney
versus the Department of Transportation and Development", signed on March 18, 2026,
between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development,
its agents and employees and Karla Whitney, bearing Number 802-854, Division "E", on the
docket of the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District Court, parish of Jefferson, state of Louisiana.
(31) The sum of $610,000 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Anatole
Cavalier, and Thelma Cavalier versus the State of Louisiana, through the Department of
Transportation and Development", signed on January 13, 2026, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Anatole
Cavalier and Thelma Cavalier, bearing Number C-697553; Sec. 25, on the docket of the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court, parish of East Baton Rouge, state of Louisiana.
(a) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of
$550,000 is hereby payable for the portion of the consent judgment in favor of Anatole
Cavalier.
(b) Of the amount appropriated in this Paragraph, an amount equal to the sum of $60,000
is hereby payable for the portion of the consent judgment in favor of Thelma Cavalier.
(32) The sum of $300,000 for payment of the consent judgment entitled Marva Nash and
Abraham Nash versus the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, signed on May 16, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Marva and Abraham Nash, bearing
Number 2015-5087 "B", on the docket of the Fourteenth Judicial District, parish of
Calcasieu, state of Louisiana.
20-966 SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS TO LAW ENFORCEMENT PERSONNEL
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Municipal Police Supplemental Payments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 39,217,319 $ 39,217,283
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Firefighters' Supplemental Payments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 42,985,000 $ 42,985,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Constables and Justices of the Peace
Supplemental Payments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 1,154.480 $ 1,154,480
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Deputy Sheriffs' Supplemental Payments
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 63,694,000 $ 63,694,000
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Provides additional compensation for each eligible law enforcement
personnel - municipal police, firefighter, and deputy sheriff - at the rate of $600 per month.
Provides additional compensation for each eligible municipal constable and justice of the
peace at the rate of $120 per month.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 147,050,799 $ 147,050,763
Page 252 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 147,050,799 $ 147,050,763
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 147,050,799 $ 147,050,763
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 147,050,799 $ 147,050,775
Acquisitions/Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 147,505,799 $ 147,050,775
There shall be a board of review to oversee the eligibility for payment of deputy sheriffs'
supplemental pay which shall be composed of three (3) members, one of whom shall be the
commissioner of administration or his designee from the Division of Administration; one
of whom shall be a member of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association selected by the president
thereof; and one of whom shall be the state treasurer or his designee from the Treasury. The
board of review shall establish criteria for eligibility for deputy sheriffs becoming eligible
after the effective date of this Act. Deputy Sheriffs receiving supplemental pay prior to the
effective date of this Act shall not be affected by the eligibility criteria.
The amount herein appropriated shall be paid to eligible individuals on a pro rata basis for
the number of working days employed when an individual is terminated prior to the end of
the month.
20-977 DOA - DEBT SERVICE AND MAINTENANCE
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Debt Service and Maintenance -
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 86,501,950 $ 86,199,862
Discretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Program Description: Payments for indebtedness and maintenance on state buildings
maintained by the Louisiana Office Building Corporation and Office Facilities Corporation
as well as the funds necessary to pay the debt service requirements resulting from the
issuance of Louisiana Public Facilities Authority revenue bonds. The Cooperative Endeavor
Agreement (CEA) between the State of Louisiana / Division of Administration, the city of
New Orleans, the Sewerage and Water Board of New Orleans, and the Louisiana Public
Facilities Authority. In accordance with the terms of the CEA, the State, through the
Commissioner of Administration shall include in the Executive Budget a request for the
appropriation of funds necessary to pay the debt service requirements resulting from the
issuance of Louisiana Public Facilities Authority revenue bonds. These bonds were issued
for the purpose of repairing the public infrastructure damaged by the hurricanes. This
budget unit is also responsible for debt service payments to Federal City in Algiers,
Louisiana.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 86,501,950 $ 86,199,862
Page 253 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 34,031,406 $ 33,729,318
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 52,069,119 $ 52,069,119
Fees & Self-generated Revenues from Prior
and Current Year Collections $ 401,425 $ 401,425
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 86,501,950 $ 86,199,862
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 86,501,950 $ 86,199,862
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 86,501,950 $ 86,199,862
20-XXX FUNDS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administrative -
Nondiscretionary Expenditures $ 0 $ 0
Discretionary Expenditures $ 1,285,309,165 $ 98,649,060
Program Description: The expenditures reflected in this program are associated with
transfers to various funds. From the fund deposits, appropriations are made to specific state
agencies overseeing the expenditures of these funds.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,285,309,165 $ 98,649,060
MEANS OF FINANCE (NONDISCRETIONARY):
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(NONDISCRETIONARY) $ 0 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE (DISCRETIONARY):
State General Fund (Direct) $ 85,309,165 $ 98,649,060
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund $ 1,200,000,000 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(DISCRETIONARY) $ 1,285,309,165 $ 98,649,060
Page 254 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY:
Personal Services $ 0 $ 0
Operating Expenses $ 0 $ 0
Professional Services $ 0 $ 0
Other Charges $ 1,285,309,165 $ 171,649,060
Acquisitions and Major Repairs $ 0 $ 0
TOTAL BY EXPENDITURE CATEGORY $ 1,285,309,165 $ 171,649,060
The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer monies from the State
General Fund (Direct) as follows: the amount of $47,109,668 into the Louisiana Public
Defender Fund; the amount of $1,100,000 into the State Emergency Response Fund, the
amount of $1,480,000 into the Innocence Compensation Fund; the amount of $19,640 into
the Medicaid Trust Fund for the Elderly; the amount of $1,000,000 into the Louisiana
Cybersecurity Talent Initiative Fund; the amount of $25,000,000 into the M.J. Foster
Promise Program Fund; the amount of $5,000,000 into the Higher Education Initiatives
Fund; the amount of $2,000,000 into the High Impact Job Fund; the amount of $1,000,000
into the Louisiana Outdoors Forever Fund; and the amount of $14,939,752 into the Self-
Insurance Fund.
Payable out of the State General Fund (Direct)
to the Higher Education Initiatives Fund for
institution accreditation within the Board of
Regents $ 1,000,000
The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer $1,000,000 from the State
General Fund (Direct) into the Higher Education Initiatives Fund.
EXPENDITURES:
Administrative Program $ 850,000,000
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 850,000,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund,
in the event that House Bill No. 313
of the 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is enacted into law $ 850,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 850,000,000
In the event that House Bill No. 313 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted into law, the state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer monies of
the amounts appropriated herein from the Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund as follows: the
amount of $387,170,000 into the Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure Fund; the amount
of $98,000,000 into the Louisiana Economic Development Initiatives Fund; the amount of
$85,369,000 into the Capital Outlay Savings Fund; the amount of $82,770,259 into the
Strategic Investments Across Louisiana Fund; the amount of $73,000,000 into the High
Impact Job Fund; the amount of $37,224,595 into the Criminal Justice and First Responder
Fund; the amount of $36,030,500 into the State Emergency Response Fund; the amount of
$25,000,000 into the Major Events Incentive Fund; the amount of $7,300,000 into the Higher
Education Campus Revitalization Fund; the amount of $4,450,000 into the Modernization
and Security Fund; the amount of $3,000,000 into the Oyster Resource Management
Account; the amount of $3,000,000 into the Criminal Justice Technology Innovation Fund;
the amount of $2,500,000 into the Louisiana Rural Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program
Fund; the amount of $2,500,000 into the Reading Enrichment and Academic Deliverables
Fund; the amount of $1,685,646 into the Federal Energy Settlement Fund; and the amount
Page 255 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
of $1,000,000 into the Louisiana Charter School Start-Up and Expansion Loan Fund.
CHILDREN'S BUDGET
Section 22. Of the funds appropriated in this Act, the following amounts are designated
as services and programs for children and their families and are hereby listed in accordance
with La. R.S. 46:2604(E). The commissioner of administration shall adjust the amounts
shown to reflect final appropriations after enactment of this bill.
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
EXECUTIVE OFFICE
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Executive Office
-
Children's Trust
Fund $0 $1,581,941 $1,980,394 $3,562,335 2
Children's
Trafficking
Collaborative $0 $10,348 $127,451 $137,799 0
Louisiana Youth
for Excellence
(LYFE) Program $0 $0 $1,502,960 $1,502,960 4
Subtotal $0 $1,592,289 $3,610,805 $5,203,094 6
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
MENTAL HEALTH ADVOCACY SERVICE
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Mental Health
Advocacy
Service -
Juvenile Legal
Representation $5,419,967 $0 $0 $5,419,967 39
Subtotal $5,419,967 $0 $0 $5,419,967 39
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Military Affairs -
Education
Programs
including Starbase
and Youth
Challenge $10,199,911 $151,981 $29,387,161 $39,739,053 424
Subtotal $10,199,911 $151,981 $29,387,161 $39,739,053 424
Page 256 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Office of the
State Public
Defender -
Juvenile Defender
Services $0 $6,331,504 $168,575 $6,500,079 2
Subtotal $0 $6,331,504 $168,575 $6,500,079 2
SCHEDULE 01
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
LOUISIANA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Youth Services -
Drug Abuse
Resistance
Education
(DARE) Program $0 $4,558,545 $0 $4,558,545 2
Truancy
Assessment and
Service Centers
(TASC) Program $3,875,000 $0 $0 $3,875,000 2
Subtotal $3,875,000 $4,558,545 $0 $8,433,545 4
SCHEDULE 06
DEPARTMENT OF CULTURE, RECREATION AND TOURISM
OFFICE OF CULTURAL DEVELOPMENT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Cultural
Development -
Council for the
Development of
French in
Louisiana
(CODOFIL) $597,514 $5,000 $0 $602,514 6
Subtotal $597,514 $5,000 $0 $602,514 6
SCHEDULE 08C
DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES
OFFICE OF JUVENILE JUSTICE
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Office of Juvenile
Justice –
Children’s Service $204,622,492 $1,688,827 $891,796 $207,203,115 1,264
Subtotal $204,622,492 $1,688,827 $891,796 $207,203,115 1,264
Page 257 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
JEFFERSON PARISHES HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Jefferson Parish
Human Services
Authority -
Children and
Family Services $2,062,559 $981,802 $0 $3,044,361 0
Developmental
Disabilities $1,556,034 $0 $0 $1,556,034 0
Subtotal $3,618,593 $981,802 $0 $4,600,395 0
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
FLORIDA PARISHES HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Florida Parishes
Human Services
Authority -
Children and
Adolescent
Behavioral and
Development $2,545,468 $317,486 $97,207 $2,960,161 16
Subtotal $2,545,468 $317,486 $97,207 $2,960,161 16
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
CAPITAL AREA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Capital Area
Human Services
District -
Children's
Behavioral Health
Services $6,184,984 $0 $0 $6,184,984 61
Subtotal $6,184,984 $0 $0 $6,184,984 61
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Developmental
Disabilities
Council -
Families Helping
Families $757,517 $0 $0 $757,517 0
Louisiana Citizens
for Action Now
(LaCAN) $0 $0 $240,000 $240,000 0
Subtotal $757,517 $0 $240,000 $997,517 0
Page 258 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
METROPOLITAN HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Metropolitan
Human Services
District -
Children and
Adolescent
Services $2,342,500 $205,000 $0 $2,547,500 0
Subtotal $2,342,500 $205,000 $0 $2,547,500 0
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MEDICAL VENDOR ADMINISTRATION
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Medical Vendor
Administration -
Medical Services
for Medicaid
Eligible Children $61,548,757 $1,546,440 $181,887,577 $244,982,774 364
Supplemental
Nutritional
Assistance
Program $53,591,864 $0 $136,903,215 $190,495,079 521
Subtotal $115,140,621 $1,546,440 $318,790,792 $435,477,853 885
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MEDICAL VENDOR PAYMENTS
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Medical Vendor
Payments -
Services for
Medicaid Eligible
Children $630,615,822 $569,991,898 $3,266,052,537 $4,466,660,257 0
Subtotal $630,615,822 $569,991,898 $3,266,052,537 $4,466,660,257 0
Page 259 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Office of the
Secretary -
Early Childhood
Support $0 $7,151,560 $0 $7,151,560 0
Disability
Determinations
Services $0 $0 $9,827,661 $9,827,661 48
Subtotal $0 $7,151,560 $9,827,661 $16,979,221 48
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
SOUTH CENTRAL LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
South Central
Louisiana
Human Services
Authority -
Children and
Adolescent
Behavioral and
Development $4,222,847 $558,709 $0 $4,781,556 27
Subtotal $4,222,847 $558,709 $0 $4,781,556 27
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
NORTHEAST DELTA HUMAN SERVICES AREA
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Northeast Delta
Human Services
Area -
Children and
Adolescent
Behavioral and
Development $2,256,878 $0 $0 $2,256,878 11
Subtotal $2,256,878 $0 $0 $2,256,878 11
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
ACADIANA AREA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Acadiana Area
Human Services
District -
Children and
Adolescent
Behavioral and
Development $3,619,785 $317,660 $137,157 $4,074,602 29
Subtotal $3,619,785 $317,660 $137,157 $4,074,602 29
Page 260 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
OFFICE OF PUBLIC HEALTH
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Personal Health -
Child Death
Review $0 $0 $50,000 $50,000 0
Children's Special
Health Services $693,719 $101,397 $5,726,392 $6,521,508 33
Affordable Care
Act (ACA) -
Maternal, Infant,
and Early
Childhood Home
Visiting Program -
MIECHV -
Mental Health $0 $0 $547,342 $547,342 0
Emergency
Medical Services $0 $0 $190,650 $190,650 0
Genetics $1,451,054 $7,424,487 $780,000 $9,655,541 26
HIV/Perinatal &
AIDS Drug
Assistance $0 $0 $2,940,137 $2,940,137 2
Immunization $2,183,561 $512,439 $5,753,196 $8,449,196 48
Lead Poisoning
Prevention $0 $0 $468,678 $468,678 2
Maternal and
Child Health $0 $0 $5,975,154 $5,975,154 22
Nurse Family
Partnership $3,965,417 $0 $12,279,766 $16,245,183 42
Nutrition Services $0 $0 $92,960,000 $92,960,000 137
School Based
Health Services $237,500 $6,321,260 $316,000 $6,874,760 3
Smoking
Cessation $0 $325,000 $1,063,202 $1,388,202 2
Subtotal $8,531,251 $14,684,583 $129,050,517 $152,266,351 317
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Administration
and Support -
Administration of
Children's
Services $4,343,737 $0 $8,184,747 $12,528,484 15
Subtotal $4,343,737 $0 $8,184,747 $12,528,484 15
Page 261 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
OFFICE FOR CITIZENS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Community
Based
Programs -
Early Steps $22,825,344 $2,144,820 $7,816,547 $32,786,711 14
Subtotal $22,825,344 $2,144,820 $7,816,547 $32,786,711 14
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
IMPERIAL CALCASIEU HUMAN SERVICES AUTHORITY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Imperial
Calcasieu
Human Services
Authority -
Children and
Adolescent
Services $987,653 $0 $114,820 $1,102,473 13
Child and
Adolescent
Development
Disability $1,260,877 $0 $0 $1,260,877 20
Subtotal $2,248,530 $0 $114,820 $2,363,350 33
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
CENTRAL LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Central
Louisiana
Human Services
District -
Children and
Adolescent
Services $1,839,916 $0 $0 $1,839,916 11
Subtotal $1,839,916 $0 $0 $1,839,916 11
SCHEDULE 09
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
NORTHWEST LOUISIANA HUMAN SERVICES DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Northwest
Louisiana
Human Services
District -
Children and
Adolescent
Services $274,859 $39,220 $0 $314,079 2
Subtotal $274,859 $39,220 $0 $314,079 2
Page 262 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 10
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Division of
Management and
Finance; Division
of Child Welfare;
and Division of
Family Support -
Child Welfare
Services $199,193,000 $2,314,224 $228,331,918 $429,839,142 1,540
Family Violence
Prevention $4,900,000 $0 $1,940,953 $6,840,953 1
Support
Enforcement $23,639,121 $0 $71,880,636 $95,519,757 541
TANF $0 $0 $97,941,258 $97,941,258 13
Subtotal $227,732,121 $2,314,224 $400,094,765 $630,141,110 2,095
SCHEDULE 11
DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND ENERGY
NATURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
The Office of the
Secretary -
Outreach and
Public
Information for
Children $0 $0 $33,540 $33,540 0
Subtotal $0 $0 $33,540 $33,540 0
SCHEDULE 14
LOUISIANA WORKS
WORKFORCE SUPPORT AND TRAINING
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Workforce
Support and
Training -
Children's Budget
Services to Youth $0 $0 $8,682,747 $8,682,747 0
Subtotal $0 $0 $8,682,747 $8,682,747 0
Page 263 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 19A
HIGHER EDUCATION
LOUISIANA STATE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Louisiana State
University
System -
4-H Youth
Development $11,175,407 $258,000 $3,155,474 $14,588,881 0
Healthcare,
Education,
Training & Patient
Service $3,255,096 $1,728,114 $0 $4,983,210 0
Subtotal $14,430,503 $1,986,114 $3,155,474 $19,572,091 0
SCHEDULE 19A
HIGHER EDUCATION
SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Southern
University
System -
Child
Development
Resource
Laboratory $240,100 $0 $0 $240,100 0
Subtotal $240,100 $0 $0 $240,100 0
SCHEDULE 19A
HIGHER EDUCATION
BOARD OF REGENTS
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Office of Student
Financial
Assistance -
START College
Saving Plan $4,052,898 $0 $0 $4,052,898 0
Subtotal $4,052,898 $0 $0 $4,052,898 0
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Special School
District -
Special School
District $28,879,924 $321,064 $0 $29,200,988 327
Subtotal $28,879,924 $321,064 $0 $29,200,988 327
Page 264 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
JIMMY D. LONG, SR. LOUISIANA SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCE, AND
THE ARTS
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Jimmy D. Long,
Sr. Louisiana
School for Math,
Science, and the
Arts -
Jimmy D. Long,
Sr. Louisiana
School for Math,
Science, and the
Arts $8,867,059 $731,650 $0 $9,598,709 104
Louisiana Virtual
School $0 $200,000 $0 $200,000 15
Subtotal $8,867,059 $931,650 $0 $9,798,709 119
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
THRIVE ACADEMY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Thrive Academy
-
Thrive Academy $8,766,677 $84,046 $0 $8,850,723 50
Subtotal $8,766,677 $84,046 $0 $8,850,723 50
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
ECOLE POINTE-AU-CHIEN
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Ecole Pointe-Au-
Chien
Instruction and
Support $1,876,982 $0 $0 $1,876,982 21
Subtotal $1,876,982 $0 $0 $1,876,982 21
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
LOUISIANA EDUCATION TELEVISION AUTHORITY
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Broadcasting -
Louisiana
Educational TV
Authority $12,053,984 $3,030,224 $0 $15,084,208 63
Subtotal $12,053,984 $3,030,224 $0 $15,084,208 63
Page 265 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
BOARD OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION
General
Program/Service Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Fund
Administration -
Policy and
Administration $1,264,961 $91,000 $0 $1,355,961 6
Grants to
Elementary &
Secondary School
Systems $0 $21,556,895 $0 $21,556,895 5
Subtotal $1,264,961 $21,647,895 $0 $22,912,856 11
SCHEDULE 19B
SPECIAL SCHOOLS AND COMMISSIONS
NEW ORLEANS CENTER FOR THE CREATIVE ARTS
General
Program/Service Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
New Orleans
Center for the
Creative Arts -
New Orleans
Center for the
Creative Arts $8,472,494 $80,174 $0 $8,552,668 78
Subtotal $8,472,494 $80,174 $0 $8,552,668 78
SCHEDULE 19D
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
STATE ACTIVITIES
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
State
Activities -
Administrative
Support $15,619,790 $9,191 $9,054,484 $24,683,465 95
Auxiliary
Program $551,797 $1,195,841 $2,484 $1,750,122 10
Child Care
Development
Fund
Administration
and Services $0 $277,556 $49,156,743 $49,434,299 192
District
Support $50,010,932 $6,875,562 $60,174,635 $117,061,129 214
Subtotal $66,182,519 $8,358,150 $118,388,346 $192,929,015 511
Page 266 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 19D
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
SUBGRANTEE ASSISTANCE
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
Subgrantee
Assistance -
Child Care and
Development
Fund -CCDF
Block Grant
Provider
Payments $0 $0 $159,031,231 $159,031,231 0
Federal
Support $0 $10,007,789 $1,568,993,743 $1,579,001,532 0
Child Care
Assistance
Provider
Payments $78,575,748 $0 $0 $78,575,748 0
Non Federal
Support $184,913,853 $47,594,293 $0 $232,508,146 0
Subtotal $263,489,601 $57,602,082 $1,728,024,974 $2,049,116,657 0
SCHEDULE 19D
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
RECOVERY SCHOOL DISTRICT
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
Recovery
School
District -
Recovery
School
District $96,535 $450,160 $0 $546,695 0
Recovery
School
District -
Construction $0 $3,000,000 $0 $3,000,000 0
Subtotal $96,535 $3,450,160 $0 $3,546,695 0
SCHEDULE 19D
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
MINIMUM FOUNDATION PROGRAM
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
Minimum
Foundation
Program -
Minimum
Foundation
Program $3,775,474,334 $291,108,814 $0 $4,066,583,148 0
Subtotal $3,775,474,334 $291,108,814 $0 $4,066,583,148 0
Page 267 of 268

HLS 26RS-657 ENROLLED
HB NO. 1
SCHEDULE 19D
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
NON-PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL ASSISTANCE
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
Nonpublic
Educational
Assistance -
Required
Services
Reimburse-
ments $10,816,924 $0 $0 $10,816,924 0
School Lunch
Salary
Supplement $7,002,614 $0 $0 $7,002,614 0
Textbook
Administration $129,586 $0 $0 $129,586 0
Textbooks $2,645,655 $0 $0 $2,645,655 0
Subtotal $20,594,779 $0 $0 $20,594,779 0
SCHEDULE 20
OTHER REQUIREMENTS
LOCAL HOUSING OF STATE JUVENILE OFFENDERS
Program/
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
Service
Local
Housing of
Juvenile
Offenders -
Juvenile
Corrections –
Local
Housing $8,069,401 $0 $0 $8,069,401 0
Subtotal $8,069,401 $0 $0 $8,069,401 0
FY 2026-2027 CHILDREN’S BUDGET TOTALS
General Fund Other State Federal Funds Total Funds T.O.
TOTAL $5,486,628,408 $1,003,181,921 $6,032,750,168 $12,522,560,497 6,489
Section 23. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 268 of 268